UNITED ST ATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
WASHINGT ON, D.C. 20549
FORM 10-K
☒ ANNUAL  REPOR T PURSUANT  TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF  THE SECURITIES
EXCHANGE ACT  OF 1934
For the fiscal year ended December 31, 2022
☐ TRANSITION REPOR T PURSUANT  TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF  THE SECURITIES
EXCHANGE ACT  OF 1934
For the transition period from                      to                     
Commission file number 001-00812
RAYTHEON TECHNOLOGIES CORPORA TION
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
Delaware 06-0570975
(State or Other Jurisdiction of Incorporation or Organization) (I.R.S. Employer Identification No.)
 1000 Wilson Boulevard, Arlington, Virginia 22209
(Address of principal executive offices) (Zip Code)
(781)522-3000
(Registrant’s telephone number, including area code)
Securities registered pursuant to Section 12(b) of the Act:
Title of each class Trading Symbol(s) Name of each exchange on which registered
Common Stock ($1 par value) RTX New York Stock Exchange
(CUSIP 75513E 101)
2.150% Notes due 2030 RTX 30 New York Stock Exchange
(CUSIP 75513E AB7)
Securities registered pursuant to Section 12(g) of the Act: None
Indicate by check mark if the registrant is a well-known seasoned issuer, as defined in Rule 405 of the Securities Act. Yes  
☒    No  ¨
Indicate by check mark if the registrant is not required to file reports pursuant to Section 13 or Section 15(d) of the Act. Yes  
¨    No  ☒
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant (1) has filed all reports required to be filed by Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities
Exchange Act of 1934 during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that the registrant was required to file such
reports), and (2) has been subject to such filing requirements for the past 90 days. Yes  ☒    No  ¨
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant has submitted electronically every Interactive Data File required to be submitted
pursuant to Rule 405 of Regulation S-T (§232.405 of this chapter) during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that
the registrant was required to submit such files). Yes   ☒    No  ¨
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a large accelerated filer, an accelerated filer, a non-accelerated filer, smaller
reporting company, or an emerging growth company. See the definitions of “large accelerated filer,” “accelerated filer,” “smaller
reporting company,” and “emerging growth company” in Rule 12b-2 of the Exchange Act.
1
Large Accelerated Filer ☒ Accelerated Filer ☐
Non-Accelerated Filer ☐ Smaller Reporting Company ☐
Emerging Growth Company ☐
If an emerging growth company, indicate by check mark if the registrant has elected not to use the extended transition period for
complying with any new or revised financial accounting standards provided pursuant to Section 13(a) of the Exchange Act. ☐
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant has filed a report on and attestation to its management’s assessment of the
effectiveness of its internal control over financial reporting under Section 404(b) of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act (15 U.S.C. 7262(b)) by
the registered public accounting firm that prepared or issued its audit report. ☒
If securities are registered pursuant to Section 12(b) of the Act, indicate by check mark whether the financial statements of the
registrant included in the filing reflect the correction of an error to previously issued financial statements. ¨
Indicate by check mark whether any of those error corrections are restatements that required a recovery analysis of incentive-
based compensation received by any of the registrant’s executive officers during the relevant recovery period pursuant to
§240.10D-1(b). ¨
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a shell company (as defined in Rule 12b-2 of the Act). Yes   ☐    No  ☒
The aggregate market value of the voting Common Stock held by non-affiliates at June 30, 2022 was approximately
$141,816,683,821, based on the New York Stock Exchange closing price for such shares on that date. For purposes of this
calculation, the Registrant has assumed that its directors and executive officers are affiliates.
At January 31, 2023, there were 1,464,954,584 shares of Common Stock outstanding.
DOCUMENTS INCORPORATED BY REFERENCE
Portions of the Registrant’s Definitive Proxy Statement for its 2023 Annual Meeting of Shareowners are incorporated by
reference in Part III of this Form 10-K.
2
Table of Contents
INDEX
PART I
Item 1. Business 4
Item 1A. Risk Factors 13
Item 1B. Unresolved Staff Comments 26
Item 2. Properties 26
Item 3. Legal Proceedings 27
Item 4. Mine Safety Disclosures 27
PART II
Item 5. Market for Registrant’s Common Equity, Related Stockholder Matters and Issuer Purchases of Equity
Securities28
Item 6. Reserved 29
Item 7. Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations 30
Item 7A. Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosures About Market Risk 57
Item 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data 59
Item 9. Changes in and Disagreements with Accountants on Accounting and Financial Disclosure 116
Item 9A. Controls and Procedures 116
Item 9B. Other Information 116
Item 9C. Disclosure Regarding Foreign Jurisdictions that Prevent Inspections 116
PART III
Item 10. Directors, Executive Officers and Corporate Governance 117
Item 11. Executive Compensation 118
Item 12. Security Ownership of Certain Beneficial Owners and Management and Related Stockholder Matters 118
Item 13. Certain Relationships and Related Transactions, and Director Independence 119
Item 14. Principal Accountant Fees and Services 119
PART IV
Item 15. Exhibits, Financial Statement Schedules 120
Item 16. Form 10-K Summary 127
SIGNATURES
Raytheon Technologies Corporation and its subsidiaries’ names, abbreviations thereof, logos, and products and services designators
are all either the registered or unregistered trademarks or tradenames of Raytheon Technologies Corporation and its subsidiaries.
Names, abbreviations of names, logos, and products and services designators of other companies are either the registered or
unregistered trademarks or tradenames of their respective owners. References to internet web sites in this Form 10-K are provided
for convenience only. Information available through these web sites is not incorporated by reference into this Form 10-K.
3
Table of Contents
PART I
ITEM 1. BUSINESS
General
Raytheon Technologies Corporation is an aerospace and defense company that provides advanced systems and services for
commercial, military and government customers worldwide. The terms “we,” “us,” “our,” “Raytheon Technologies,” “RTC” and
the “Company” mean Raytheon Technologies Corporation, unless the context indicates another meaning. We serve commercial and
government customers in both the original equipment and aftermarket parts and services segments of the aerospace industry. Our
defense business serves both domestic and international customers as a prime contractor or subcontractor on a broad portfolio of
defense and related programs for military and government customers. Raytheon Technologies, formerly known as United
Technologies Corporation (UTC), was incorporated in Delaware in 1934.
The following description of our business should be read in conjunction with “Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial
Condition and Results of Operations” within Item 7 of this Form 10-K, including the information contained therein under the
heading “Business Overview.”
Business Segments
Our operations are classified into four principal business segments: Collins Aerospace (Collins), Pratt & Whitney, Raytheon
Intelligence & Space (RIS) and Raytheon Missiles & Defense (RMD), with each segment comprised of groups of similar
operations. The Company recently announced its intention to streamline the structure of its core businesses into three principal
business segments: Collins Aerospace, Pratt & Whitney and Raytheon. The Company plans to determine the exact composition of
each segment and implement the reorganization in the second half of 2023. All segment information included in this Form 10-K is
reflective of the existing four segments of Collins, Pratt & Whitney, Raytheon Intelligence & Space and Raytheon Missiles &
Defense in accordance with the management structure in place as of December 31, 2022.
Collins Aerospace. Collins is a leading global provider of technologically advanced aerospace and defense products and
aftermarket service solutions for aircraft manufacturers, airlines, and regional, business and general aviation, as well as for defense
and commercial space operations. Collins’ product lines include integrated avionics systems, aviation systems, communications
systems, navigation systems, electric power generation, management and distribution systems, environmental control systems,
flight control systems, air data and aircraft sensing systems, engine control systems, engine components, engine nacelle systems,
including thrust reversers and mounting pylons, interior and exterior aircraft lighting, aircraft seating and cargo systems, evacuation
systems, landing systems, including landing gear, wheels and braking systems, hoists and winches, fire and ice detection and
protection systems, actuation systems, and propeller systems. Collins also designs, manufactures, and supports cabin interior,
oxygen systems, food and beverage preparation, storage and galley systems, lavatory and wastewater management systems.
Collins’ solutions support human space exploration with environmental control and power systems and extravehicular activity suits
and support government and defense customer missions by providing airborne intelligence, surveillance and reconnaissance
systems, test and training range systems, crew escape systems, and simulation and training solutions. Collins also provides
connected aviation solutions and services through worldwide voice and data communication networks and solutions. Aftermarket
services include spare parts, overhaul and repair, engineering and technical support, training and fleet management solutions, asset
management services and information management services.
Collins sells aerospace and defense products and services to aircraft manufacturers, airlines and other aircraft operators, the U.S.
and foreign governments, defense contractors, maintenance, repair and overhaul providers, and independent distributors around the
world. Collins’ largest commercial customers are Boeing and Airbus with combined sales, prior to discounts and incentives, of
20%, 18% and 21% of total Collins segment sales in 2022, 2021 and 2020, respectively.
In 2022, Collins was awarded significant defense contracts for the electric power generation system on the B-52 modernization
program, along with multiple awards related to enabling the Department of Defense’s Joint All Domain Command and Control
(JADC2) initiatives for the connected battlespace, including a five-year contract by the U.S. Army for the Mounted Assured
Positions, Navigation and Timing System (MAPS) Gen II and a contract for the mission system for the U.S. Army Air Launched
Effects (ALE). Collins was also one of two companies selected to develop and produce NASA’s next-generation spacesuit for the
International Space Station and for Artemis. In addition, in 2022, Collins integrated the FlightAware Foresight portfolio of industry-
leading machine learning based predictive analytics, following Collins’ acquisition of FlightAware in November 2021. Collins also
received numerous commercial air transport contract awards for airline selected buyer-furnished equipment installation for
interiors, avionics, and wheels and brakes, along with a number of long-term FlightSense airline maintenance agreements. In
addition, Collins continued its significant product development activities, including for major systems on the Airbus A321XLR, the
Boeing 777X and 737 MAX 10, the Dassault Falcon 6X and the Xian MA700, final certification on COMAC’s C919, and systems
in support of the Boeing T-7A trainer and the Boeing VC-25B.
4
Table of Contents
Pratt & Whitney. Pratt & Whitney is among the world’s leading suppliers of aircraft engines for commercial, military, business jet
and general aviation customers. Pratt & Whitney’s Commercial Engines and Military Engines businesses design, develop, produce
and maintain families of large engines for wide- and narrow-body and large regional aircraft for commercial customers and for
fighter, bomber, tanker and transport aircraft for military customers. Pratt & Whitney’s small engine business, Pratt & Whitney
Canada (P&WC), is among the world’s leading suppliers of engines powering regional airlines, general and business aviation, as
well as helicopters. Pratt & Whitney also produces, sells and services military and commercial auxiliary power units. Pratt &
Whitney provides fleet management services and aftermarket maintenance, repair and overhaul services in all of these segments.
Pratt & Whitney sells products and services principally to aircraft manufacturers, airlines and other aircraft operators, aircraft
leasing companies and the U.S. and foreign governments. Pratt & Whitney’s largest commercial customer by sales is Airbus, with
sales, prior to discounts and incentives, of 33%, 31% and 30% of total Pratt & Whitney segment sales in 2022, 2021 and 2020,
respectively.
Pratt & Whitney produces the PW1000G Geared Turbofan (GTF) engine family, the first of which, the PW1100G-JM, entered into
service in January 2016. The PW1000G GTF engine has demonstrated a significant reduction in fuel burn and noise levels and
lower environmental emissions when compared to legacy engines. The PW1100G-JM engine is offered on the Airbus A320neo
family of aircraft. PW1000G GTF engine models also power the Airbus A220 passenger aircraft and Embraer’s E-Jet E2 family of
aircraft. In addition, P&WC’s PW800 engine has been selected to exclusively power Gulfstream’s G400, G500 and G600 business
jets, as well as to power Dassault’s Falcon 6X business jet, which is scheduled to enter into service in 2023.
Pratt & Whitney is under contract to produce and sustain the F135 engine for the U.S. government’s F-35 Joint Program Office to
power the single-engine F-35 Lightning II aircraft (commonly known as the Joint Strike Fighter) produced by Lockheed Martin.
F135 propulsion system configurations are used for the U.S Air Force’s F-35A, the U.S. Marine Corps’ F-35B and the U.S. Navy’s
F-35C jets. F135 engines are also used on F-35 aircraft purchased by Joint Strike Fighter partner countries and other countries
through foreign military sales arrangements. Pratt & Whitney is also under contract to build engines for the U.S. Air Force’s B-21
long-range strike bomber and to develop next-generation adaptive engines for the U.S. Air Force.
The development of new engines and improvements to current production engines present important growth opportunities for Pratt
& Whitney. In view of the risks and costs associated with developing new engines, Pratt & Whitney has entered into collaboration
arrangements in which revenues, costs and risks are shared with third parties. At December 31, 2022, the interests of third-party
collaboration participants in Pratt & Whitney-directed jet engine programs ranged, in the aggregate per program, from 13% to 49%.
See “Note 1: Basis of Presentation and Summary of Accounting Principles” within Item 8 of this Form 10-K for a description of
our accounting for collaboration arrangements. Pratt & Whitney also continues to enhance its programs through performance
improvement measures and product base expansion, utilizing similar collaboration arrangements.
In 2022, Pratt & Whitney reached significant milestones on the GTF engine program, including surpassing a billion gallons of fuel
saved and 10 million metric tons of carbon emissions avoided since entry into service. The GTF Advantage engine for the A320neo
family began Federal Aviation Regulations Part 33 (FAR33) certification and development flight testing on the A320neo aircraft,
and successfully ran on 100% sustainable aviation fuel (SAF). The GTF Advantage configuration extends the economic and
environmental benefits of today’s GTF engine, as it reduces fuel consumption by an additional 1 percent, extending the engine's
lead as the most efficient powerplant for the A320neo family. The GTF family now powers more than 1,400 aircraft across 64
airlines and three aircraft platforms: Airbus A320neo family, Airbus A220 and Embraer E-Jets E2. The year also saw the entry into
service of multiple new platforms, including the Cessna SkyCourier, Daher Kodiak 900 and TBM960, and ATR’s next generation
42 & 72 aircraft powered by the new PW127XT-M engines, with Transport Canada engine certifications of the PW127XT-M,
PW812GA and PW812D engines to power the ATR 72-600 regional turboprop, Gulfstream G400 and Dassault Falcon 6X aircraft
respectively. In addition, Pratt & Whitney received a significant number of contract awards for the F135 program, which powers all
three variants of the F-35 Lightning II fighter aircraft including an undefinitized contract action for Lots 15-17 and funding to begin
work on an F135 engine core upgrade. The F135 program also achieved several F135 production milestones, including the delivery
of the 1,000th production engine, and Pratt & Whitney added new customers, Switzerland, Canada, and Germany to the program.
Significant activity continued on development programs including the Adaptive Engine Testing Program, as well as the rollout
ceremony for the Northrop Grumman B-21 Raider, powered by Pratt & Whitney engines.
Raytheon Intelligence & Space. RIS is a leading provider of integrated space, communication and sensor systems, and cyber and
software solutions to intelligence, defense, federal and commercial customers. RIS’s Sensing and Effects business provides
intelligence, surveillance and reconnaissance, precision targeting radars, and electronic warfare solutions across all domains, as
well as end-to-end space solutions, including missile warning and intelligence, weather, and navigation. RIS Sensing and Effects
products include the Multi-Spectral Targeting System (MTS) product family of sensors, Electro Optical Distributed Aperture
System (EODAS), AN/APG-79 AESA Radar, AN/APG-82(V)1 AESA Radar, Next Generation Jammer Mid-Band
5
Table of Contents
(NGJ-MB), Global Positioning System (GPS) Next-Generation Operational Control System (GPS-OCX), Next Generation
Overhead Persistent Infrared (OPIR), and Future Operationally Resilient Ground Evolution (FORGE). RIS’s Command, Control
and Communications business provides automated battle management and secure, resilient communications systems, including
terminals providing satellite communications connecting submarines, ships, aircraft and ground stations for the U.S. Department of
Defense (DoD), identification friend or foe interrogators and transponders, and automation, surveillance, navigation, and landing
solutions including the Joint Precision Approach Landing System (JPALS). RIS’s Cyber, Training and Services provides full-
spectrum cyber and service solutions in every domain, including offensive and defensive cyber services for certain classified and
department of defense customers, cyber protection solutions which secure and monitor information technology (IT) systems and
networks across the federal and commercial domains, and high consequence missions which provide classified special mission
support and IT intelligence services to certain classified customers.
RIS serves as a prime contractor or major subcontractor on contracts with the U.S. Intelligence Community, DoD, Department of
Homeland Security, the Federal Aviation Administration (FAA), National Aeronautics and Space Administration, and other
international and classified customers.
In 2022, RIS continued to grow its classified business, receiving a number of significant contracts. RIS was selected as the prime
contractor to develop a prototype Missile Track Custody system, a Medium Earth Orbit missile tracking system, for the U.S. Space
Force. In addition, RIS won a competitive contract from the Federal Aviation Administration to upgrade the Wide-Area
Augmentation System (WAAS), a space-based precision navigation system that will enhance safer air travel in support of the
National Airspace System. RIS continued to invest in advancing its products and services, as well as developing next generation
capabilities to meet evolving customer missions. RIS achieved significant advancements in key capabilities across its portfolio,
including tactical airborne radars for current and future manned and unmanned aircraft, intelligence surveillance and
reconnaissance electro-optical/infrared (EO/IR) radar frequency products, laser technologies, and classified space mission systems.
Raytheon Missiles & Defense. RMD is a leading provider of end-to-end solutions for U.S. and foreign government customers
designed to detect, track and engage threats. RMD’s systems span air, land, sea and space, and are designed to defend against the
most sophisticated threats. RMD’s Air Power business provides air-to-air and air-to-ground weapons that deliver power and
precision to fourth- and fifth-generation fighters including the Advanced Medium Range Air-to-Air Missile (AMRAAM) and
StormBreaker smart weapon, and ground-based sensors for persistent wide-area defense and space surveillance including Early
Warning Radar. RMD’s Land Warfare and Air Defense business provides capabilities ranging from precision weapons including
Excalibur, Javelin, Stinger and TOW to integrated air and missile defense, including the proven Patriot air and missile defense
system, the Guidance Enhanced Missile (GEM-T), the National Advanced Surface-to-Air Missile System (NASAMS) and the
GhostEye family of radars, including the Lower Tier Air and Missile Defense Sensor (LTAMDS). RMD’s Naval Power business
provides advanced sensors, command and control and weapons to protect ships and sailors around the world, including AIM-9X
Sidewinder, Tomahawk, Standard Missile 2 (SM-2) and Standard Missile 6 (SM-6) missiles, and the SPY-6 family of radars.
RMD’s Strategic Missile Defense business provides technologically advanced sensors, satellites and interceptors including the
AN/TPY-2 radar, Standard Missile 3 (SM-3) Block IA/IB/IIA missiles and development of future integrated missile defense
solutions. RMD’s Advanced Technology business focuses on the development and early introduction of next-generation
technologies and systems, including hypersonics, counter-hypersonics, directed energy, advanced weapons and next-generation
radars.
RMD serves as a prime contractor or major subcontractor on numerous programs with the DoD, including the U.S. Navy, U.S.
Army, Missile Defense Agency (MDA), and U.S. Air Force, and international governments.
In 2022, RMD achieved key advancements in, or received contract awards for, the following programs: the Next Generation
Interceptor (NGI); Long Range Stand Off Weapon (LRSO); Hypersonic Air-breathing Weapon Concept (HWAC); the Standard
Missile Family (SM-2, SM-3 and SM-6); and AMRAAM. Major new awards in 2022 include a contract to develop the first
Hypersonic Attack Cruise Missile (HACM) for the U.S. Air Force; a contract to manufacture and deliver GEM-T for an
international customer; a contract for NASAMS for Ukraine; a contract for the SPY-6 Hardware Production and Sustainment base
for the U.S. Navy; a contract for Stinger for the U.S. Army and a contract for the SM-3 for the MDA. RMD also received a number
of classified contract awards, including a strategic competitive award.
Sales and Customers
We have substantial U.S. government sales, which we conduct through all four of our business segments. RIS and RMD together
represent a significant portion of those sales. In addition, as a global company, all four of our business segments have substantial
international sales.
6
Table of Contents
U.S. Government Sales. Our U.S. government sales were as follows:
(dollars in millions) 2022 2021 2020
Sales to the U.S. government $ 30,317 $ 31,177 $ 25,962 
Sales to the U.S. government as a percentage of Total Net Sales 45 % 48 % 46 %
(1)    Excludes foreign military sales through the U.S. government. See “Note 21: Segment Financial Data” within Item 8 of this Form 10-K for additional
information.
International Sales. Our sales to international customers, based on customer end use location, were as follows:
(dollars in millions) 2022 2021 2020
Total international sales $ 25,884 $ 24,377 $ 22,027 
Total international sales as a percentage of Total Net Sales 39 % 38 % 39 %
(1)    Includes foreign military sales through the U.S. government. See “Note 21: Segment Financial Data” within Item 8 of this Form 10-K for additional
information.
Backlog. Backlog, which is equivalent to our remaining performance obligations (RPO) for our sales contracts, represents the
aggregate dollar value of firm orders for which products have not been provided or service has not been performed and excludes
unexercised contract options and potential orders under ordering-type contracts (e.g., indefinite-delivery, indefinite-quantity (IDIQ)
type contracts).
Total backlog was $175 billion and $156 billion as of December 31, 2022 and 2021, respectively. Of the total RPO as of
December 31, 2022, we expect approximately 25% will be recognized as sales over the next 12 months.
Competition
All of our businesses are subject to significant competition. Our businesses compete on a variety of factors such as price, delivery
schedule, past performance, reliability, customer service, product development, innovation and technology. Many of our
competitors have substantial financial resources and significant technological capabilities. Further, some non-U.S. competitors
receive government research and development assistance, marketing subsidies and other assistance for their products beyond the
assistance that may be available to us as a U.S. company. In addition, the competitive landscape in the industry segments we serve
continues to evolve with trends such as increased vertical integration by competitors and customers and the emergence of more
commercial competitors on defense development programs.
Our aerospace businesses compete with numerous domestic and foreign manufacturers, customers and companies that obtain
regulatory agency approval to manufacture spare parts. Customer selections of aircraft engines, components and systems can also
have a significant impact on future sales of parts and services. In addition, the U.S. government’s and other governments’ policies
of purchasing parts from suppliers other than the original equipment manufacturer affect military spare parts sales. Some
competitors may offer substantial discounts and other financial incentives, performance and operating cost guarantees, and
participation in financing arrangements in an effort to compete for the aftermarket associated with these products.
Our defense businesses compete with numerous U.S. and foreign companies in most defense and government electronics, space,
information technology and technical services and support segments. We frequently partner on defense programs with our major
suppliers, some of whom are, from time to time, competitors on other programs.
People
As a global technology and innovation-driven company, we depend on a highly skilled workforce. Attracting, developing,
advancing and retaining the best talent is critical for us to execute our strategy and grow our business. Individuals with technical,
engineering, and science backgrounds, experience, or interests are particularly important for us to succeed in the industries in which
we compete.
Due to macroeconomic, industry and labor market conditions, we have experienced and continue to experience a highly
competitive environment with respect to hiring and retaining employees with relevant qualifications and experience, particularly
personnel with specialized engineering experience and security clearances, which has negatively impacted our operating and
financial performance. We continuously monitor labor market conditions and trends and are working to mitigate this issue through
talent acquisition, partnership, sourcing and recruiting arrangements, workforce succession planning, talent identification,
development and advancement, engagement and recognition programs, and initiatives to attract and rehire former(1)
(1)
(1)
(1)
7
Table of Contents
employees. However, we expect the current labor market conditions and highly competitive employee hiring and retention
environment to continue.
Governance. The Human Capital & Compensation Committee of the RTC Board of Directors oversees the Company’s human
capital management.
Workforce Demographics. As of December 31, 2022, our global employee population consisted of a total of approximately
182,000 employees, including approximately 55,000 engineering professionals and approximately 31,000 employees represented
by labor unions and other employee representative bodies. Our employees are located in 52 countries, with 70% of our employees
located in the U.S.
Diversity, Equity and Inclusion (DE&I). We strive to advance a diverse, equitable and inclusive work environment. We believe a
work environment where all individuals are respected, valued and supported enables them to focus on developing the most
innovative solutions to our industry’s greatest challenges. We have a DE&I advisory board of senior leaders. We review diversity in
talent development and promotion, employee compensation practices and succession planning, and embed DE&I training into our
leadership development programs. We have published our U.S. Equal Employment Opportunity EEO-1 report data as part of our
Environmental Social Governance Report. We have nine diverse global employee resource groups, which are volunteer-run
organizations that are open to all employees and are intended to foster an inclusive culture. We also invest in a more diverse
workforce by supporting science, technology, engineering and mathematics initiatives for women and people of color, and
providing opportunities and support to military veterans, people with disabilities and the LGBTQ+ community. As of December 31,
2022, women represented 25% of our global workforce and 33% of our global executives, and people of color represented 32% of
our U.S. employee population and 17% of our U.S. executives. In addition, based on those employees who self-identified, veterans
represented 12% of our U.S. employee population.
Talent Acquisition, Development and Retention; Employee Health and Safety. We continuously monitor the hiring, retention
and management of our employees by business and function with a focus to attract, develop, engage, advance and retain the best
talent in the industry. We invest in our workforce through internal and external education, training and development programs and
tuition assistance benefits. We also provide market competitive compensation and benefits. We recognize and reward performance
during our annual review process. We regularly conduct succession planning to ensure that we continue to cultivate the leadership
pipeline of talent needed to execute our business strategy. We solicit employee feedback on RTC’s performance as an employer via
confidential surveys in the pre-hire, active and exit stages of employment, and use those results to improve our workplace and
employee experience. These surveys cover various topics related to employee engagement and satisfaction.
We have industry-leading health and safety programs to help maintain a safe work environment for all employees and mitigate
workplace incidents, risks and hazards. We review and monitor our performance and encourage employee input to identify
opportunities to reduce incidents. Moreover, we have industry-leading ethics and compliance programs to help mitigate associated
employee risks. We also provide health and wellness benefits and support flexible work arrangements for our employees.
Additional information regarding our human capital strategy is available in our “People” section of our Environmental Social
Governance Report that can be found on our company website. Information on our website, including our Environmental Social
Governance Report, is not incorporated by reference into this Form 10-K.
For information on the risks related to our human capital resources, see Item 1A. “Risk Factors” of this Form 10-K.
Research and Development and Operations
Our innovative products and services incorporate advanced technologies. As a result, we invest substantial amounts in research and
development (R&D) activities using our own funds and under contractual arrangements with our customers, to enhance existing
products and services and develop future technologies to meet our customers’ changing needs and requirements, as well as to
address new business opportunities.
We manufacture and service our products in over 229 manufacturing, production or overhaul facilities in approximately 30
countries, including the U.S. In addition, RTC has offices in approximately 10 other countries.
Intellectual Property
We maintain a portfolio of patents, trademarks, copyrights, trade secrets, licenses and franchises related to our businesses. We rely
on a combination of these rights, along with nondisclosure agreements, IT security systems, internal controls and compliance
systems and other measures to protect our intellectual property. The U.S. government and foreign governments have licenses to
certain of our intellectual property, including certain patents, which are developed or used in the performance of government
contracts. Commercial customers also have licenses to certain of our intellectual property largely in connection
8
Table of Contents
with the sale of our products. While our intellectual property rights in the aggregate are important to the operation of each of our
businesses, we do not believe that our business would be materially affected by the expiration of any particular intellectual property
right or termination of any particular intellectual property patent license agreement.
Suppliers and Raw Materials
We are dependent upon the availability of materials and major components and the performance of our suppliers and
subcontractors. Some of our products require relatively scarce raw materials. In some instances, we depend upon a single source of
supply or participate in commodity markets that may be subject to allocations of limited supplies by suppliers. In addition, in some
cases, we must comply with specific procurement requirements, which may limit the suppliers and subcontractors we may utilize.
Like other users in the U.S., we are largely dependent upon foreign sources for certain raw materials, such as cobalt, tantalum,
chromium, rhenium, nickel and titanium. We also have some foreign suppliers as single-source suppliers of components. Global
supply chain and labor markets are continuing to experience high levels of disruption, causing significant materials and parts
shortages, including raw material, microelectronics and commodity shortages, as well as delivery delays, labor shortages,
distribution issues, energy cost increases and price increases. We and many of our suppliers and subcontractors have ceased
operations in Russia due to sanctions and have ceased sourcing of components that are subject to sanctions. Other suppliers and
subcontractors are located in areas experiencing supply impediments or are at risk of being subjected to trade restrictive actions,
due to current geopolitical conditions. In addition, some suppliers and subcontractors have been, or may in the future be, impacted
by credit market conditions, including higher interest rates and the availability of credit. Our supplier and subcontractor
performance continues to be affected by these issues, and we have experienced difficulties receiving necessary raw materials,
components, other supplies and third-party services on a timely basis or at all. Our business has been negatively impacted by the
above factors, as well as price increases arising from these issues and ongoing inflation. We work continuously to mitigate the
effects of these supply chain issues through targeted activities as well as through our ongoing supply chain programs. We work with
our suppliers and subcontractors to assess the causes of performance failures and delays. We are providing our suppliers with
access to our contract labor networks to augment supplier workforces, providing suppliers with raw materials and technical support,
and leveraging our raw materials contracts to apply our negotiated rates to purchases by our suppliers. We are also working to
arrange second and third supply source alternatives and have increased our inventory of available materials and parts. We regularly
pursue cost reductions through a number of mechanisms, including consolidating or re-sourcing our purchased parts, expanding use
of long-term agreements, reducing the number of suppliers generally (except as described above for important supply alternatives),
strategic sourcing in cost competitive regions, competitions among suppliers and other low-cost sourcing initiatives. We also have a
number of ongoing programs to manage our dependence on foreign raw material supply and the accompanying risk, including
long-term agreements and the conservation of materials through scrap reclamation and new manufacturing processes. In addition,
to help address the risk of supplier closings or bankruptcies, we monitor the liquidity of our significant supplier base. For additional
information related to supply chain issues, see Item IA. “Risk Factors” of this Form 10-K.
Other Matters Relating to Our Business
As worldwide businesses, our operations can be affected by a variety of economic, industry and other factors, including those
described in this section, in Item 7. “Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations,” in
Item 1. “Cautionary Note Concerning Factors That May Affect Future Results,” and in Item 1A. “Risk Factors” of this Form 10-K.
Coronavirus Disease 2019 (COVID-19) Pandemic. The COVID-19 pandemic continues to negatively affect the global economy,
our business and operations, the labor market, supply chains, inflation, and the industries in which we operate. Commercial air
travel has been significantly disrupted by the pandemic and government, business and individual actions in response. Commercial
air travel has not fully returned to pre-COVID-19 levels, although we continue to see signs of ongoing recovery. While we believe
that the long-term outlook for the aerospace industry remains positive due to the fundamental drivers of air travel demand, there
continues to be uncertainty with respect to when commercial air traffic capacity will fully return to and/or exceed pre-COVID-19
levels. For additional information related to the COVID-19 pandemic, see Item 1A. “Risk Factors” of this Form 10-K.
Regulatory Matters
Our businesses are subject to extensive regulation in the industries we serve. We deal with numerous U.S. government agencies and
entities, including but not limited to all of the branches of the DoD, the FAA, and the Department of Homeland Security. Similar
government authorities exist in all of the countries in which we do business.
U.S. Government Contracts. As previously discussed, the U.S. government is our largest customer, representing a substantial
majority of our total defense sales. U.S. government contracts are subject to termination by the government, either for convenience
or for default in the event of our failure to perform under the applicable contract. In the case of a termination for
9
Table of Contents
convenience, we would normally be entitled to reimbursement for our allowable costs incurred, termination costs and a reasonable
profit. If terminated by the government as a result of our default, we could be liable for payments made to us for undelivered goods
or services, additional costs the government incurs in acquiring undelivered goods or services from another source and any other
damages it suffers. Our U.S. government contracts generally are subject to the Federal Acquisition Regulation (FAR), which sets
forth policies, procedures and requirements for the acquisition of goods and services by the U.S. government; department-specific
regulations that implement or supplement the FAR, such as the DoD’s Defense Federal Acquisition Regulation Supplement
(DFARS); and other applicable laws and regulations. These regulations impose a broad range of requirements, many of which are
unique to government contracting, including various procurement, import and export, security, contract pricing and cost, contract
termination and adjustment, audit and product integrity requirements. A contractor’s failure to comply with these regulations and
requirements could result in reductions to the value of contracts, contract modifications or termination, cash withholds on contract
payments, forfeiture of profits, and/or the assessment of civil or criminal penalties and fines, and could lead to suspension or
debarment, for cause, from U.S. government contracting or subcontracting for a period of time.
For further discussion of risks related to government contracting, including on-going litigation associated with U.S. government
audits and investigations, see Item 1A. “Risk Factors” and Item 3. “Legal Proceedings” of this Form 10-K and “Note 18:
Commitments and Contingencies” within Item 8 of this Form 10-K.
Commercial Aerospace Product Regulation. Our commercial aerospace products are subject to regulations by the FAA, foreign
aviation administration authorities and international regulatory bodies, including on production and quality systems, airworthiness
and installation approvals, repair procedures and continuing operational safety. In addition, commercial aerospace regulations and
regulator approaches differ across jurisdictions and changes in such regulations and implementing legislation can impact our
operations.
Environmental Regulation. Our operations are subject to and affected by environmental regulation by federal, state and local
authorities in the U.S. and regulatory authorities with jurisdiction over our international operations, including with respect to the
generation, treatment, storage, disposal and remediation of hazardous substances and wastes. We use hazardous substances and
generate hazardous wastes in some of our operations and have incurred, and will likely continue to incur, costs associated with
environmental compliance activities and management of remediation matters at sites with pollutants. A portion of these costs are
eligible for future recovery through the pricing of our products and services under our contracts with the U.S. government. In
addition, we have been identified as a potentially responsible party under the Comprehensive Environmental Response
Compensation and Liability Act, also known as the Superfund law, or state law counterparts to the Superfund law, for a number of
sites. The nature and extent of environmental concerns vary from site to site and our share of responsibility varies from sole
responsibility to very little responsibility. We also manage various government-owned facilities on behalf of the U.S. government.
At such facilities, environmental compliance and remediation costs have historically been primarily the responsibility of the U.S.
government, and we have relied upon the U.S. government funding to pay such costs. We do not anticipate that compliance with
current provisions or requirements relating to the protection of the environment or that any payments we may be required to make
for cleanup liabilities will have a material adverse effect on our competitive position, results of operations, financial condition or
liquidity. Environmental matters are further addressed in “Note 1: Basis of Presentation and Summary of Accounting Principles”
and “Note 18: Commitments and Contingencies” within Item 8 of this Form 10-K.
Most of the U.S. laws governing environmental matters include criminal provisions. If we were convicted of a violation of the
federal Clean Air Act or Clean Water Act, the facility or facilities involved in the violation could be deemed ineligible to be used in
performing any U.S. government contract we are awarded until the Environmental Protection Agency thereafter certifies that the
condition giving rise to the violation has been corrected.
In addition, we could be affected by future foreign or domestic laws or regulations imposed in response to concerns over climate
change, and we monitor developments in environmental and climate-related laws and regulations and their potential impact to our
business and financial condition. Changes in environmental and climate-related laws or regulations, including regulations on
greenhouse gas emissions, carbon pricing, energy taxes, product efficiency standards, and mandatory disclosure obligations could
lead to new or additional investment in product designs and facility upgrades and could increase our operational and environmental
compliance expenditures, including increased energy and raw materials costs and costs associated with manufacturing changes.
For further discussion of risks related to environmental and climate matters and other government regulations, see Item 1A. “Risk
Factors” of this Form 10-K.
Other Applicable Regulations. We conduct our businesses through subsidiaries and affiliates worldwide. As a result, our
businesses and operations are subject to both U.S. and non-U.S. government laws, regulations and procurement policies and
10
Table of Contents
practices, including regulations relating to import-export controls, tariffs, taxes, investment, sanctions, exchange controls, anti-
corruption, and cash repatriation. Our international sales are also subject to varying currency, political and economic risks.
Cautionary Note Concerning Factors That May Affect Future Results
This Form 10-K contains statements which, to the extent they are not statements of historical or present fact, constitute “forward-
looking statements” under the securities laws. From time to time, oral or written forward-looking statements may also be included
in other information released to the public. These forward-looking statements are intended to provide management’s current
expectations or plans for our future operating and financial performance, based on assumptions currently believed to be valid, and
are not statements of historical fact. Forward-looking statements can be identified by the use of words such as “believe,” “expect,”
“expectations,” “plans,” “strategy,” “prospects,” “estimate,” “project,” “target,” “anticipate,” “will,” “should,” “see,” “guidance,”
“outlook,” “goals,” “objectives,” “confident,” “on track” and other words of similar meaning. Forward-looking statements may
include, among other things, statements relating to future sales, earnings, cash flow, results of operations, uses of cash, share
repurchases, tax payments and rates, research and development spending, cost savings, other measures of financial performance,
potential future plans, strategies or transactions, credit ratings and net indebtedness, other anticipated benefits to RTC of the
Rockwell Collins acquisition, the Raytheon merger or the separation of UTC’s business into three independent, publicly traded
companies (UTC, Carrier Global Corporation (Carrier) and Otis Worldwide Corporation (Otis)) (the Separation Transactions),
including estimated synergies and customer cost savings resulting from the Raytheon merger and the anticipated benefits and costs
of the Separation Transactions, and other statements that are not solely historical facts. All forward-looking statements involve
risks, uncertainties and other factors that may cause actual results to differ materially from those expressed or implied in the
forward-looking statements. For those statements, we claim the protection of the safe harbor for forward-looking statements
contained in the U.S. Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Such risks, uncertainties and other factors include, without
limitation:
•the effect of changes in economic, capital market and political conditions in the U.S. and globally, such as from the global
sanctions and export controls with respect to Russia, and any changes therein, including related to financial market
conditions, fluctuations in commodity prices or supply (including energy supply), inflation, interest rates and foreign
currency exchange rates, disruptions in global supply chain and labor markets, and geopolitical risks;
•risks associated with U.S. government sales, including changes or shifts in defense spending due to budgetary constraints,
spending cuts resulting from sequestration, a continuing resolution, a government shutdown, the debt ceiling or measures
taken to avoid default, or otherwise, and uncertain funding of programs;
•challenges in the development, production, delivery, and support of RTC advanced technologies and new products and
services and the realization of the anticipated benefits (including our expected returns under customer contracts), as well
as the challenges of operating in RTC’s highly-competitive industries;
•risks relating to RTC’s reliance on U.S. and non-U.S. suppliers and commodity markets, including the effect of sanctions,
delays and disruptions in the delivery of materials and services to RTC or its suppliers and price increases;
•risks relating to RTC international operations from, among other things, changes in trade policies and implementation of
sanctions, foreign currency fluctuations, economic conditions, political factors, sales methods, and U.S. or local
government regulations;
•the condition of the aerospace industry;
•the ability of RTC to attract, train and retain qualified personnel and maintain its culture and high ethical standards, and
ability of our personnel to continue to operate our facilities and businesses around the world;
•the effect of and risks relating to the coronavirus disease 2019 (COVID-19) pandemic on RTC’s business, supply chain,
operations and the industries in which it operates, including the decrease in global air travel, and the timing and extent of
the recovery from COVID-19;
•the scope, nature, timing and challenges of managing acquisitions, investments, divestitures and other transactions,
including the realization of synergies and opportunities for growth and innovation, the assumption of liabilities and other
risks and incurrence of related costs and expenses;
•compliance with legal, environmental, regulatory and other requirements, including, among other things, export and
import requirements such as the International Traffic in Arms Regulations and the Export Administration Regulations,
anti-bribery and anticorruption requirements, such as the Foreign Corrupt Practices Act, industrial cooperation agreement
obligations, and procurement and other regulations in the U.S. and other countries in which RTC and its businesses
operate;
•the outcome of pending, threatened and future legal proceedings, investigations and other contingencies, including those
related to U.S. government audits and disputes;
•factors that could impact RTC’s ability to engage in desirable capital-raising or strategic transactions, including its capital
structure, levels of indebtedness, capital expenditures and research and development spending, and the availability of
credit, credit market conditions including the cost of debt, and other factors;
11
Table of Contents
•uncertainties associated with the timing and scope of future repurchases by RTC of its common stock or declarations of
cash dividends, which may be discontinued, accelerated, suspended or delayed at any time due to various factors,
including market conditions and the level of other investing activities and uses of cash;
•risks relating to realizing expected benefits from RTC strategic initiatives such as cost reduction, restructuring, digital
transformation and other operational initiatives;
•risks relating to the integration of the legacy businesses of UTC and Raytheon Company in connection with the Raytheon
merger, and the realization of the anticipated benefits of those transactions;
•risks of additional tax exposures due to new tax legislation or other developments in the U.S. and other countries in which
RTC and its businesses operate;
•risks relating to a RTC product safety failure or other failure affecting RTC’s or its customers’ or suppliers’ products or
systems;
•risks relating to cyber-attacks on RTC’s information technology infrastructure, products, suppliers, customers and partners,
threats to RTC facilities and personnel, as well as other events outside of RTC’s control such as public health crises,
damaging weather or other acts of nature;
•the effect of changes in accounting estimates for our programs on our financial results;
•the effect of changes in pension and other postretirement plan estimates and assumptions and contributions;
•risks relating to an impairment of goodwill and other intangible assets;
•the effects of climate change and changing or new climate-related regulations, customer and market demands, products
and technologies; and
•the intended qualification of (1) the Raytheon merger as a tax-free reorganization and (2) the Carrier and Otis Separation
Transactions and other internal restructurings as tax-free to UTC and former UTC shareowners, in each case, for U.S.
federal income tax purposes.
In addition, this Form 10-K includes important information as to risks, uncertainties and other factors that may cause actual results
to differ materially from those expressed or implied in the forward-looking statements. See “Note 18: Commitments and
Contingencies” within Item 8 of this Form 10-K, the section titled “Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition
and Results of Operations” under the headings “Business Overview,” “Critical Accounting Estimates,” “Results of Operations,” and
“Liquidity and Financial Condition,” within Item 7 of this Form 10-K, and the sections titled Item 1A. “Risk Factors” and Item 3.
“Legal Proceedings,” of this Form 10-K. This Form 10-K also includes important information as to these factors in the section
titled “Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations” under the heading “Government
Matters,” within Item 7 of this Form 10-K, and in the “Business” section under the headings “General,” “Business Segments”,
“Other Matters Relating to Our Business” and “Regulatory Matters.” The forward-looking statements speak only as of the date of
this report or, in the case of any document incorporated by reference, the date of that document. We undertake no obligation to
publicly update or revise any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise,
except as required by applicable law. Additional information as to factors that may cause actual results to differ materially from
those expressed or implied in the forward-looking statements is disclosed from time to time in our other filings with the Securities
and Exchange Commission (SEC).
12
Table of Contents
ITEM 1A. RISK FACTORS
Our business, operating results, financial condition and liquidity can be impacted by the factors set forth below, any one of which
could cause our actual results to vary materially from recent results or from our anticipated future results.
INDUSTRY RISKS
Our business may be adversely affected by changes in global economic, capital market and political conditions. Our business,
operating results, financial condition and liquidity may be adversely affected by changes in global economic conditions,
international relations and geopolitical events and actions, including inflation, credit market conditions, levels of consumer and
business confidence, commodity (including energy) prices and supply, trade policies, exchange rates, changing policy positions or
priorities, levels of government spending and deficits, the threat environment, political conditions, and actual or anticipated default
on sovereign debt. The current global supply chain and labor market challenges and inflationary pressures have negatively affected,
and we expect will continue to negatively affect, our performance as well as the performance of our suppliers and subcontractors.
In addition, due to the nature of our government and commercial aerospace businesses, and their respective customer and supplier
contracts, we may be unable to increase our contract value or pricing to offset cost increases, in particular on our fixed price
contracts. Our operating profits and margins under our contracts could be adversely affected by these factors. Similarly, interest rate
increases have created financial market volatility and could further negatively impact financial markets, lead to an economic
downturn or recession, and tighten the availability of, and increase the cost of capital for, the Company, which could have an
adverse effect on our operating results, financial condition and liquidity. Tightening of credit in financial markets also could
adversely affect the ability of our customers and suppliers to obtain financing for significant purchases and operations, could result
in a decrease in or cancellation of orders for our products and services, could impact the ability of our customers to make payments,
and could increase the risk of supplier financial distress. Our global business is also adversely affected by decreases in the general
level of economic activity, such as decreases in business and consumer spending, air travel, the financial strength of airlines and
business jet operators, and government procurement. In addition, geopolitical risks could affect government priorities, budgets and
policies, such as U.S. approvals of our foreign defense sales as well as sanctions and other trade-restrictive activities, which could
impact sales of defense and other products and services.
Changes in U.S. government defense spending could negatively impact our financial position, results of operations, liquidity
and overall business. U.S. government sales constitute a significant portion of our consolidated sales. Our U.S. government
revenues largely result from contracts awarded under various U.S. government programs, primarily defense-related programs with
the U.S. Department of Defense (DoD), and a broad range of programs with the U.S. Intelligence Community and other
departments and agencies. Changes in U.S. government defense spending for various reasons, including as a result of potential
changes in policy or budgetary positions or priorities, could negatively impact our results of operations, financial condition and
liquidity. Our programs are subject to U.S. government policies, budget decisions and appropriation processes which are driven by
numerous factors including U.S. domestic and broader geopolitical events, macroeconomic conditions, and the ability of the U.S.
government to enact relevant legislation, such as appropriations bills. In recent years, U.S. government appropriations have been
affected by larger U.S. government budgetary issues and related legislation, and the U.S. government has been unable to complete
its budget process before the end of its fiscal year, resulting in both governmental shutdowns and continuing resolutions (CRs)
providing only enough funds for U.S. government agencies to continue operating at prior-year levels. Further, if the U.S.
government debt ceiling is not raised and the national debt reaches the statutory debt ceiling, the U.S. government could default on
its debts. As a result, U.S. government defense spending levels are subject to a wide range of outcomes and are difficult to predict
beyond the near-term due to numerous factors, including the external threat environment, future governmental priorities and the
state of governmental finances. Significant changes in U.S. government defense spending or changes in U.S. government priorities,
policies and requirements could have a material adverse effect on our results of operations, financial condition and liquidity.
We face risks relating to our U.S. government contracts and the mix of our U.S. government contracts and programs. The
termination of one or more of our U.S. government contracts, or the occurrence of performance delays, cost overruns (due to
inflation or otherwise), product failures, shortages in materials, components or labor, or contract definitization delays, could
negatively impact our competitive position, results of operations, financial condition and liquidity. U.S. government contracts
generally permit the government to terminate the contract, in whole or in part, without prior notice, at the U.S. government’s
convenience or for default based on performance. If one of our contracts is terminated for convenience, we would generally be
entitled to payments for our allowable costs and would receive some allowance for profit on the work performed. If one of our
contracts is terminated for default, we would generally be entitled to payments for work accepted by the U.S. government. A
termination arising out of our default could expose us to liability and have a negative impact on our ability to obtain future
contracts and orders. In addition, we are a subcontractor on some contracts, and the U.S. government could terminate the prime
contract for convenience or otherwise, without regard to our performance as a subcontractor. We may not be able to offset lost
revenues resulting from contract termination. Moreover, because the funding of U.S. government programs is subject to
13
Table of Contents
congressional appropriations made on a fiscal year basis even for multi-year programs, programs are often only partially funded
initially and may not continue to be funded in future years. Appropriation bills may be delayed, which may result in delays to
funding, the collection of receivables and our contract performance due to lack of authorized funds to procure related products and
services. The timing of contract definitization can be affected by factors specific to the U.S. government, including staffing
limitations. Under certain circumstances, we may use our own funds to meet our customer’s desired delivery dates or other
requirements, but we may not be reimbursed. Further, if appropriations for one of our programs become unavailable, reduced or
delayed, the U.S. government may terminate for convenience our contract or subcontract under that program. In addition, our U.S.
government contracts typically involve the development, application and manufacture of advanced defense and technology systems
and products aimed at achieving challenging goals. As a result of untested or unproven technologies, or modified requirements or
specifications, we may experience technological and other performance difficulties (including delays, setbacks, cost overruns, or
product failures), our attention or resources may be diverted from other projects and our future sales opportunities may be
impacted. Additionally, as our customers demand more mature and proven solutions, we may be required to invest in development
prior to contract award with no guarantee of award.
Our U.S. government contracts are typically either fixed-priced contracts or cost reimbursement contracts. Fixed-price contracts are
predominantly either firm fixed-price (FFP) contracts or fixed-price incentive (FPI) contracts. Under FFP contracts, we receive a
fixed price irrespective of the actual costs we incur, and we therefore carry the burden of any cost overruns. Under FPI contracts,
we generally share with the U.S. government savings for cost underruns less than target costs and expenses for cost overruns
exceeding target costs up to a negotiated ceiling price. We carry the entire burden of cost overruns exceeding the ceiling price
amount under FPI contracts. Under cost reimbursable contracts, we are reimbursed for allowable costs and paid a fixed or
performance-based fee, but we are generally not reimbursed for unauthorized costs exceeding a cost ceiling amount or costs not
allowable under the contract or applicable regulations. If we are unable to control costs or if our initial cost estimates are incorrect,
our profitability could be negatively affected, particularly under fixed-price development contracts. We may also experience cost
underruns which would reduce contract value and related expected revenues, and we may be unable to expand the contract scope or
secure additional work to offset the resulting lost revenues. While contracts for development programs with complex design and
technical challenges are typically cost reimbursable, they can be FFP or FPI, which can significantly increase our risk of a potential
negative profit adjustment, as development contracts by nature involve elements that have not been undertaken before and, thus, are
highly subject to future unexpected cost growth. In addition, other contracts in backlog are for the transition from development to
production, which includes starting and stabilizing a manufacturing and test line while the final design is still being validated.
Moreover, over the past several years, the DoD has increased its use of Other Transaction Authority (OTA) contracts, under which
it awards certain prototypes, research and production contracts without all of the procurement requirements that typically apply to
DoD contracts, including justification of sole source awards. OTAs may use fixed-price contracting during all phases of the
contract, or mandated contract cost sharing (e.g., one-third of program costs). They may also require non-traditional subcontractor
participation and impose other requirements that differ from our other DoD contracts. Our business may be negatively impacted if
we are unable to perform on our OTA contracts, including any applicable non-traditional requirements. In addition, in order to
support U.S. government priorities, we may begin performance prior to completing contract negotiations for an undefinitized
contract action with a not-to-exceed price. Uncertainties in final contract price, specifications and terms, or loss of negotiating
leverage associated with particularly long delays in contract definitization may negatively affect our profitability. Our U.S.
government contracts also require us to comply with extensive and evolving procurement rules and regulations and subject us to
potential U.S. government audits, investigations, and disputes. We are also involved in programs that are classified by the U.S.
government, which have security requirements that place limits on our ability to discuss our performance on these programs,
including any risks, disputes and claims.
Our international business is subject to economic, regulatory, competition and other risks. Our international sales and operations
are subject to risks associated with political and economic factors, regulatory requirements, competition and other risks. A
significant portion of our sales are international, including U.S. export sales. Our non-U.S. operations transactions may be
denominated in local currencies. Foreign currency exchange rate fluctuations (including their impact on supplier prices) may
negatively affect demand for our products and our reported profits, as well as our operating margins. The majority of our
commercial aerospace sales are in U.S. Dollars, while the majority of their non-U.S. costs are incurred in the applicable local
currency. Pratt & Whitney Canada is especially susceptible to fluctuations in exchange rates for this reason. In addition, because
our financial statements are denominated in U.S. Dollars, currency fluctuations may cause translation gains or losses for non-U.S.
operating unit financial statements.
Our international sales and operations are also subject to risks associated with local government laws, regulations and policies,
including with respect to investments, taxation, exchange controls, capital controls, employment regulations and repatriation of
earnings. Differing legal systems, customs and contract laws and regulations pose additional risk. International transactions may
include contractual terms that differ from those of similar contracts in the U.S. or that may be interpreted differently in foreign
countries. In addition, in certain foreign countries, we engage foreign non-employee representatives and consultants for
14
Table of Contents
international sales and teaming with international subcontractors, partners and suppliers for international programs. While we have
robust policies and controls in place, these engagements expose us to various challenges including risks associated with the Foreign
Corrupt Practices Act (FCPA) and local antibribery laws and regulations. From time to time, we have disputes with such
representatives regarding claimed commissions and other matters which can result in litigation or arbitration. In addition, we face
risks related to the unintended or unauthorized use of our products.
Our international business faces substantial competition from both U.S. companies and foreign companies. In some instances,
foreign companies may be owned by foreign governments or may receive loans, marketing subsidies and other assistance from
their governments that may not be available to U.S. companies or our foreign subsidiaries. In addition, foreign companies may be
subject to fewer restrictions on technology transfer than U.S. companies.
Our international contracts, particularly for sales of defense products and services, may include offset or industrial cooperation
obligations requiring specific local purchases, manufacturing agreements, technology transfer agreements or financial support
obligations, sometimes in the form of in-country industrial participation (ICIP) agreements. Approvals of offset or ICIP thresholds
and requirements may be subjective and time-consuming and may delay contract awards. Certain customers’ demands are
increasing for greater offset or ICIP commitment levels, higher-value content, including the transfer of technologies and
capabilities, and local production and economic development.
As a result of the above factors, we could experience financial penalties and award and funding delays on international programs,
our profitability on these programs could be negatively affected, and we could incur losses on these programs that could negatively
impact our results of operations, financial condition and liquidity.
Geopolitical factors and changes in policies and regulations could adversely affect our business. Our international sales and
operations are sensitive to changes in foreign national priorities, foreign government budgets, and regional and local political and
economic factors, including volatility in energy prices or supply, political or civil unrest, changes in threat environments and
political relations, geopolitical uncertainties, and changes in U.S. foreign policy. Our international sales and operations are also
sensitive to changes in foreign government laws, regulations and policies, including those related to tariffs, sanctions, embargoes,
export and import controls and other trade restrictions. Events such as increased trade restrictions or retaliatory trade policies,
renegotiation of existing trade agreements, or regime change can affect demand for our products and services, the competitive
position of our products, our supply chain, and our ability to manufacture or sell products in certain countries. Further, operations in
emerging market countries are subject to additional risks, including volatility in gross domestic product and rates of economic
growth, government instability, cultural differences (such as employment and business practices), the imposition of exchange and
capital controls, and risks associated with exporting components manufactured in those countries for incorporation into finished
products completed in other countries. While these factors and their impact are difficult to predict, any one or more of them could
have a material adverse effect on our competitive position, results of operations, financial condition or liquidity.
In addition, given the role of our defense businesses in the support of the national security interests of the U. S. and its allies, we are
subject to risks and uncertainties relating to policies of the U.S. and its allies, as well as other countries, including those that are or
become regarded as potential adversaries or threats. We engage in both direct commercial sales, which generally require U.S.
government licenses and approvals, as well as foreign military sales, which are government-to-government transactions initiated by,
and carried out at the direction of, the U.S. government. Changes in budgets and spending levels, policies, or priorities, which are
subject to geopolitical risks and threats, may impact our defense businesses, including the timing of and delays in U.S. government
licenses and approvals for sales, the risk of sanctions or other restrictions, as well as potential human rights issues associated with
the use of our defense products. These risks and uncertainties may directly or indirectly impact our commercial businesses as well.
Of note, China previously announced it may take measures against Raytheon Technologies Corporation (RTC) in connection with
certain foreign military sales to Taiwan involving RTC products and services. In addition, China has indicated that it decided to
sanction our Chairman and Chief Executive Officer Gregory Hayes, in connection with another potential foreign military sale to
Taiwan involving RTC products and services. RTC is not aware of any specific sanctions against Mr. Hayes or RTC, or the nature
or timing of any future potential sanctions or countermeasures. If China were to impose sanctions or take other regulatory action
against RTC, our suppliers, affiliates or partners, it could potentially disrupt our business operations. The impact of potential
sanctions or other actions by China cannot be determined at this time. From time to time, our businesses have sold, and are
expected to sell in the future, additional defense products to Taiwan, and we are unable to determine the potential impact, if any, of
any future sanctions or other actions by China in response to these sales. Moreover, the Chinese government has generally
expanded its ability to restrict China-related import, export and investment activities, which may have an adverse impact on our
ability to conduct business or sell our commercial aerospace products in China. In addition, in response to the Russian military’s
invasion of Ukraine on February 24, 2022, the U.S. government and the governments of various jurisdictions in which we operate,
including Canada, the United Kingdom, the European Union, and others, have
15
Table of Contents
imposed broad economic sanctions and export controls targeting specific industries, entities and individuals in Russia. The Russian
government has implemented similar counter-sanctions and export controls targeting specific industries, entities and individuals in
the U.S. and other jurisdictions in which we operate, including certain members of the Company’s management team and Board of
Directors. These government measures, among other limitations, restrict transactions involving various Russian banks and financial
institutions and impose enhanced export controls limiting transfers of various goods, software and technologies to and from Russia,
including broadened export controls specifically targeting the aerospace sector. These measures have adversely affected and could
continue to adversely affect the Company and/or our supply chain, business partners or customers.
Our financial performance is dependent on the condition of the aerospace industry. Our aerospace businesses constitute a
substantial portion of our financial results, and the performance of those businesses is directly tied to economic conditions in the
commercial aerospace industry, which is cyclical in nature. Capital spending and demand for aircraft engines, aerospace products
and component aftermarket parts and services by commercial airlines, lessors, other aircraft operators and aircraft manufacturers
are influenced by a wide variety of factors, including current and predicted traffic levels, load factors, aircraft fuel prices, labor
issues, airline consolidation, bankruptcies and restructuring activities, competition, the retirement of older aircraft, regulatory
changes, terrorism and related safety concerns, general economic conditions, tightening of credit in financial markets, corporate
profitability, cost reduction efforts and remaining performance obligations levels. Any of these factors could reduce the sales and
margins of our aerospace businesses. Other factors, including future terrorist actions, aviation safety concerns, pandemic health
issues or major natural disasters, could also dramatically reduce the demand for commercial air travel, which could negatively
impact the sales and margins of our aerospace businesses. Additionally, because a substantial portion of product deliveries to
commercial aerospace customers are scheduled for delivery in the future, changes in economic conditions may cause customers to
request that firm orders be rescheduled or canceled. At times, our aerospace businesses also enter into firm fixed-price or cost-share
development contracts with customers, which may require us to bear cost overruns related to unforeseen technical and design
challenges that arise during the development and early production stages of the program. Spare parts sales and aftermarket service
trends are affected by similar factors, including usage, pricing, technological improvements, regulatory changes and the retirement
of older aircraft. Furthermore, because of the lengthy research and development cycle involved in bringing products in these
business segments to market, we cannot predict the economic conditions that will exist when any new product is ready to enter into
service. A reduction in spending in the commercial aviation industry could have a significant effect on the demand for our products,
which could have a material adverse effect on our competitive position, results of operations, financial condition or liquidity.
We design, manufacture and service products that incorporate advanced technologies; the introduction of new products and
technologies involves risks, and we may not realize the degree or timing of benefits initially anticipated. The design,
development, production, sale and support of innovative commercial aerospace and defense systems and products involves
advanced technologies. We invest substantial amounts in research and development efforts to pursue advancements in a wide range
of technologies, products and services aimed at meeting the ever-evolving product, program and service needs of our customers.
Our ability to realize the anticipated benefits of our investments depends on a variety of factors, including meeting development,
production, certification and regulatory approval schedules; receiving regulatory approvals; execution of internal and external
performance plans; achieving cost and production efficiencies; availability and quality of supplier- and internally-produced parts
and materials; availability of supplier and internal facility capacity to perform maintenance, repair and overhaul services;
availability of test equipment; development of complex software; hiring and training of qualified personnel; identification of
emerging technological trends for our target end-customers; the level of customer interest in new technologies and products and
customer acceptance of our products and technologies. For example, our customers manufacture or acquire end products and
systems that incorporate certain of our products. These end products and systems may also incorporate additional technologies
manufactured by third parties and involve additional risks and uncertainties. As a result, the performance and industry acceptance
of these larger systems and end products could affect the level of customer interest in and acceptance of our products in the
marketplace. In addition, many of our products must adhere to strict regulatory and market-driven safety and performance
standards in a variety of jurisdictions. The evolving nature of these standards, along with the long duration of development,
production and aftermarket support programs, creates uncertainty regarding program profitability, particularly with our aircraft
engine products. Development efforts divert resources from other potential investments in our businesses, and these efforts may not
lead to the development of new technologies or products on a timely basis or meet the needs of our customers as fully as
competitive offerings. In addition, the industries for our products or products that incorporate our technologies may not develop or
grow as we anticipate. We or our customers, suppliers or subcontractors may encounter difficulties in developing and producing
new products and services, and may not realize the degree or timing of benefits initially anticipated or may otherwise suffer
significant adverse financial consequences. Due to the design complexity of our products or those of our customers or third party
manufacturers that incorporate our products into theirs or our customers’ products, we may experience delays in completing the
development and introduction of new products or we may experience the suspension of production after these products enter into
service due to safety concerns. Delays and/or
16
Table of Contents
suspension of production could result in increased development costs or deflect resources from other projects. Any of the foregoing
could have a material adverse effect on our competitive position, results of operations, financial condition or liquidity.
In particular, Pratt & Whitney is currently producing and delivering the Geared Turbofan engine to power various aircraft. The
level of orders received for the Geared Turbofan family of engines, coupled with a requirement to achieve mature production levels
in a very short time frame, require significant additional manufacturing and supply chain capacity. If any of our production ramp-up
efforts are delayed, if suppliers cannot timely deliver or perform to our standards, and/or if we identify or experience issues with in-
service engines, we may not meet customers’ delivery schedules, which could result in material additional costs, including
liquidated damages or other liabilities that could be assessed under existing contracts.
Competition may reduce our revenues and limit our future opportunities. We operate in highly competitive industries and our
competitors may have more extensive or more specialized engineering, manufacturing, marketing and servicing capabilities than
we do. Our contracts are typically awarded on a competitive basis. Our bids are based in part upon the cost to provide the products
and services. If we fail to accurately estimate these costs, the profitability of our contracts may be adversely affected. In addition,
we may face customer-directed cost reduction targets that could have a material adverse effect on the profitability of our contracts if
these targets are not achieved when required. We have also experienced highly competitive pricing, in which a bidder may
anticipate making a substantial investment in a program in order to win the work. Moreover, bid protests from unsuccessful bidders
on new program awards are frequent with respect to DoD awards in particular. Generally, a bid protest will delay the start of
contract activities, delay earnings, and could result in the award decision being overturned and require a re-bid of the contract.
Highly competitive activity within the commercial aerospace industry has included substantial discounts and other financial
incentives, performance and operating cost guarantees, and participation in financing arrangements, in order to secure both new
engine business and the aftermarket revenues associated with these products. Further, our competitors, including our customers,
may develop competing technologies which gain industry acceptance in advance of or instead of our products, or meet particular
in-demand technological needs before us or with technology that is superior to our existing or new technologies. In addition, our
competitors or customers might develop new technologies or offerings that might cause our existing technologies and offerings to
become obsolete or otherwise decrease demand for our offerings. In addition, the possibility exists that competitors or customers
will develop aftermarket services and parts for our products that attract customers and adversely impact our return on investment on
new products. We also anticipate companies continuing to enhance their competitive position against our defense businesses as a
result of continued domestic and cross-border defense industry consolidation and the expansion of competitors’ capabilities
throughout the supply chain through vertical integration. We are also facing heightened competition domestically and
internationally from foreign and multinational firms. Additionally, some customers, including the DoD, are increasingly turning to
commercial contractors, rather than traditional defense contractors, for space-related technologies and for information technology
and other support work. If we are unable to continue to compete successfully against our current or future competitors in our core
businesses, we may experience declines in revenues and industry segment share which could have a material adverse effect on our
competitive position, results of operations, financial condition or liquidity.
The Coronavirus Disease 2019 (COVID-19) pandemic has affected our business, and we continue to face risks associated with
it. The COVID-19 pandemic continues to negatively affect the global economy, our business and operations, and the industries in
which we operate. The pandemic and government, business and individual actions in response, including lockdowns, quarantines,
border closings and other travel restrictions and requirements, remote working, facilities closures and reduced business and leisure
travel, led to significant declines in demand for commercial air travel in 2020 and 2021 and, therefore, for our commercial
aerospace products and services. While we have seen signs of ongoing recovery in the overall demand for commercial air travel
and currently expect that recovery to continue, some commercial aviation segments have recovered less quickly than others, and it
remains uncertain when commercial air traffic will fully return to and/or exceed pre-pandemic levels. The resulting financial impact
is highly uncertain and subject to a wide range of factors and future developments. In addition, a resurgence of the pandemic
(including COVID-19 variants), regional lockdowns or other negative developments associated with the pandemic could hinder or
reverse the commercial air traffic recovery. Negative developments concerning the effect of the pandemic or additional variants, the
efficacy and acceptance of vaccines, new or continued actions to contain the pandemic’s spread or treat its impact, and
governmental, business and individual actions taken in response to the pandemic (lockdowns, quarantines, border closings and
other travel restrictions and requirements, remote working, facilities closures, and reduced business and leisure travel patterns and
work environments) could create significant business disruption for us and our suppliers, subcontractors and customers, exacerbate
existing supply chain and labor shortages, redirect government funds and decrease defense budgets, and negatively affect global
economic conditions. These factors could hinder or delay our production capabilities, impede our ability to perform on our
obligations to our customers, result in increased costs to us and decreased demand for our products and services, and could
negatively affect our performance on our customer
17
Table of Contents
contracts and our business, results of operations, financial condition and liquidity. The ultimate duration and financial impact of the
COVID-19 pandemic remains unknown at this time.
OPERATIONAL RISKS
We depend on the availability of materials and performance of our suppliers, and the impacts of global supply chain and labor
market disruptions on our supply chain have negatively affected and will continue to negatively affect our business. Our
performance requires a variety of raw materials, supplier-provided parts, components, sub-systems and contract manufacturing
services, and we rely on U.S. and non-U.S. suppliers (including third-party manufacturing suppliers, subcontractors and service
providers) and commodity markets for these materials and services. In some instances, we depend upon a single source of supply,
manufacturing, services support or assembly, or participate in commodity markets that may be subject to allocations of limited
supplies by suppliers. In addition, our defense businesses are subject to specific procurement requirements that limit the types of
materials they use. Our defense businesses also must require suppliers to comply with various DoD requirements, including
cybersecurity requirements, any of which requirements may further limit the suppliers and subcontractors they may utilize.
Identifying and qualifying second- or third- source suppliers can be difficult, time-consuming and may result in increased costs.
In addition, global supply chain and labor markets are continuing to experience high levels of disruption, causing significant
materials and parts shortages, as well as delivery delays, labor shortages, distribution issues, energy cost increases and price
increases. Current geopolitical conditions, including sanctions and other trade restrictive activities and strained intercountry
relations, are contributing to these issues. Certain of our suppliers and subcontractors have been unable to hire and retain sufficient
qualified personnel for their performance. We and our suppliers and subcontractors have also experienced difficulties in procuring
necessary raw materials and components, including microelectronics. All of the above have contributed to price increases. These
issues have led to significant supplier and subcontractor performance failures and delays. As a result of these various problems, we
have had difficulties receiving necessary materials, components, other supplies and third-party services timely or at all, which have
negatively impacted production flow in our factories, hindered our ability to perform on our commitments to customers and
negatively affected our results of operations, financial condition and liquidity. Our supply costs have increased due to the above
factors. Continuing high inflation has exacerbated these increases and increased our operating costs. In addition, we are largely
dependent upon foreign sources for certain raw materials, such as cobalt, tantalum, chromium, rhenium, nickel and titanium.
Moreover, some of our single-source components are sourced from foreign countries. Some raw materials and components have
been in the past sourced from areas now under sanctions, such as Russia, or are currently sourced from areas which are at risk of
sanctions or other trade restrictive actions, such as China. We work continuously to mitigate the effects of these supply chain issues
and risks, including providing raw materials and technical support to our suppliers and subcontractors, as well as providing them
with access to our contract labor networks to augment supplier and subcontractor workforces; seeking alternate supply sources;
increasing our inventory of available materials and parts; pursuing various cost reductions such as long-term agreements; and
leveraging our raw materials supply contracts to apply our negotiated rates to our suppliers’ purchases.
The timing of the impacts of these supply chain risks and issues and our ability to mitigate them are uncertain and difficult to
predict. However, we expect the current supply chain, labor availability and price issues, and their negative impacts on our
business, to continue. In particular, we expect to experience prolonged delays for certain critical component parts and sub-systems.
Furthermore, the existing supply chain and labor market issues could be compounded by other events, such as an economic
downturn; supplier capacity constraints for other reasons; supplier quality issues (for example, defects or fraudulent parts); supplier
closing, bankruptcy or financial difficulties; price increases for various reasons; worsening shortages of raw materials or
commodities; and energy supply constraints, including as a result of war or other geopolitical actions, natural disaster (including the
effects of climate change), health pandemic or other business continuity events, or transport and distribution issues, any of which
could further negatively impact our ability to meet our commitments to customers or increase our operating costs and therefore
incrementally affect our results of operations, financial condition and liquidity.
Due to the nature of our products and services, a product safety failure or other failure affecting our or our customers’ or
suppliers’ products or systems could seriously harm our business. Our products and services are highly sophisticated and
specialized, involve complex advanced technologies, are often integrated with third-party products and services and are utilized for
specific purposes that require precision, reliability and durability. Many of our products and services include both hardware and
software that involve industrial machinery and intricate aviation and defense systems, including commercial and military jet
engines, power and control systems and other aircraft parts, air and missile defense systems, and military sensors and command and
control systems. Technical, mechanical and other failures may occur from time to time, whether as a result of manufacturing or
design defect, operational process or production issue attributable to us, our customers, suppliers, third party integrators or others.
In addition, our products could fail as a result of cyber-attacks, such as those that seize control and result in misuse or unintended
use of our products, or other intentional acts. The impact of a catastrophic product or system failure or similar event affecting our or
our customers’ or suppliers’ products or services could be significant, and could result in injuries
18
Table of Contents
or death, property damage, loss of strategic capabilities, loss of intellectual property, loss of reputation, and other significant
negative effects. A product or system failure could lead to negative publicity, a diversion of management attention and damage to
our reputation that could reduce demand for our products and services. It could also result in product recalls and product liability
and warranty claims (including claims related to the safety or reliability of our products) and related expenses, other service, repair
and maintenance costs, significant damages and other costs, including fines and other remedies and regulatory and environmental
liabilities. We may also incur increased costs, delayed payments, reputational harm or lost equipment or services revenue in
connection with a significant issue with a third party’s product with which our products are integrated. Further, our insurance
coverage may not be adequate to cover all related costs and we may not otherwise be fully indemnified for them. Any of the
foregoing could have a material adverse effect on our competitive position, results of operations, financial condition or liquidity.
We depend on the recruitment and retention of qualified personnel, and our failure to attract, train and retain such personnel
could seriously harm our business. Due to the specialized nature of our business, our future performance is highly dependent upon
the continued services of our key technical personnel and executive officers, and the hiring, development and retention of qualified
technical, engineering, manufacturing, marketing, sales and management personnel for our operations. Our defense business in
particular requires qualified personnel with security clearances due to our classified programs. In addition, we experienced
personnel reductions when the COVID-19 pandemic caused significant declines in demand for our commercial aerospace products
and services, but current demand for our products and services across our businesses has created a significant need for us to hire
additional and replacement personnel. Moreover, a significant percentage of our current workforce is nearing or eligible for
retirement. To the extent that we lose experienced personnel in the future, it is critical that we develop other employees, hire new
qualified personnel and successfully manage the transfer of knowledge.
Current macroeconomic, industry and labor market conditions have exacerbated an already highly competitive market for hiring
and retaining employees with relevant qualifications and experience. There is an ongoing labor shortage, particularly for highly
qualified personnel including engineers, skilled laborers and security clearance holders. Labor market trends also include high
attrition and wage inflation, and some candidates and new personnel may have different expectations from our current workforce.
As a result of the above factors, we have experienced, and expect to continue to experience, significant difficulties in hiring and
retaining personnel with relevant qualifications and experience, which has negatively impacted, and may continue to negatively
impact, our results of operations, financial condition and liquidity.
In addition, certain existing personnel may be required to receive various security clearances and substantial training in order to
work on certain programs or perform certain tasks. Necessary security clearances may be delayed, which may impact our ability to
perform on our U.S. government contracts. We also may not be successful in training or developing qualified personnel with the
requisite relevant skills or security clearances. Loss of key employees, increased attrition for various reasons, failure to adequately
train newly hired employees, delays in receiving required security clearances, or delays in hiring key personnel could also seriously
harm our business.
Moreover, we believe that a critical element of our ability to successfully attract, train and retain qualified personnel is our
corporate culture, which we believe fosters innovation, collaboration, diversity and inclusion, and a focus on execution, all in an
environment of high ethical standards. Our global operations may present challenges in maintaining these important aspects of our
corporate culture, and a failure to maintain our corporate culture could negatively impact us. Further, we rely on our key personnel
to lead with integrity and to meet our high ethical standards that promote excellent performance and cultivate diversity, equity and
inclusion. To the extent any of our key personnel were to behave in a way that is inconsistent with our values, including with
respect to product safety or quality, legal or regulatory compliance, financial reporting or people management, we could experience
a materially adverse impact to our reputation and our operating results. In addition, failure or perceived failure to meet increasing
stakeholder expectations on environmental, social and governance (ESG) matters could harm our reputation and impact demand for
our products and services.
Our business and financial performance may be adversely affected by cyber-attacks on information technology infrastructure
and products. Our business may be impacted by disruptions to our own or third-party information technology (IT) infrastructure,
which could result from, among other causes, cyber-attacks on or failures of such infrastructure or compromises to its physical
security. We also encounter attempts to infiltrate our products and services and sabotage or disable their use by our customers.
Cybersecurity threats are evolving and include, but are not limited to, both attacks on our IT infrastructure and attacks on the IT
infrastructure of our customers, suppliers, subcontractors and other third parties with whom we do business routinely, both on
premises and in the cloud, attempting to gain unauthorized access to our confidential or other proprietary information, classified
information, or information relating to our employees, customers and other third parties, or to disrupt our systems or the systems of
third parties. Cybersecurity threats also include attacks targeting the security, integrity and/or availability of the hardware, software
and information installed, stored or transmitted in our products, including after the purchase of those products and when they are
incorporated into third-party products, facilities or infrastructure. We are also exposed to the risk of insider threat attacks. Any such
attacks could disrupt our systems or those of third parties (including
19
Table of Contents
mission critical systems), impact business operations, result in unauthorized release of confidential or otherwise protected
information, and corrupt our data or that of third parties. We have experienced cyber-based attacks, and due to the evolving threat
landscape, may continue to experience them going forward, potentially with more frequency. The threats we face are continuous
and evolving, and vary from attacks common to most industries to more advanced and persistent, highly organized adversaries,
including nation states, which target us and other defense contractors. We continue to make investments and adopt measures
designed to enhance our protection, detection, response, and recovery capabilities, and to mitigate potential risks to our technology,
products, services and operations from potential cybersecurity threats. However, given the unpredictability, nature and scope of
cyber-attacks, it is possible that we are unable to defend against all cyber attacks, that potential vulnerabilities could go undetected
and persist in the environment for an extended period, or that we may otherwise be unable to mitigate customer losses and other
potential consequences of these attacks. In addition, some products and services that we provide to customers, particularly those
related to public security, may raise potential liabilities related to privacy and intellectual property. In some cases we must rely on
the safeguards put in place by our customers, suppliers, subcontractors and other third parties to protect against and report cyber
threats. We could potentially be subject to production downtimes, operational delays, other detrimental impacts on our operations
or ability to provide products and services to our customers, the compromise of confidential information, intellectual property or
otherwise protected information, misappropriation, destruction or corruption of data, security breaches, other manipulation or
improper use of our or third-party systems, networks or products, financial losses from remedial actions, loss of business, or
potential liability, penalties, fines and/or damage to our reputation. Any of these could have a material adverse effect on our
competitive position, results of operations, financial condition or liquidity. Some of these risks may be heightened due to the
Company and its suppliers and other third parties operating with a significant number of employees working remotely. Due to the
evolving nature of such risks, the impact of any potential incident cannot be predicted. Further, our insurance coverage may not be
adequate to cover all related costs and we may not otherwise be fully indemnified for them.
Exports and imports of certain of our products are subject to various export control, sanctions and import regulations and may
require authorization from regulatory agencies of the U.S. or other countries. We must comply with various laws and regulations
relating to the export and import of products, services and technology from and into the U.S. and other countries having jurisdiction
over our operations. In the U.S., these laws and regulations include, among others, the Export Administration Regulations (EAR)
administered by the U.S. Department of Commerce, the International Traffic in Arms Regulations (ITAR) administered by the U.S.
Department of State, embargoes and sanctions regulations administered by the U.S. Department of the Treasury, and import
regulations administered by the U.S. Department of Homeland Security and the U.S. Department of Justice. Certain of our
products, services and technologies have military or strategic applications and are on the U.S. Munitions List of the ITAR, the
Commerce Control List of the EAR or are otherwise subject to the EAR, and/or the U.S. Munitions Import List and we are required
to obtain licenses and authorizations from the appropriate U.S. government agencies before selling these products outside of the
U.S. or importing these products into the U.S. U.S. foreign policy or foreign policy of other licensing jurisdictions may affect the
licensing process or otherwise prevent us from engaging in business dealings with certain individuals, entities or countries. Any
failure by us, our customers or our suppliers to comply with these laws and regulations could result in civil or criminal penalties,
fines, seizure of our products, adverse publicity, restrictions on our ability to export or import our products, or the suspension or
debarment from doing business with the U.S. government. Moreover, any changes in export control, sanctions or import regulations
may further restrict the export or import of our products or services, and the possibility of such changes requires constant
monitoring to ensure we remain compliant. Our ability to obtain required licenses and authorizations on a timely basis or at all is
subject to risks and uncertainties, including changing U.S. government laws, regulations or foreign policies, delays in
Congressional action, or geopolitical and other factors. If we are not successful in obtaining or maintaining the necessary licenses
or authorizations in a timely manner, our sales relating to those approvals may be prevented or delayed, and revenue and profit
previously recognized may be reversed. Any restrictions on the export or import of our products or product lines could have a
material adverse effect on our competitive position, results of operations, financial condition or liquidity.
Our business and financial performance may be adversely affected by threats to our physical security and other events outside
our control. We could encounter threats to our physical security, including our facilities and personnel, and threats from, workplace
violence, civil unrest, terrorism or similar acts, any of which could disrupt our business. In addition, our business, and the
businesses of our suppliers, subcontractors and service providers and customers, could be disrupted by public health crises, such as
pandemics and epidemics (including the COVID-19 pandemic), damaging weather or other acts of nature, cyber-attacks on IT
infrastructure and products or other events outside of our control. Any such business disruption could subject us to production
downtimes, operational delays, other detrimental impacts on our operations or ability to provide products and services to our
customers, financial losses from remedial actions, the diversion of management’s attention and resources, or loss of business, any
of which could have a material adverse effect on our competitive position, results of operations, financial condition or liquidity. The
impact of any such business disruption is difficult to predict.
20
Table of Contents
We depend on our intellectual property and have access to certain third party intellectual property; infringement or failure to
protect our intellectual property or access to third party intellectual property could adversely affect our future growth and
success. We rely on a combination of patents, trademarks, copyrights, trade secrets, nondisclosure agreements, IT security systems,
internal controls and compliance systems and other measures to protect our intellectual property. We also rely on nondisclosure
agreements, confidentiality obligations in contracts, IT security systems and other measures to protect certain customer and supplier
information and intellectual property that we have in our possession or to which we have access. The U.S. government and foreign
governments have licenses under certain of our intellectual property, including certain patents, which are developed or used in
performance of government contracts. Governments may use or authorize others (including our competitors) to use such patents
and intellectual property for government and other purposes. Governments may challenge the sufficiency of intellectual property
rights we have granted in government contracts and attempt to obtain greater rights, which could reduce our ability to protect our
intellectual property rights and to compete. In some instances, we have augmented our technology base by licensing the proprietary
intellectual property of others. Intellectual property obtained from third parties is also subject to challenge, invalidation,
misappropriation or circumvention by third parties. In addition, we may not be able to obtain necessary licenses on commercially
reasonable terms. In other instances, our ability to procure and perform government contracts requires us to obtain certain rights in
the intellectual property of others through government grants. Governments may deny us the right to obtain such rights in the
intellectual property of others, which may affect our ability to perform government contracts. Moreover, our efforts to protect
intellectual property and proprietary rights may not be sufficient. We cannot be sure that our pending patent applications will result
in the issuance of patents to us, that patents issued to or licensed by us in the past or in the future will not be challenged or
circumvented by competitors, or that these patents will be found to be valid or sufficiently broad to preclude our competitors from
introducing technologies similar to those covered by our patents and patent applications. Our ability to protect and enforce our
intellectual property rights may be limited in certain countries outside the U.S. In addition, we may be the target of competitor or
other third-party patent enforcement actions seeking substantial monetary damages or seeking to prevent our sale and marketing of
certain of our products or services. Our competitive position also may be adversely impacted by limitations on our ability to obtain
possession of, and ownership of necessary licenses concerning, data important to the development or provision of our products or
service offerings, or by limitations on our ability to restrict the use by others of data related to our products or services. We may
also be subject to disruptions, losses and liability resulting from various cybersecurity attacks or information technology failures, as
described above. Any of these events or factors could have a material adverse effect on our competitive position, subject us to
judgments, penalties and significant litigation costs, or temporarily or permanently disrupt our sales and marketing of the affected
products or services. Any of the foregoing could have a material adverse effect on our competitive position, results of operations,
financial condition or liquidity.
LEGAL, ENVIRONMENTAL AND REGULATORY RISKS
As a U.S. government contractor, we are subject to risks relating to U.S. government audits, investigations, and disputes. We are
subject to U.S. government investigations relating to our U.S. government contracts. Such U.S. government investigations often
take years to complete and could result in administrative, civil or criminal liabilities, including repayments, fines, treble and other
damages, forfeitures, restitution or penalties, or could lead to suspension or debarment of U.S. government contracting or of export
privileges. For instance, if we or one of our business units were charged with wrongdoing in connection with a U.S. government
investigation (including fraud, or violation of certain environmental or export laws, as further described below), the U.S.
government could suspend us from bidding on or receiving awards of new U.S. government contracts pending the completion of
legal proceedings. If convicted or found liable, the U.S. government could fine and debar us from new U.S. government contracting
for a period generally not to exceed three years and could void any contracts found to be tainted by fraud. We also could suffer
reputational harm if allegations of impropriety were made against us, even if such allegations are later determined to be
unsubstantiated. Further, our U.S. government contracts are subject to audit and we have received audit reports recommending the
reduction of certain contract prices because, for example, cost or pricing data disclosures or cost accounting practices used to price
and negotiate those contracts may not have conformed to government regulations. Some of these audit reports recommend that
certain payments be repaid, delayed, or withheld, and may involve substantial amounts, which could, if the audit reports’ theories
were to prevail in litigation, also have future impacts such as increasing the costs absorbed by our commercial businesses. We have
made voluntary refunds in those cases we believe appropriate, have settled some allegations and, in some cases, continue to
negotiate and/or litigate. We may be, and have been, required to make significant payments into escrow of disputed liabilities while
the related litigation is pending. If the litigation is resolved in our favor, any such payments will be returned to us with interest. The
Defense Contract Audit Agency (DCAA) and the Defense Contract Management Agency (DCMA) also review the adequacy of and
our compliance with our internal control systems and policies, including our accounting, purchasing, government property,
estimating, earned value management and material management accounting systems. Our final allowable incurred costs for each
year are subject to audit and have from time to time resulted in disputes between us and the U.S. government, including DCMA
claims to recover payments for alleged noncompliance with cost accounting standards. In some cases, the Department of Justice
(DOJ) has convened grand juries to
21
Table of Contents
investigate possible irregularities in our costs. Any costs found to be improperly allocated to a specific contract will not be
reimbursed by the U.S. government or must be refunded by us to the U.S. government if already reimbursed. An adverse outcome
of any audit or investigation could result in civil and criminal penalties and fines, which could negatively impact our results of
operations, financial condition and liquidity. In addition, if allegations of impropriety were made against us, we could suffer serious
reputational harm, which could negatively affect our financial position, results of operations and liquidity.
We are subject to litigation, environmental, anti-corruption and other legal and compliance risks. We are subject to a variety of
litigation and legal compliance risks. These risks relate to, among other things, product safety and reliability, personal injuries,
intellectual property rights, contract-related claims, government contracts, taxes, environmental matters, export control,
employment matters, competition laws and laws governing improper business practices. We or one of our businesses could be
charged with wrongdoing as a result of such matters. If convicted or found liable, we could be subject to significant fines, penalties,
repayments, or other damages (in certain cases, treble damages). Product recalls and product liability and warranty claims can
result in significant damages and costs, including fines as well as other harm to our business as discussed above. As a global
business, we are subject to complex laws and regulations in the U.S. and in other countries in which we operate. Those laws and
regulations may be interpreted in different ways. They may also change from time to time, as may related interpretations and other
guidance. Changes in laws or regulations could result in higher expenses. Uncertainty relating to laws or regulations may also
affect how we conduct our operations and structure our investments and could limit our ability to enforce our rights.
We use hazardous substances and generate hazardous wastes in our operations. As a result, we are subject to potentially material
liabilities related to personal injuries or property damage that may be caused by hazardous substance releases and exposures.
Personal injury lawsuits may involve individual and purported class actions alleging that contaminants originating from our current
or former products or operating facilities caused or contributed to medical conditions, including cancers incurred by employees,
former employees, third-parties’ employees or residents in the area, and environmental damage or diminution of real estate values.
For example, we are investigating and remediating contamination related to past practices at a number of properties and, in some
cases, have been named as a defendant in related “toxic tort” claims. We are also subject to laws and regulations that: (1) impose
requirements for the proper management, treatment, storage and disposal of hazardous substances and wastes; (2) restrict air and
water emissions from our operations (including U.S. government-owned facilities we manage); and (3) require maintenance of a
safe workplace. These laws and regulations can lead to substantial fines and criminal sanctions for violations, and may require the
installation of costly equipment or operational changes to limit pollution emissions, decrease the likelihood of accidental hazardous
substance releases, and/or reduce the risks of injury to people. We incur, and expect to continue to incur, capital and other
expenditures to comply with these laws and regulations. A criminal violation of certain U.S. environmental statutes such as the
Clean Air Act and Clean Water Act could result in suspension, debarment or disqualification by the U.S. Environmental Protection
Agency (EPA). A facility determined to be in violation of the criminal provisions of these statutes can be prohibited from
performing any U.S. government contract work until the violation has been corrected and the EPA approves the reinstatement of the
facility. Even in litigation where we believe our liability is remote, there is a risk that a negative finding or decision in a matter
involving multiple plaintiffs or a purported class action could have a material adverse effect on our competitive position, results of
operations, financial condition or liquidity, in particular with respect to environmental claims in regions where we have, or
previously had, significant operations. In addition, new laws, regulations, or governmental policies, sudden changes in the
interpretation and enforcement of existing laws and regulations, the discovery of previously unknown contamination, or the
imposition of new clean-up standards could require us to incur additional costs in the future that would have a negative effect on
our results of operations, financial condition and liquidity.
In addition, the FCPA and other anti-bribery and -corruption laws generally prohibit companies and their intermediaries from
making improper payments to U.S. and non-U.S. officials for the purpose of obtaining or retaining business. These laws apply to
companies, individual directors, officers, employees and agents. U.S. companies also may be held liable for actions taken by
strategic or local partners or representatives. The FCPA also imposes accounting standards and requirements on publicly traded
U.S. corporations and their foreign affiliates, which are intended to prevent the diversion of corporate funds to the payment of
bribes and other improper payments. Certain of our customer relationships outside of the U.S. are with governmental entities and
are, therefore, subject to the FCPA and other anti-bribery and -corruption laws, including the anti-bribery and -corruption laws of
non-U.S. countries. Our policies mandate compliance with these anti-bribery and -corruption laws. Despite meaningful measures
that we undertake to ensure lawful conduct, which include training and internal control policies, these measures may not always
prevent violations of the FCPA or similar laws. We have been subject to regulatory investigations for alleged violations of anti-
bribery and -corruption laws, and could be subject to such investigations in the future, which could result in criminal and civil
penalties, disgorgement, further changes or enhancements to our procedures, policies and controls, personnel changes or other
remedial actions. Violations of these laws, or allegations of such violations, could disrupt our operations, cause reputational harm,
involve significant management attention and result in a material adverse effect on our competitive position, results of operations,
financial condition or liquidity.
22
Table of Contents
Cybersecurity and data security and protection laws and regulations are evolving and present increasing compliance challenges,
which may increase our costs, affect our competitiveness, cause reputational harm, and expose us to substantial fines or other
penalties.
Our business and financial performance may be adversely affected by climate change, including changes in regulations,
customer demand, technologies and extreme weather. Our business may be impacted by climate change and governmental and
industry actions taken in response, which present short, medium and long-term risks to our business and financial condition.
Changes in environmental and climate-related laws or regulations, including regulations on greenhouse gas emissions, carbon
pricing, energy taxes, product efficiency standards, mandatory disclosure obligations and U.S. government procurement
requirements, could increase our operational and compliance expenditures and those of our suppliers, including increased energy
and raw materials costs and costs associated with manufacturing changes, and lead to new or additional investments in product
designs and facility upgrades. In addition, we continue to see ever-increasing demands for offerings focused on addressing climate
change, transitioning to lower emission technologies, including low to no carbon products and services, the use of alternative
energy sources and other sustainable aviation technologies, and climate adaptation products and services. Customers, shareholders
and institutional investors continue to increase their focus on ESG, including our environmental sustainability practices and
commitments with respect to our operations, products and suppliers. As a result, we anticipate that we will need to make additional
investments in new technologies and capabilities and devote additional management and other resources in response to the
foregoing. We may not realize, on a timely basis or at all, the anticipated benefits of these investments and actions for a variety of
reasons, including technological challenges, evolving government and customer requirements and our ability to anticipate them and
develop in-demand technologies on a timely basis, and other risks related to the development of advanced technologies described
above. In addition, certain technologies will be dependent upon government action, such as investments in infrastructure, creating
appropriate market incentives and making certain raw materials available for development of certain technologies. Moreover, we
rely on our suppliers to timely and effectively adapt and meet our evolving technological supply needs, and they may be unable to
fully respond to our requirements in a timely manner or at all. We also face competition risks as our competitors also respond to
advancing sustainable technologies. Our competitors may develop these in-demand technologies before we do, their new
technologies may be deemed by our customers to be superior to technologies we may develop, and their technologies may
otherwise gain industry acceptance in advance of or instead of our products. In addition, as we and our competitors develop
increasingly sustainable technologies, demand for our older offerings may decrease or become nonexistent. Our reputation may
also be damaged if we or our industry fail, or are perceived to fail, to achieve sustainability goals or commitments or to comply
with evolving climate-related regulations. In addition, climate-related litigation and government investigations could be
commenced against us, could be costly to defend and could adversely affect our business. Moreover, our business, the businesses of
our suppliers, subcontractors, service providers, distributors and customers, and the industries in which we operate could be
negatively impacted by increasing frequency and severity of acute extreme weather events caused by climate change, including
hurricanes, tornadoes, floods, snow and ice storms, fires, heat waves, and mud slides, and by chronic changes in weather patterns,
such as temperature increases, drought and sea level rise. These events could damage our and our suppliers’ facilities, products and
other assets, and cause disruptions to our business and operations, supply chain and distribution networks, and the businesses of our
customers, and require an increase in expenditures to improve climate resiliency of our operations. Any of the foregoing could
materially decrease our revenues and materially increase our costs and expenses.
FINANCIAL, TAX AND INSURANCE RELATED RISKS
We use estimates in accounting for many of our programs, and changes in our estimates could adversely affect our future
financial results. Accounting for long-term contracts and related assets requires estimates and judgments related to our progress
toward completion and the long-term performance on the contract. Significant judgments include potential risks associated with the
ability and cost to achieve program schedule, including customer-directed delays or reductions in scheduled deliveries, and
technical and other specific contract requirements including customer activity levels and variable consideration based upon that
activity. Due to the nature of the work required to be performed on many of our performance obligations, the estimation of total
revenues and cost at completion is complex and subject to many variables. Management must make assumptions and estimates
regarding contract revenue and cost (such as estimates of variable consideration, including award fees and penalties), including
with respect to: (1) labor productivity and availability; (2) the complexity and scope of the work to be performed; (3) the
availability and cost of materials; (4) the length of time to complete the performance obligation; (5) execution by our
subcontractors; (6) the availability and timing of funding from our customer; (7) overhead cost rates; and (8) current and past
service cost and frequency driven by estimated aircraft and engine utilization and estimated useful lives of components, among
other variables. Cost estimates may also include the estimated cost of satisfying our industrial cooperation agreements, sometimes
in the form of either offset obligations or ICIP agreements, required under certain contracts. Because of the significance of
management’s judgments and estimation processes described above, it is likely that materially different amounts could be recorded
if we used different assumptions or if the underlying circumstances were to change. Changes in
23
Table of Contents
underlying assumptions, circumstances or estimates may adversely affect our future results of operations and financial condition.
Significant changes in key estimates and assumptions with respect to our retirement plans, such as discount rate, expected
return on plan assets (EROA), and other actuarial factors, could affect our future earnings, equity and pension contributions.
We must determine our pension and other postretirement benefit plans’ expense or income, which involves significant judgment
particularly with respect to our discount rate, EROA and other actuarial assumptions. These assumptions are evaluated annually at
December 31 and when significant events require a mid-year remeasurement. They may change significantly due to changes in
economic, legislative, regulatory, and/or demographic experience or circumstances. Changes in our assumptions or actual
experience that differs from these assumptions could impact our pension and postretirement net periodic benefit (income) expense,
the plans’ funded status, and/or the required cash contributions to such plans, which could negatively impact our results of
operations, financial condition or liquidity. Our plan assets are invested in accordance with our investment management objectives
and are subject to market volatility and other conditions.
Additional tax expense or exposures could affect our future profitability. We are subject to income taxes in the United States and
international jurisdictions. Significant judgment is required in determining our worldwide provision for income taxes. In the
ordinary course of our business, there are transactions and calculations where the ultimate tax determination is uncertain. Changes
in tax laws and regulations, as well as changes and conflicts in related interpretations and other tax guidance, and fluctuations in
taxable income could materially impact our tax receivables and liabilities and our deferred tax assets and deferred tax liabilities, as
well as our income tax expense and tax payments. Additionally, in the ordinary course of business, we are subject to examinations
by various tax authorities. In addition to ongoing examinations, there could be additional examinations launched in the future by
governmental authorities in various jurisdictions, and existing examinations could be expanded. The final determination of tax
audits and any related litigation could be materially different from our historical income tax provisions and accruals. Additionally,
changes in the geographic mix of our sales could impact our tax liabilities and affect our income tax expense and profitability. The
global and diverse nature of our operations means that these risks will continue to exist and additional examinations, proceedings
and contingencies will arise from time to time. Our competitive position, results of operation, financial condition or liquidity may
be affected by the outcome of examinations, proceedings and other contingencies that cannot be predicted with certainty.
Goodwill and other intangible assets represent a significant portion of our assets, and any impairment of these assets could
negatively impact our results of operations and financial condition. A significant portion of our assets consists of goodwill and
other intangible assets, primarily recorded as the result of historical acquisitions or investments in businesses. We may subsequently
experience unforeseen events that could adversely affect the value of our goodwill or intangible assets. Our goodwill and
indefinite-lived intangible assets are subject to an impairment test annually and are also tested for impairment whenever facts and
circumstances indicate that goodwill or indefinite-lived intangible assets may be impaired. In the event of an impairment, any
excess of the carrying value of these assets over the fair value must be written off in the period of determination. Finite-lived
intangible assets are generally amortized over the useful life of such assets. Future determinations of significant impairments of
goodwill or indefinite-lived intangible assets as a result of an impairment test or accelerated amortization of finite-lived intangible
assets could have a negative impact on our results of operations and financial condition.
We may be unable to obtain debt at competitive rates, on commercially reasonable terms or in sufficient amounts. We depend, in
part, upon the issuance of debt to fund our business requirements. If we require additional funding in order to meet our business
requirements, a number of factors could cause us to incur increased borrowing costs and to have greater difficulty accessing public
and private markets for debt. These factors include disruptions or declines in the global capital markets and/or a decline in our
financial performance, outlook or credit ratings. The occurrence of any or all of these events may adversely affect our ability to
fund our business requirements.
Quarterly cash dividends and share repurchases are subject to uncertainties and may affect our common stock price. Quarterly
cash dividends and share repurchases under our share repurchase program generally constitute components of our capital allocation
strategy, which we fund through a combination of operating free cash flow, borrowings and proceeds from divestitures. However,
we are not required to declare dividends or make any share repurchases under our share repurchase program. Dividends and share
repurchases may be discontinued, accelerated, suspended or delayed at any time without prior notice. Even if not discontinued, the
amount of such dividends and repurchases may be changed, and the amount, timing and frequency of such dividends and
repurchases may vary from historical practice or from the company’s stated expectations. Decisions with respect to dividends and
share repurchases are subject to the discretion of our Board of Directors and are based on a variety of factors. Important factors that
could cause us to discontinue, limit, suspend, increase or delay our quarterly cash dividends or share repurchases include market
conditions, the price of our common stock, the nature and timing of other investment opportunities, changes in our business
strategy, the terms of our financing arrangements, our outlook as to the ability to obtain financing at attractive rates, the impact on
our credit ratings, the availability of domestic cash and overall business expectations. The reduction or elimination of our cash
dividend, or suspension or elimination of our share repurchase
24
Table of Contents
program could adversely affect the market price of our common stock. Additionally, there can be no assurance that any share
repurchases will enhance shareowner value because the market price of our common stock may decline below the levels at which
we repurchased shares of common stock, and short-term stock price fluctuations could reduce the program’s effectiveness.
We face certain significant risk exposures and potential liabilities that may not be adequately covered by indemnity or
insurance. A significant portion of our business relates to designing, developing and manufacturing advanced aerospace, defense
and technology systems and products. New technologies may be untested or unproven. In addition, we may incur significant
liabilities that are unique to our products and services. In some, but not all, circumstances, we may be entitled to indemnification
from our customers through contractual provisions, and we may obtain limitations of liability and additional defenses for various
reasons including the qualification of our products and services by the Department of Homeland Security (DHS) under the
SAFETY Act provisions of the Homeland Security Act of 2002. The insurance coverage we maintain or indemnification to which
we may be contractually or otherwise entitled may not be adequate to cover all claims or liabilities. Accordingly, we may be forced
to bear substantial costs resulting from risks and uncertainties of our business, which would negatively impact our results of
operations, financial condition and liquidity. Any accident, failure of, or defect in our products and services, even if fully
indemnified or insured, could negatively affect our reputation among our customers and the public, and make it more difficult for
us to compete effectively. It could also affect the cost and availability of insurance in the future.
STRATEGIC INITIATIVE AND TRANSACTION RISKS
We may be unable to realize expected benefits from strategic initiatives. In order to operate more effectively and efficiently, from
time to time we undertake strategic and other operational initiatives. For example, we are undergoing a significant, multi-year
digital transformation initiative to improve our business and reduce costs. Under this initiative, we are leveraging digital
capabilities throughout the way in which we conduct our business and provide our products and services to customers, including
how we design, build and maintain our products and services. We also continue to engage our Customer Oriented Results
Excellence (CORE) operating system to drive continuing improvement into our processes and facilities. In addition, we continue to
invest in structural cost reduction in our facilities, including aligning work to more efficient manufacturing centers, implementing
advanced manufacturing capabilities including automation, and closing facilities that are not required to meet future capacity and
work needs. Other initiatives include the pursuit of advanced technologies and new business acquisitions and subsequent
integrations. We also implement restructuring plans from time to time. For example, we recently announced our plans to reorganize
our current business segment structure from four to three business segments in the second half of 2023. Restructuring activities
include or may result in workforce reductions, global facility reductions, procurement cost reduction activities, legal entity and
operational reorganizations and other cost reduction initiatives. These strategic activities are complex and require the investment of
resources including in personnel and systems. If we do not successfully manage our current or future strategic initiatives, expected
efficiencies and benefits might be delayed or not realized, and our operations and business could be disrupted. In addition, certain
U.S. government contracts and programs have begun to require digital engineering and other digital capabilities, and our inability
to achieve these capabilities with respect to these programs timely may result in loss of revenues. Risks associated with workforce
management issues include unfavorable political responses to such actions, unforeseen delays in the implementation of anticipated
workforce reductions, additional unexpected costs, adverse effects on employee morale and the failure to meet operational targets
due to the loss of employees or work stoppages. Any of the above factors may impair our ability to achieve anticipated benefits, or
otherwise harm our business, or have a material adverse effect on our competitive position, results of operations, financial
condition or liquidity.
We may be unable to successfully complete the integration of the legacy businesses of United Technologies Corporation (UTC)
and Raytheon Company and realize the anticipated benefits of the Raytheon merger. The ultimate success of the Raytheon
merger continues to depend, in part, on our ability to successfully combine and integrate UTC and Raytheon Company’s legacy
businesses, and realize the anticipated benefits, including synergies, cost savings, innovation and technological opportunities
(including technology-driven revenue synergies) and operational efficiencies from the Raytheon merger in a manner that does not
materially disrupt existing customer, supplier and employee relations and does not result in decreased revenues due to losses of, or
decreases in orders by, customers. We continue to be exposed to risks associated with our ability to identify and achieve revenue
synergy opportunities among the legacy businesses. In addition, we may be unable to consolidate all of the corporate and
administrative infrastructures and eliminate all of the duplicative operations which we intend, and continue to be at risk for
unanticipated issues in integrating information technology, communications and other systems. Any one of these challenges could
result in delays, increased costs, decreases in the amount of expected revenues, reduced expected cash generation, and diversion of
management’s time and energy, which could materially affect our financial condition, results of operations and liquidity.
If we fail to manage potential future acquisitions, investments, divestitures, joint ventures and other transactions successfully,
these activities could adversely affect our future financial results. In pursuing our business strategies, we continually review,
evaluate and consider potential investments, acquisitions, divestitures, joint ventures and other teaming and
25
Table of Contents
collaborative arrangements. We undertake to identify opportunities that will complement our existing products and services or
customer base, as well as expand our offerings and business opportunities into new areas that naturally extend from our core
capabilities. In evaluating such transactions, we are required to make difficult judgments regarding the value of business
opportunities, technologies and other assets, and the risks and cost of potential liabilities. Further, these transactions involve certain
other risks and uncertainties including: (1) the risks involved with entering new markets; (2) the difficulty in integrating newly-
acquired businesses and managing or monitoring other collaborative business arrangements; (3) the complexity of separating a
portion of our business to enable a divestiture; (4) challenges and failures in achieving strategic objectives and other expected
benefits, which may result in certain liabilities to us for guarantees and other commitments; (5) unidentified issues not discovered
in RTC’s due diligence; (6) the diversion of our attention and resources from our operations and other initiatives; (7) the potential
impairment of acquired assets; (8) the performance of underlying products, capabilities or technologies; and (9) the potential loss of
key employees and customers of acquired businesses. In addition, future transactions may impact our deployment of capital,
including dividends, stock repurchases, pension contributions, and investments.
If either distribution of the stock of Carrier or Otis, together with certain related transactions, were to fail to qualify as a
transaction that is generally tax-free, including as a result of subsequent acquisitions of our stock (including pursuant to the
Raytheon merger), we could be subject to significant tax liabilities. On April 3, 2020, UTC completed the Separation
Transactions. UTC distributed all of the outstanding shares of Carrier common stock and all of the outstanding shares of Otis
common stock to UTC shareowners who held shares of UTC common stock as of the close of business on March 19, 2020, the
record date for the distributions (the Distributions) effective at 12:01 a.m., Eastern Time, on April 3, 2020.We received (1) a private
letter ruling from the Internal Revenue Service (IRS) regarding certain U.S. federal income tax matters relating to the Separation
Transactions and Distributions and (2) an opinion of outside counsel regarding the qualification of certain elements of the
Distributions under Section 355 of the Code. Although we intend for the Distributions generally to be tax-free for U.S. federal
income tax purposes, there can be no assurance that they will so qualify. Even if the Distributions were to otherwise qualify as tax-
free transactions under Sections 355 and 368(a)(1)(D) of the Code, either Distribution or both Distributions may result in taxable
gain to us (but not our stockholders) under Section 355(e) of the Code if such Distribution(s) were deemed to be part of a plan (or
series of related transactions) pursuant to which one or more persons acquire, directly or indirectly, shares representing a 50% or
greater interest (by vote or value) in shares of Carrier, Otis, or us, as applicable. If the IRS were to determine that any post-
Distribution acquisitions of Carrier stock, Otis stock, or our stock, as applicable, pursuant to such a plan (when aggregated with any
pre-Distribution acquisitions of Carrier stock, Otis stock, or our stock, as applicable, pursuant to such a plan) would represent a
50% or greater interest in shares of Carrier, Otis, or us, as applicable, such determination could result in significant tax liabilities to
us. For purposes of this test, even if the Raytheon merger were treated as part of such plan, it did not result in an acquisition of a
50% or greater interest in us. Any such tax liabilities imposed on us may adversely affect an investment in us. In addition, we
obtained tax rulings in certain non-U.S. jurisdictions and/or opinions of external tax advisors, in each case, regarding the tax
treatment of certain Separation Transactions. Notwithstanding the receipt of such tax rulings and opinions, there can be no
assurance that the relevant taxing authorities will not assert that the tax treatment of the relevant Separation Transactions differs
from the conclusions reached therein. In the event the relevant taxing authorities prevail with any challenge in respect of any
relevant Separation Transaction, we would be subject to significant tax liabilities, which may adversely affect an investment in us.
Further, under a tax matters agreement that we entered into with Carrier and Otis in connection with the Separation Transactions
and Distributions, each of Carrier and Otis generally is required to indemnify us for certain taxes we may incur resulting from the
Separation Transactions and/or the Distributions failing to qualify for the intended tax treatment. In addition, under the tax matters
agreement, each of Carrier and Otis is responsible for (i) a specified portion of any installment payment we are required to make
pursuant to Section 965(h)(2) of the Code and (ii) specified taxes that exclusively relate to the Carrier business or the Otis business,
as applicable. The amount of any such taxes for which we would be responsible may be significant, and if we were unable to obtain
indemnification payments from Carrier or Otis to which we are entitled under the tax matters agreement and/or other agreements
entered into in connection with the Separation Transactions and the Distributions, we would incur significant losses.
ITEM 1B. UNRESOLVED STAFF COMMENTS
None.
ITEM 2. PROPERTIES
We have significant properties in approximately 25 countries, with approximately 515 significant properties comprising
approximately 75 million square feet of productive space. Approximately 30% of our square footage related to our significant
properties is leased, and 70% is owned. Approximately 60% of our square footage related to our significant properties is located in
the United States.
26
Table of Contents
Our fixed assets as of December 31, 2022 include manufacturing facilities and non-manufacturing facilities such as warehouses,
laboratories, office space, and a substantial quantity of machinery and equipment, including general purpose machinery and
equipment using special jigs, tools and fixtures and in many instances having automatic control features and special adaptations.
The facilities, warehouses, machinery and equipment in use as of December 31, 2022 are in good operating condition, are well-
maintained and substantially all are generally in regular use.
ITEM 3. LEGAL PROCEEDINGS
We are subject to a number of lawsuits, investigations and claims (some of which involve substantial amounts). For a discussion of
contingencies related to certain legal proceedings, see “Note 18: Commitments and Contingencies” within Item 8 of this Form 10-
K. Except as otherwise noted, while we are unable to predict the final outcome, based on information currently available, we do not
believe that resolution of any of these matters will have a material adverse effect upon our competitive position, results of
operations, financial condition or liquidity.
A further discussion of government contracts and related investigations, as well as a discussion of our environmental liabilities, can
be found under the heading “Other Matters Relating to Our Business – Regulatory matters” within Item 1. “Business” of this Form
10-K and in Item 1A. “Risk Factors” of this Form 10-K.
737 MAX Aircraft Litigation
Multiple lawsuits have been filed in U.S. courts relating to the October 29, 2018 Lion Air Flight 610 and the March 10, 2019
Ethiopian Airlines Flight 302 accidents. Collins Aerospace (Collins) sold certain aircraft parts and systems to The Boeing Company
for the 737 MAX aircraft involved in these accidents. Certain of our Collins businesses have been named, along with other third
parties, as parties in many of these lawsuits. We have also fully supported all governmental investigations and inquiries relating to
the accidents. We do not expect that the lawsuits or governmental investigations or inquiries will have a material adverse effect on
our results of operations, financial condition or liquidity.
ITEM 4. MINE SAFETY DISCLOSURE
Not applicable.
27
Table of Contents
PART II
ITEM 5. MARKET FOR REGISTRANT’S COMMON EQUITY, RELATED STOCKHOLDER MATTERS AND ISSUER
PURCHASES OF EQUITY SECURITIES
Raytheon Technologies’ common stock is listed on the New York Stock Exchange under the ticker symbol “RTX.” There were
41,554 registered shareowners at December 31, 2022. The information required by Item 5 with respect to securities authorized for
issuance under equity compensation plans is contained within Item 12 of this Form 10-K.
Stock Performance Graph
The following graph presents the cumulative total shareowner return for the five years ending December 31, 2022 for our common
stock as compared to the Standard & Poor’s 500 Stock Index and the S&P Aerospace & Defense (A&D) Index. These figures
assume that all dividends paid over the five-year period were reinvested, and that the starting value of each index and the
investment in common stock was $100.00 on December 31, 2017.
Comparison of Cumulative Five Year Total Return
Annual Return Percentage
Years Ending
Company/Index 12/31/2018 12/31/2019 12/31/2020 12/31/2021 12/31/2022
Raytheon Technologies Common Stock (14.66) 43.82 (16.73) 23.27 20.01 
S&P 500 Index (4.38) 31.49 18.40 28.71 (18.11)
S&P Aerospace & Defense Index (8.07) 30.33 (16.06) 13.22 17.37 
Indexed Returns
Years Ending
Company/IndexBase Period
12/31/2017 12/31/2018 12/31/2019 12/31/2020 12/31/2021 12/31/2022
Raytheon Technologies Common Stock$ 100.00 $ 85.34 $ 122.74 $ 102.21 $ 125.99 $ 151.21 
S&P 500 Index 100.00 95.62 125.72 148.85 191.58 156.88 
S&P Aerospace & Defense Index 100.00 91.93 119.81 100.56 113.86 133.64 
28
Table of Contents
Issuer Purchases of Equity Securities
The following table provides information about our purchases during the quarter ended December 31, 2022 of equity securities that
are registered by us pursuant to Section 12 of the Exchange Act.
2022Total Number of
Shares Purchased
(000’s)Average Price Paid per
ShareTotal Number of Shares
Purchased as Part of a
Publicly Announced
Program
(000’s)Approximate Dollar
Value of Shares that
May Yet Be Purchased
Under the Program
(dollars in millions)
October 1 - October 31 2,134 $ 85.81 2,134 $ 3,363 
November 1 - November 30 1,244 95.87 1,244 3,244 
December 1 - December 31 869 99.59 869 5,968 
Total 4,247 $ 91.58 4,247 
On December 12, 2022, our Board of Directors authorized a share repurchase program for up to $6 billion of our common stock,
replacing the previous program announced on December 7, 2021. Under the 2022 program, shares may be purchased on the open
market, in privately negotiated transactions, under accelerated share repurchase programs, and under plans complying with Rules
10b5-1 and 10b-18 under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended. We may also reacquire shares outside of the program
from time to time in connection with the surrender of shares to cover taxes on vesting of restricted stock and as required under our
employee savings plan. Our ability to repurchase shares is subject to applicable law. No shares were reacquired in transactions
outside the program during the quarter ended December 31, 2022.
ITEM 6.
Reserved.
29
Table of Contents
ITEM 7. MANAGEMENT’S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS OF FINANCIAL CONDITION AND RESULTS OF
OPERATIONS
The following Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations (MD&A) is intended to
provide information to the reader in understanding our consolidated financial statements and notes thereto included in Item 8.
Financial Statements and Supplementary Data of this Form 10-K, the changes in certain key items in those financial statements
between select periods and the primary factors that accounted for those changes. In addition, we discuss certain accounting
principles, policies and critical estimates that affect our financial statements. Our discussion also contains some additional context
regarding our business, including industry considerations and the business environment, as well as certain forward-looking
statements related to future events and expectations. This MD&A should be read in conjunction with the other sections of this Form
10-K, including Item 1A. “Risk Factors.”
BUSINESS OVERVIEW
We are a global premier systems provider of high technology products and services to the aerospace and defense industries. We
operate in four principal business segments: Collins Aerospace (Collins), Pratt & Whitney, Raytheon Intelligence & Space (RIS)
and Raytheon Missiles & Defense (RMD). The Company recently announced its intention to streamline the structure of its core
businesses into three principal business segments: Collins Aerospace, Pratt & Whitney and Raytheon. The Company plans to
determine the exact composition of each segment and implement the reorganization in the second half of 2023. All segment
information included in this Form 10-K is reflective of the existing four segments of Collins, Pratt & Whitney, RIS and RMD in
accordance with the management structure in place as of December 31, 2022. Unless the context otherwise requires, the terms
“we,” “our,” “us,” “the Company,” “Raytheon Technologies,” and “RTC” mean Raytheon Technologies Corporation and its
subsidiaries.
Industry Considerations
Our worldwide operations can be affected by industrial, economic and political factors on both a regional and global level. Our
operations include original equipment manufacturer (OEM) and extensive related aftermarket parts and services related to our
aerospace operations. Our defense business serves both domestic and international customers primarily as a prime contractor or
subcontractor on a broad portfolio of defense and related programs for government customers. Our business mix also reflects the
combination of shorter cycles in our commercial aerospace spares contracts and certain service contracts in our defense business
primarily at RIS, and longer cycles in our aerospace OEM and aftermarket maintenance contracts and on our defense contracts to
design, develop, manufacture or modify complex equipment. Our customers are in the public and private sectors, and our
businesses reflect an extensive geographic diversification that has evolved with continued globalization.
Collins and Pratt & Whitney serve both commercial and government aerospace customers. Revenue passenger miles (RPMs),
available seat miles and the general economic health of airline carriers are key barometers for our commercial aerospace
operations. Performance in the general aviation sector is closely tied to the overall health of the economy and is positively
correlated to corporate profits. Many of our aerospace customers are covered under long-term aftermarket service agreements at
both Collins and Pratt & Whitney, which are inclusive of both spare parts and services.
RIS, RMD, and the defense operations of Collins and Pratt & Whitney are affected by U.S. Department of Defense (DoD) budget
and spending levels, changes in demand, changes in policy positions or priorities, the domestic and global political environment
and the evolving nature of the global and national security threat environment. In addition, our defense businesses engage in both
direct commercial sales, which generally require U.S. government licenses and approvals, as well as foreign military sales, which
are government-to-government transactions initiated by, and carried out at the direction of, the U.S. government. Changes in these
budget and spending levels, policies, or priorities, which are subject to U.S. domestic and foreign geopolitical risks and threats,
may impact our defense businesses, including the timing of and delays in U.S. government licenses and approvals for sales, the risk
of sanctions or other restrictions.
Government legislation, policies and regulations can impact our business and operations. Changes in environmental and climate
change laws or regulations, including regulations on greenhouse gas emissions, carbon pricing, and energy taxes, could lead to new
or additional investment in product designs and facility upgrades and could increase our operational and environmental compliance
expenditures, including increased energy and raw materials costs and costs associated with manufacturing changes. In addition,
government and industry-driven safety and performance regulations, restrictions on aircraft engine noise and emissions,
government-imposed travel restrictions and limitations, and government procurement practices can impact our businesses.
Business Environment
Global economic and political conditions, changes in raw material and commodity prices and supply, labor availability and costs,
inflation, interest rates, international and domestic tax law changes, foreign currency exchange rates, energy costs and
30
Table of Contents
supply, levels of air travel, the financial condition of commercial airlines, and the impact from natural disasters and weather
conditions create uncertainties that could impact our businesses.
Global Supply Chain and Labor Markets. Global supply chain and labor markets are continuing to experience high levels of
disruption, causing significant materials and parts shortages, including raw material, microelectronics and commodity shortages, as
well as delivery delays, labor shortages, distribution problems and price increases. Current geopolitical conditions, including
sanctions and other trade restrictive activities and strained intercountry relations, are contributing to these issues. We have had
difficulties procuring necessary materials, including raw materials, components and other supplies, and services on a timely basis or
at all. We have also had difficulties hiring qualified personnel, particularly personnel with specialized engineering experience and
security clearances. Our suppliers and subcontractors have been impacted by the same issues, as well as ongoing pandemic-related
issues, compounding the shortages for us because we rely on them, sometimes as sole-source providers. In addition, as the ongoing
recovery in commercial air travel continues, the anticipated increase in new aircraft deliveries and increased demand for our
products and services will add to these supply chain and labor market challenges.
We work continuously to mitigate the effects of these supply chain and labor constraints through targeted activities and ongoing
programs. We work with our suppliers and subcontractors to assist in mitigation, arrange supply source alternatives, increase our
inventory of available materials and parts, and regularly pursue cost reductions through a number of mechanisms. We also
continuously monitor labor market conditions and trends and work to mitigate constraints through talent acquisition, partnership,
sourcing and recruiting arrangements, workforce succession planning, and initiatives to attract, retain and rehire former employees.
Coronavirus Disease 2019 (COVID-19) Pandemic. The COVID-19 pandemic continues to negatively affect the global economy,
our business and operations, the labor market, supply chains, inflation, and the industries in which we operate, although we
continue to see signs of ongoing recovery in commercial air travel. While we believe that the long-term outlook for the aerospace
industry remains positive due to the fundamental drivers of air travel demand, uncertainty continues with respect to when
commercial air traffic capacity will fully return to and/or exceed pre-COVID-19 levels. The pace of the commercial aerospace
recovery is tied to general economic conditions and may be impacted by inflation, an economic downturn, or government budget
deficits, among other factors, and may also be impacted by a resurgence of the pandemic and corresponding travel restrictions and
protocols. Our expectations regarding the COVID-19 pandemic and ongoing recovery and their potential financial impact are based
on available information and assumptions that we believe are reasonable at this time; however, the actual financial impact is highly
uncertain and subject to a wide range of factors and future developments.
Geopolitical Matters. In response to the Russian military’s invasion of Ukraine on February 24, 2022, the U.S. government and
the governments of various jurisdictions in which we operate, including Canada, the United Kingdom, the European Union, and
others, have imposed broad economic sanctions and export controls targeting specific industries, entities and individuals in Russia.
The Russian government has implemented similar counter-sanctions and export controls targeting specific industries, entities and
individuals in the U.S. and other jurisdictions in which we operate, including certain members of the Company’s management team
and Board of Directors. These government measures, among other limitations, restrict transactions involving various Russian banks
and financial institutions and impose enhanced export controls limiting transfers of various goods, software and technologies to and
from Russia, including broadened export controls specifically targeting the aerospace sector. These measures have adversely
affected, and could continue to adversely affect, the Company and/or our supply chain, business partners or customers. In the
quarter ended March 31, 2022, we reversed $1.3 billion of backlog, which would have been recognized over a span of
approximately 10 years, and recorded certain impairment charges and increases to reserves related to operations at our Pratt &
Whitney and Collins businesses, as discussed further in “Note 1: Basis of Presentation and Summary of Accounting Principles”
within Item 8 of this Form 10-K. These adverse impacts have been mitigated in part by the identification of alternative suppliers
and an increase in the global demand for our products as a result of the current geopolitical environment. Based on information
available to date, we do not currently expect these issues will have a material adverse effect on our financial results.
China previously announced that it may take measures against RTC in connection with certain foreign military sales to Taiwan. In
addition, China has indicated that it decided to sanction our Chairman and Chief Executive Officer Gregory Hayes, in connection
with another potential foreign military sale to Taiwan involving RTC products and services. RTC is not aware of any specific
sanctions against Mr. Hayes or RTC, or the nature or timing of any future potential sanctions or countermeasures. If China were to
impose sanctions or take other regulatory action against RTC, our suppliers, affiliates or partners, it could potentially disrupt our
business operations. The impact of potential sanctions or other actions by China cannot be determined at this time.
We have direct commercial sales contracts for products and services to certain foreign customers, for which U.S. government
review and approval have been pending. The U.S. government’s approval of these sales is subject to a range of factors, including its
foreign policies related to these customers, which are subject to continuing review and potential changes.
31
Table of Contents
Likewise, regulatory approvals previously granted for prior sales can be paused or revoked if the products and services have not yet
been delivered to the customer. If we ultimately do not receive all of the regulatory approvals, or those approvals are revoked, it
could have a material effect on our financial results. In particular, as of December 31, 2022, our Contract liabilities include
approximately $385 million of advance payments received from a Middle East customer on contracts for which we no longer
believe we will be able to execute or obtain required regulatory approvals. These advance payments may become refundable to the
customer if the contracts are ultimately terminated.
See Item 1A. “Risk Factors” within Part I of this Form 10-K for further discussion.
New Legislation. In August 2022, the Creating Helpful Incentives to Produce Semiconductors (CHIPS) and Sciences Act and the
Inflation Reduction Act were signed into law, each effective as of January 1, 2023. These new pieces of legislation include the
implementation of a new corporate alternative minimum tax, an excise tax on stock buybacks, and tax incentives for energy and
climate initiatives, among other provisions. We are evaluating the legislation and currently do not expect the legislation to have a
material impact on our operations, financial condition or liquidity.
FINANCIAL SUMMARY
We use the following key financial performance measures to manage our business on a consolidated basis and by business segment,
and to monitor and assess our results of operations:
•Net Sales: a growth metric that measures our revenue for the current year;
•Operating Profit (Loss): a measure of our profit (loss) for the year, before non-operating expenses, net and income
taxes; and
•Operating Profit (Loss) Margin: a measure of our Operating profit (loss) as a percentage of Total Net Sales.
(dollars in millions) 2022 2021 2020
Total net sales $ 67,074 $ 64,388 $ 56,587 
Operating profit (loss) 5,414 4,958 (1,889)
Operating profit (loss) margins 8.1 % 7.7 % (3.3)%
Operating cash flow from continuing operations $ 7,168 $ 7,142 $ 4,334 
In order to better assess the underlying performance of our business, we also focus on the change in organic net sales on both a
consolidated basis and business segment basis, and the change in organic operating profit (loss) on a business segment basis, which
allows for better year-over-year comparability. See Results of Operations below for our definition of the organic change in Net
sales and Operating profit (loss), which are not defined measures under U.S. Generally Accepted Accounting Principles (GAAP)
and may be calculated differently by other companies.
We also focus on backlog as a key financial performance measure of our forward-looking sales growth. Total backlog was $175
billion and $156 billion as of December 31, 2022 and 2021, respectively. Backlog, which is equivalent to our remaining
performance obligations (RPO) for our sales contracts, represents the aggregate dollar value of firm orders for which products have
not been provided or service has not been performed and excludes unexercised contract options and potential orders under
ordering-type contracts (e.g., indefinite-delivery, indefinite-quantity (IDIQ) type contracts). Backlog generally increases with
bookings and/or orders and generally decreases as sales are recognized on these bookings and is affected by changes in foreign
exchange rates, as well as contract cancellations and terminations, and cost underruns on cost-type contracts.
In addition, we maintain a strong focus on program execution and the prudent management of capital and investments in order to
maximize operating income and cash. We focus on adjusted earnings per share (EPS) and measures to assess our cash generation
and the efficiency and effectiveness of our use of capital, such as free cash flow, both of which are not defined measures under U.S.
GAAP and may be calculated differently by other companies.
Considered together, we believe these metrics are strong indicators of our overall performance and our ability to create shareowner
value. We also use these and other performance metrics for executive compensation purposes.
A discussion of our results of operations and financial condition follows below in Results of Operations, Segment Review, and
Liquidity and Financial Condition.
RESULTS OF OPERATIONS
As described in our “Cautionary Note Concerning Factors That May Affect Future Results” of this Form 10-K, our period-to-period
comparisons of our results, particularly at a segment level, may not be indicative of our future operating results. The following
discussions of comparative results among periods, including the discussion of segment results, should be viewed in this context.
The results of RIS and RMD reflect the period subsequent to the completion of the Raytheon merger on April 3, 2020. As such, the
results of RIS and RMD for the second quarter of 2020 exclude results prior to the date of completion of the
32
Table of Contents
Raytheon merger, the estimated impact of which is approximately $400 million of sales and approximately $45 million of operating
profit. These amounts, in addition to the first quarter of 2021 results, have been excluded from the organic changes for the year
ended December 31, 2021 disclosed throughout our Results of Operations discussion. In addition, as a result of the separation of
United Technologies Corporation’s (UTC’s) business into three independent, publicly traded companies – UTC, Carrier Global
Corporation (Carrier) and Otis Worldwide Corporation (Otis) (the Separation Transactions) and the Distributions, the historical
results of Carrier and Otis are presented as discontinued operations and, as such, have been excluded from both continuing
operations and segment results for all periods presented.
We provide the organic change in Net sales and Cost of sales for our consolidated results of operations as well as the organic
change in Net sales and Operating profit (loss) for our segments. We believe that these non-Generally Accepted Accounting
Principles (non-GAAP) measures are useful to investors because they provide transparency to the underlying performance of our
business, which allows for better year-over-year comparability. The organic change in Net sales, Cost of sales and Operating profit
(loss) excludes Acquisitions and divestitures, net, and the effect of foreign currency exchange rate translation fluctuations and other
significant non-operational items and/or significant operational items that may occur at irregular intervals (Other). Additionally, the
organic change in Cost of sales and Operating profit (loss) excludes restructuring costs, the FAS/CAS operating adjustment and
costs related to certain acquisition accounting adjustments. Restructuring costs generally arise from severance related to workforce
reductions and facility exit costs. We are continuously evaluating our cost structure and have implemented restructuring actions in
an effort to keep our cost structure competitive. Acquisition accounting adjustments include the amortization of acquired intangible
assets related to acquisitions, the amortization of the property, plant and equipment fair value adjustment acquired through
acquisitions, the amortization of customer contractual obligations related to loss making or below market contracts acquired, and
goodwill impairment.
Net Sales
(dollars in millions) 2022 2021 2020
Total net sales $ 67,074 $ 64,388 $ 56,587 
The factors contributing to the total change year-over-year in Total Net Sales are as follows:
(dollars in millions) 2022 2021
Organic $ 3,660 $ 724 
Acquisitions and divestitures, net (676) 6,961 
Other (298) 116 
Total change $ 2,686 $ 7,801 
(1)    See “Results of Operations” for definition of organic. A reconciliation of this measure to reported U.S. GAAP amounts is provided in the table above.
Net sales increased $3.7 billion organically in 2022 compared to 2021 primarily due to higher organic sales of $2.5 billion at Pratt
& Whitney and $2.4 billion at Collins, partially offset by lower organic sales of $0.6 billion at RMD. The $0.7 billion decrease in
net sales related to Acquisitions and divestitures, net in 2022 compared to 2021, was primarily driven by the sale of our global
training and services business within our RIS segment in the fourth quarter of 2021. The decrease in other net sales of $0.3 billion
in 2022 compared to 2021 represents the impact of foreign exchange.
Net sales increased $0.7 billion organically in 2021 compared to 2020 primarily due to higher organic sales of $1.3 billion at Pratt
& Whitney, partially offset by lower organic sales of $0.6 billion at Collins. The $7.0 billion sales increase in Acquisitions and
divestitures, net in 2021 compared to 2020, was primarily driven by the Raytheon merger on April 3, 2020, partially offset by the
sale of the Collins military Global Positioning System (GPS) and space-based precision optics businesses in the third quarter of
2020 and the sale of our Forcepoint business in the first quarter of 2021.
See “Segment Review” below for further information by segment.
% of Total Net Sales
(dollars in millions) 2022 2021 2020 2022 2021 2020
Net sales
Products sales $ 50,773 $ 49,270 $ 43,319 76 % 77 % 77 %
Services sales 16,301 15,118 13,268 24 % 23 % 23 %
Total net sales $ 67,074 $ 64,388 $ 56,587 100 % 100 % 100 %
Refer to “Note 21: Segment Financial Data” within Item 8 of this Form 10-K for the composition of external net sales by products
and services by segment.(1)
33
Table of Contents
Net products sales increased $1.5 billion in 2022 compared to 2021 primarily due to increases in external products sales of
$1.5 billion at Collins and $1.2 billion at Pratt & Whitney, partially offset by decreases in external products sales of $0.7 billion at
RMD and $0.5 billion at RIS. Net services sales increased $1.2 billion in 2022 compared to 2021 primarily due to increases in
external services sales of $1.2 billion at Pratt & Whitney and $0.5 billion at Collins, partially offset by a decrease in external
services sales of $0.5 billion at RIS primarily driven by the sale of the global training and services business in the fourth quarter of
2021.
Net products sales increased $6.0 billion in 2021 compared to 2020 primarily due to an increase in external products sales of
$3.7 billion at RMD and $3.0 billion at RIS, both primarily due to the Raytheon merger on April 3, 2020, and an increase in
external products sales of $1.0 billion at Pratt & Whitney, partially offset by a decrease in external products sales of $1.3 billion at
Collins. Net services sales grew $1.9 billion in 2021 compared to 2020 primarily due to an increase in external services sales of
$0.8 billion at RIS and $0.4 billion at RMD, both primarily due to the Raytheon merger on April 3, 2020, and an increase in
external services sales of $0.4 billion at Pratt & Whitney and $0.3 billion at Collins.
Our sales to major customers were as follows:
% of Total Net Sales
(dollars in millions) 2022 2021 2020 2022 2021 2020
Sales to the U.S. government $30,317 $31,177 $25,962 45 % 48 % 46 %
Foreign military sales through the U.S.
government 5,042 5,546 4,585 8 % 9 % 8 %
Foreign government direct commercial sales 4,327 4,993 3,974 6 % 8 % 7 %
Commercial aerospace and other commercial
sales 27,388 22,672 22,066 41 % 35 % 39 %
Total net sales $67,074 $64,388 $56,587 100 % 100 % 100 %
(1)    Excludes foreign military sales through the U.S. government.
Cost of Sales
(dollars in millions) 2022 2021 2020
Total cost of sales $ 53,406 $ 51,897 $ 48,056 
Percentage of net sales 80 % 81 % 85 %
The factors contributing to the change year-over-year in total Cost of sales are as follows:
(dollars in millions) 2022 2021
Organic $ 2,368 $ (1,293)
Acquisitions and divestitures, net (552) 5,829 
Restructuring 3 (363)
FAS/CAS operating adjustment 234 (643)
Acquisition accounting adjustments (348) 345 
Other (196) (34)
Total change $ 1,509 $ 3,841 
(1)    See “Results of Operations” for definition of organic. A reconciliation of this measure to reported U.S. GAAP amounts is provided in the table above.
The organic increase in total Cost of sales in 2022 compared to 2021 of $2.4 billion was primarily due to the organic sales increases
at Collins and Pratt & Whitney noted above. The decrease related to Acquisitions and divestitures, net of $0.6 billion in 2022
compared to 2021 was primarily driven by the sale of our global training and services business within our RIS segment in the
fourth quarter of 2021. The decrease in other cost of sales of $0.2 billion in 2022 compared to 2021 was primarily driven by the
impact of foreign exchange, partially offset by charges recorded during the first quarter of 2022 at Pratt & Whitney and Collins
related to impairment of customer financing assets for products under lease, inventory reserves, purchase order obligations, and the
impairment of contract fulfillment costs that are no longer recoverable, all due to global sanctions on and export controls with
respect to Russia. See “Note 1: Basis of Presentation and Summary of Accounting Principles” within Item 8 of this Form 10-K for
additional information.
The organic decrease in total Cost of sales in 2021 compared to 2020 of $1.3 billion was primarily due to an organic Cost of sales
decrease at Collins and RMD. The Collins decrease was primarily due to the sales decrease noted above, the benefit of cost
reduction initiatives, and the absence of prior year significant unfavorable adjustments. The RMD decrease was primarily due to the
absence of an unfavorable profit impact of $516 million related to inventory reserves, contract asset impairments and(1)
(1)
34
Table of Contents
recognition of supplier related obligations for certain international contracts as further described in “Segment Review” below.
These decreases in Cost of sales were partially offset by an increase in organic Cost of sales at Pratt & Whitney due to the organic
sales increases noted above. The increase related to Acquisitions and divestitures, net of $5.8 billion in 2021 compared to 2020 was
primarily driven by the Raytheon merger on April 3, 2020, partially offset by the sale of the Collins military GPS and space-based
precision optics businesses in the third quarter of 2020, and the sale of our Forcepoint business in the first quarter of 2021 as further
discussed in “Note 2: Business Acquisitions, Dispositions, Goodwill and Intangible Assets” within Item 8 of this Form 10-K. The
$0.4 billion decrease in Restructuring is primarily due to the absence of 2020 severance and restructuring actions at Pratt &
Whitney and Collins related to the economic environment primarily caused by the COVID-19 pandemic, and ongoing cost
reduction efforts.
For further discussion on FAS/CAS operating adjustment see the “FAS/CAS operating adjustment” subsection under the “Segment
Review” section below. For further discussion on Acquisition accounting adjustments, see the “Acquisition accounting
adjustments” subsection under the “Segment Review” section below.
% of Total Net Sales
(dollars in millions) 2022 2021 2020 2022 2021 2020
Cost of sales
Products $41,927 $41,095 $38,137 63 % 64 % 67 %
Services 11,479 10,802 9,919 17 % 17 % 18 %
Total cost of sales $53,406 $51,897 $48,056 80 % 81 % 85 %
Net products cost of sales increased $0.8 billion in 2022 compared to 2021 primarily due to increases at Collins and Pratt &
Whitney, partially offset by decreases in Acquisition Accounting Adjustments and RIS. The changes at Collins, Pratt & Whitney
and RIS were related to the changes in products sales noted above. Net services cost of sales increased $0.7 billion in 2022
compared to 2021 primarily due to increases in external services cost of sales at Pratt & Whitney and Collins, partially offset by a
decrease in external services sales at RIS, all driven by the services sales changes noted above.
Net products cost of sales increased $3.0 billion in 2021 compared to 2020 primarily due to increases in external products cost of
sales at RIS and RMD principally due to the Raytheon merger on April 3, 2020, and an increase in external products cost of sales at
Pratt & Whitney, principally driven by the products sales increase noted above, partially offset by a decrease in external products
cost of sales at Collins, principally driven by the products sales decrease noted above, the benefit of cost reduction initiatives and
the absence of prior year significant unfavorable adjustments. Net services cost of sales grew $0.9 billion in 2021 compared to 2020
primarily due to an increase in external services cost of sales at RIS and RMD principally due to the Raytheon merger on April 3,
2020.
Research and Development
(dollars in millions) 2022 2021 2020
Company-funded $ 2,711 $ 2,732 $ 2,582 
Percentage of net sales 4.0 % 4.2 % 4.6 %
Customer-funded $ 4,376 $ 4,485 $ 4,111 
Percentage of net sales 6.5 % 7.0 % 7.3 %
(1)    Included in Cost of sales in our Consolidated Statement of Operations.
Research and development spending is subject to the variable nature of program development schedules and, therefore, year-over-
year fluctuations in spending levels are expected.
Company-funded research and development in 2022 was relatively consistent with 2021. The increase in company-funded research
and development of $0.2 billion in 2021 compared to 2020, was primarily driven by $0.2 billion related to the Raytheon merger on
April 3, 2020.
The decrease in customer-funded research and development of $0.1 billion in 2022 compared to 2021, was primarily driven by
lower expenses on various programs at RMD, partially offset by an increase in expenses on the Next Generation Interceptor (NGI)
program at RMD. The increase in customer-funded research and development of $0.4 billion in 2021 compared to 2020, was
primarily driven by $0.6 billion related to the Raytheon merger on April 3, 2020, partially offset by lower expenses of $0.2 billion
on various military and commercial programs at Pratt & Whitney and lower expenses of $0.1 billion at Collins primarily related to
the sale of the military GPS and space-based precision optics businesses in the third quarter of 2020. (1)
35
Table of Contents
Selling, General and Administrative
(dollars in millions) 2022 2021 2020
Selling, general and administrative $ 5,663 $ 5,224 $ 5,540 
Percentage of net sales 8.4 % 8.1 % 9.8 %
Selling, general and administrative expenses increased $0.4 billion in 2022 compared to 2021, primarily driven by higher
information technology-related costs at Corporate, Collins and Pratt & Whitney, and higher combined expenses at Collins and Pratt
& Whitney principally driven by higher employee-related costs and $0.1 billion of charges related to increased estimates for credit
losses due to global sanctions on and export controls with respect to Russia. See “Note 1: Basis of Presentation and Summary of
Accounting Principles” within Item 8 of this Form 10-K for additional information on Russia sanctions.
Selling, general and administrative expenses decreased $0.3 billion in 2021 compared to 2020, primarily driven by the absence of
$0.4 billion of prior year charges related to increased estimates of expected credit losses due to customer bankruptcies and
additional allowances for credit losses at our Pratt & Whitney and Collins segments, lower costs of $0.3 billion due to the sale of
our Forcepoint business in the first quarter of 2021, and lower general and administrative restructuring costs of $0.3 billion
primarily related to 2020 severance and restructuring actions at Collins and Corporate related to the economic environment
primarily caused by the COVID-19 pandemic, the Raytheon merger and ongoing cost reduction efforts, partially offset by an
increase in expenses of $0.4 billion related to the Raytheon merger, and higher employee-related costs.
Other Income, Net
(dollars in millions) 2022 2021 2020
Other income, net $ 120 $ 423 $ 885 
Other income, net includes equity earnings in unconsolidated entities, royalty income, foreign exchange gains and losses, and other
ongoing and nonrecurring items.
The decrease in Other income, net of $0.3 billion in 2022 compared to 2021 was primarily due to the absence of a gain of $269
million on the sale of RIS’s global training and services business in the fourth quarter of 2021, as further discussed in “Note 2:
Business Acquisitions, Dispositions, Goodwill and Intangible Assets” within Item 8 of this Form 10-K, $69 million of charges
associated with the disposition of two non-core businesses at Collins in the second quarter of 2022, a $42 million charge in the
fourth quarter of 2022 associated with a divestiture of a small non-core Naval Power business at RMD, and the absence of prior
year foreign government wage subsidies related to COVID-19 at Pratt & Whitney of $41 million, partially offset by the absence of
an accrual of $147 million in the fourth quarter of 2021 related to the ongoing Department of Justice (DOJ) investigation into
contract pricing matters at RMD.
The decrease in Other income, net of $0.5 billion in 2021 compared to 2020, was primarily due to the absence of $595 million of
gains on the sales of the Collins businesses, in the third quarter of 2020, a decrease of $178 million of foreign government wage
subsidies related to COVID-19 at Pratt & Whitney and Collins and an accrual of $147 million in the fourth quarter of 2021 related
to the ongoing DOJ investigation into contract pricing matters at RMD, partially offset by a gain of $269 million on the sale of
RIS’s global training and services business in the fourth quarter of 2021. The remaining change was spread across multiple items
with no common or significant driver.
Operating Profit (Loss)
(dollars in millions) 2022 2021 2020
Operating profit (loss) $ 5,414$ 4,958$ (1,889)
Operating profit (loss) margin 8.1 % 7.7 % (3.3)%
The increase in Operating profit (loss) of $0.5 billion in 2022 compared to 2021 was primarily driven by a decrease in Acquisition
accounting adjustments, the operating performance at our operating segments and a decrease in Corporate and Eliminations and
other, partially offset by the change in our FAS/CAS operating adjustment, all of which are described below in “Segment Review.”
The change in Operating profit (loss) of $6.8 billion in 2021 compared to 2020 was primarily driven by the operating performance
at our operating segments, including the impact of the Raytheon merger, the absence of the $3.2 billion goodwill impairment in the
second quarter of 2020 related to two Collins reporting units, and an increase in our FAS/CAS operating adjustment of
$690 million primarily as a result of the Raytheon merger. Included in the increase in Operating profit was a decrease in
restructuring costs of $625 million primarily related to 2020 restructuring actions taken at our Collins and Pratt & Whitney
segments and the absence of 2020 unfavorable profit impact of $516 million related to inventory reserves, contract
36
Table of Contents
asset impairments and recognition of supplier related obligations for certain international contracts at RMD as further described in
“Segment Review” below.
Non-service Pension Income
(dollars in millions) 2022 2021 2020
Non-service pension (income) $ (1,889)$ (1,944)$ (902)
The change in Non-service pension income of $0.1 billion in 2022 compared to 2021 was primarily driven by the impact of an
increase in discount rates, partially offset by prior years’ pension asset returns exceeding our expected return on plan assets
(EROA) assumption.
The change in Non-service pension income of $1.0 billion in 2021 compared to 2020 was primarily driven by the decrease in the
discount rates at December 31, 2020 compared to the prior period, the Raytheon Company domestic defined benefit pension plan
amendment described below and prior years’ pension asset returns exceeding our EROA assumption.
In December 2020, we approved a change to the Raytheon Company domestic defined benefit pension plans for non-union
participants to cease future benefit accruals based on an employee’s years of service and compensation under the historical formula
effective December 31, 2022. The plan change does not impact participants’ historical benefit accruals. Benefits for service after
December 31, 2022 will be based on a cash balance formula.
Interest Expense, Net
(dollars in millions) 2022 2021 2020
Interest expense $ 1,300 $ 1,330 $ 1,430 
Interest income (70) (36) (42)
Other non-operating expense (income) 46 28 (22)
Interest expense, net $ 1,276 $ 1,322 $ 1,366 
Total average interest expense rate - average outstanding borrowings during the
year: 4.0 % 4.1 % 4.0 %
Total average interest expense rate - outstanding borrowings as of December 31: 4.0 % 4.0 % 4.2 %
(1)    Primarily consists of the gains or losses on assets associated with certain of our nonqualified deferred compensation and employee benefit plans, as well as the
gains or losses on liabilities associated with certain of our nonqualified deferred compensation plans.
Interest expense, net in 2022 was relatively consistent with 2021.
Interest expense, net in 2021 was relatively consistent with 2020. Included in Interest expense, net was a decrease in interest
expense primarily due to the repayment of long-term debt.
Income Taxes
2022 2021 2020
Effective income tax rate 11.6 % 15.9 % (24.4)%
The 2022 effective tax rate includes a benefit of $214 million related to the Foreign Derived Intangible Income (FDII) benefit,
$207 million associated with legal entity and operational reorganizations implemented in 2022, and $164 million associated with
U.S. research and development credits. The increase in the FDII benefit from 2021 is primarily attributable to the capitalization of
research or experimental expenditures for tax-purposes, enacted as part of the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act of 2017 effective beginning
January 1, 2022.
The 2021 effective tax rate includes tax benefits of $244 million associated with legal entity and operational reorganizations
implemented in 2021, $172 million associated with U.S. research and development credits and $121 million associated with FDII,
and tax charges of $73 million associated with the revaluation of deferred taxes resulting from the increase in the United Kingdom
(U.K.) corporate tax rate to 25% enacted in 2021. In the first quarter of 2021, we recorded $148 million of tax charges associated
with the sale of the Forcepoint business, and subsequently recognized a $104 million tax benefit due to the revaluation of that tax
benefit as a result of completing the divestiture of RIS’s global training and services business for a gain in the fourth quarter of
2021.(1)
37
Table of Contents
The 2020 negative effective tax rate is a result of having tax expense of $575 million on a loss from continuing operations before
income taxes of $2.4 billion. The loss from continuing operations before income taxes in 2020 includes the $3.2 billion goodwill
impairment, most of which was non-deductible for tax purposes. Tax expense includes net deferred tax charges of $416 million
resulting from the Separation Transactions and the Raytheon merger primarily related to the impairment of deferred tax assets and
the revaluation of certain international tax incentives, and incremental tax expense of $177 million related to the disposal of
businesses, including the sales of businesses at Collins, the airborne tactical radios business at RIS and the entry into a definitive
agreement to sell Forcepoint. Also included in the 2020 effective tax rate are tax benefits of $142 million associated with U.S.
research and development credits and $83 million associated with FDII.
For additional discussion of income taxes and the effective income tax rate, see “Income Taxes” within Critical Accounting
Estimates, below, and “Note 13: Income Taxes” within Item 8 of this Form 10-K.
Net Income (Loss) from Continuing Operations Attributable to Common Shareowners
(dollars in millions, except per share amounts) 2022 2021 2020
Net income (loss) from continuing operations attributable to common shareowners $ 5,216 $ 3,897 $ (3,109)
Diluted earnings (loss) per share from continuing operations $ 3.51 $ 2.58 $ (2.29)
Net income from continuing operations attributable to common shareowners for 2022 includes the following:
•acquisition accounting adjustments of $1.5 billion, net of tax, which had an unfavorable impact on diluted EPS from
continuing operations of $0.99;
•impairment charges and reserve adjustments related to the global sanctions on and export controls with respect to
Russia of $210 million, net of tax, which had an unfavorable impact on diluted EPS from continuing operations of
$0.14;
•combined charges associated with disposition of businesses at Collins and RMD of $102 million, net of tax, which
had an unfavorable impact on diluted EPS from continuing operations of $0.07; and
•restructuring charges of $91 million, net of tax, which had an unfavorable impact on diluted EPS from continuing
operations of $0.06.
Net income from continuing operations attributable to common shareowners for 2021 includes the following:
•acquisition accounting adjustments primarily related to the Raytheon merger of $1.7 billion, net of tax, which had an
unfavorable impact on diluted EPS from continuing operations of $1.13;
•net debt extinguishment costs of $524 million, net of tax, in connection with the early repayment of outstanding
principal, which had an unfavorable impact on diluted EPS from continuing operations of $0.35;
•tax benefits of $244 million associated with legal entity and operational reorganizations implemented in the third
quarter 2021, which had a favorable impact on diluted EPS from continuing operations of $0.16;
•tax expense of $148 million related to the sale of our Forcepoint business in the first quarter of 2021, which had an
unfavorable impact on diluted EPS from continuing operations of $0.10, and the subsequent revaluation of that tax
benefit of $104 million in the fourth quarter of 2021, due to the completion of the divestiture of RIS’s global training
and services business for a gain, which had an favorable impact on diluted EPS from continuing operations of $0.07;
•accrual of $147 million related to the ongoing DOJ investigation into contract pricing matters at RMD, which had an
unfavorable impact on diluted EPS from continuing operations of $0.10;
•restructuring charges of $121 million, net of tax, which had an unfavorable impact on diluted EPS from continuing
operations of $0.08; and
•gain on the sale of our global training and services business within our RIS segment of $126 million, net of tax, which
had a favorable impact on diluted EPS from continuing operations of $0.08.
Net loss from continuing operations attributable to common shareowners for 2020 includes the following:
•$3.2 billion of primarily non-deductible goodwill and intangibles impairment charges related to our Collins segment,
which had an unfavorable impact on diluted EPS from continuing operations of $2.37;
•acquisition accounting adjustments primarily related to the Raytheon merger of $1.4 billion, net of tax, which had an
unfavorable impact on diluted EPS from continuing operations of $1.06;
•significant unfavorable contract adjustments at Pratt & Whitney and Collins of $667 million, net of tax, which had an
unfavorable impact on diluted EPS from continuing operations of $0.49;
•restructuring charges of $598 million, net of tax, which had an unfavorable impact on diluted EPS from continuing
operations of $0.44;
•$415 million of tax charges in connection with the Separation Transactions, including the impairment of deferred tax
assets not expected to be utilized, which had an unfavorable impact on diluted EPS from continuing operations of
$0.31;
38
Table of Contents
•unfavorable profit impact at RMD of $412 million, net of tax, related to certain direct commercial sales contracts for
precision guided munitions with a certain Middle East customer, which had an unfavorable impact on diluted EPS
from continuing operations of $0.30;
•increased estimates of expected credit losses driven by customer bankruptcies and additional allowances for credit
losses of $300 million, net of tax, which had an unfavorable impact on diluted EPS from continuing operations of
$0.22; and
•gains on the sales of the Collins businesses of $240 million, net of tax, which had a favorable impact on diluted EPS
from continuing operations of $0.18.
Loss from Discontinued Operations Attributable to Common Shareowners
(dollars in millions, except per share amounts) 2022 2021 2020
Loss from discontinued operations attributable to common shareowners $ (19)$ (33)$ (410)
Diluted loss per share from discontinued operations $ (0.01)$ (0.02)$ (0.30)
On April 3, 2020, we completed the separation of our commercial businesses, Carrier and Otis. Effective as of that date, the
historical results of the Carrier and Otis segments were reclassified to discontinued operations for all periods presented. See
“Note 3: Discontinued Operations” within Item 8 of this Form 10-K for additional information.
Loss from discontinued operations attributable to common shareowners and the related change in diluted loss per share from
discontinued operations in 2022 was relatively consistent with 2021.
The change in Loss from discontinued operations attributable to common shareowners of $377 million and the related change in
diluted loss per share from discontinued operations of $0.28 in 2021 compared to 2020 was primarily due to higher prior year costs
associated with the separation of our commercial businesses, including debt extinguishment costs of $611 million, net of tax, in
connection with the early repayment of outstanding principal, partially offset by prior year Carrier and Otis operating activity, as
the Separation Transactions occurred on April 3, 2020.
Net Income (Loss) Attributable to Common Shareowners
(dollars in millions, except per share amounts) 2022 2021 2020
Net income (loss) attributable to common shareowners $ 5,197 $ 3,864 $ (3,519)
Diluted earnings (loss) per share from operations $ 3.50 $ 2.56 $ (2.59)
The changes in Net income (loss) attributable to common shareowners and diluted EPS from operations for 2022 compared to 2021
and for 2021 compared to 2020 were driven by the changes in continuing operations, as discussed above in Net Income (Loss) from
Continuing Operations Attributable to Common Shareowners and the changes from discontinued operations, as discussed above in
Loss from Discontinued Operations Attributable to Common Shareowners.
SEGMENT REVIEW
We operate in four principal business segments: Collins, Pratt & Whitney, RIS and RMD. The results of RIS and RMD reflect the
period subsequent to the completion of the Raytheon merger on April 3, 2020. The historical results of Carrier and Otis are
presented as discontinued operations and, as such, have been excluded from both continuing operations and segment results for all
periods presented. The Company recently announced its intention to streamline the structure of its core businesses into three
principal business segments: Collins Aerospace, Pratt & Whitney and Raytheon. The Company plans to determine the exact
composition of each segment and implement the reorganization in the second half of 2023. All segment information included in this
Form 10-K is reflective of the existing four segments of Collins, Pratt & Whitney, RIS and RMD in accordance with the
management structure in place as of December 31, 2022.
For a detailed description of our businesses, see “Business” within Item 1 of this Form 10-K.
We present a FAS/CAS operating adjustment outside of segment results, which represents the difference between the service cost
component of our pension and postretirement benefit (PRB) expense under the Financial Accounting Standards (FAS) requirements
of U.S. GAAP and our pension and PRB expense under U.S. government Cost Accounting Standards (CAS) primarily related to
our RIS and RMD segments. While the ultimate liability for pension and PRB costs under FAS and CAS is similar, the pattern of
cost recognition is different. Over time, we generally expect to recover the related RIS and RMD pension and PRB liabilities
through the pricing of our products and services to the U.S. government. Collins and Pratt & Whitney generally record pension and
PRB expense on a FAS basis.
Segments are generally based on the management structure of the businesses and the grouping of similar operations, based on
capabilities and technologies, where each management organization has general operating autonomy over diversified products
39
Table of Contents
and services. Segment Total Net Sales and Operating profit (loss) include intercompany sales and profit, which are ultimately
eliminated within Eliminations and other, which also includes certain smaller non-reportable segments. Segment results exclude
certain acquisition accounting adjustments, the FAS/CAS operating adjustment and certain corporate expenses, as further discussed
below.
We provide the organic change in Net sales and Operating profit (loss) for our segments as discussed above in “Results of
Operations”. We believe that these non-GAAP measures are useful to investors because they provide transparency to the underlying
performance of our business, which allows for better year-over-year comparability. For Pratt & Whitney only, Other also includes
the transactional impact of foreign exchange hedging at Pratt & Whitney Canada due to its significance to Pratt & Whitney’s
overall operating results.
Given the nature of our business, we believe that Total Net Sales and Operating profit (loss) (and the related operating profit (loss)
margin percentage), which we disclose and discuss at the segment level, are most relevant to an understanding of management’s
view of our segment performance, as described below.
Total Net Sales. Total Net Sales by segment were as follows:
(dollars in millions) 2022 2021 2020
Collins Aerospace $ 20,597 $ 18,449 $ 19,288 
Pratt & Whitney 20,530 18,150 16,799 
Raytheon Intelligence & Space 14,312 15,180 11,069 
Raytheon Missiles & Defense 14,863 15,539 11,396 
Total segment 70,302 67,318 58,552 
Eliminations and other (3,228) (2,930) (1,965)
Consolidated $ 67,074 $ 64,388 $ 56,587 
(1)    Includes the operating results of certain smaller non-reportable business segments. 2020 amounts include Forcepoint, LLC, which was acquired as part of the
Raytheon merger, and subsequently disposed of on January 8, 2021.
Operating Profit (Loss). Operating profit (loss) by segment was as follows:
(dollars in millions) 2022 2021 2020
Collins Aerospace $ 2,343 $ 1,759 $ 1,466 
Pratt & Whitney 1,075 454 (564)
Raytheon Intelligence & Space 1,342 1,833 1,020 
Raytheon Missiles & Defense 1,519 2,004 880 
Total segment 6,279 6,050 2,802 
Eliminations and other (174) (133) (107)
Corporate expenses and other unallocated items (318) (552) (590)
FAS/CAS operating adjustment 1,520 1,796 1,106 
Acquisition accounting adjustments (1,893) (2,203) (5,100)
Consolidated $ 5,414 $ 4,958 $ (1,889)
(1)    Includes the operating results of certain smaller non-reportable business segments. 2020 amounts include Forcepoint, LLC, which was acquired as part of the
Raytheon merger, and subsequently disposed of on January 8, 2021.
(2)    Includes the net expenses related to the U.S. Army’s Lower Tier Air and Missile Defense Sensor (LTAMDS) project.
(3)    2020 includes the $3.2 billion goodwill impairment loss in the second quarter of 2020 related to two Collins reporting units. Refer to “Note 2: Business
Acquisitions, Dispositions, Goodwill and Intangible Assets” in Item 8 of this Form 10-K for additional information.
Included in segment Operating profit (loss) are Estimate at Completion (EAC) adjustments, which relate to changes in Operating
profit (loss) and margin due to revisions to total estimated revenues and costs at completion. These changes may reflect improved
or deteriorated operating performance, as well as changes in facts and assumptions related to contract options, contract
modifications, incentive and award fees associated with program performance, customer activity levels, and other customer-
directed changes. For a full description of our EAC process, refer to “Note 1: Basis of Presentation and Summary of Accounting
Principles” within Item 8 of this Form 10-K. Given that we have thousands of individual contracts and given the types and
complexity of the assumptions and estimates we must make on an on-going basis and the nature of the work required to be
performed under our contracts, we have both favorable and unfavorable EAC adjustments in the ordinary course.(1)
(1)
(2)
(3)
40
Table of Contents
We had the following aggregate EAC adjustments for the periods presented:
(dollars in millions) 2022 2021 2020
Gross favorable $ 1,368 $ 1,286 $ 994 
Gross unfavorable (1,405) (1,176) (1,637)
Total net EAC adjustments $ (37)$ 110 $ (643)
As a result of the Raytheon merger, RIS’s and RMD’s long-term contracts that are accounted for on a percentage of completion
basis, were reset to zero percent complete as of the merger date because only the unperformed portion of the contract at the merger
date represented an obligation of the Company. This had the impact of reducing gross favorable and unfavorable EAC adjustments
for these segments in the short term period following the merger, most notably in 2020.
The change in net EAC adjustments of $147 million in 2022 compared 2021 was primarily due to unfavorable changes in net EAC
adjustments of $183 million at RMD and $108 million at RIS, including the impact of acquisitions and dispositions, both spread
across numerous individual programs, with no individual or common significant driver, and includes the impact of continued
supply chain and labor market constraints. These unfavorable changes were partially offset by a favorable change in net EAC
adjustments of $119 million at Collins, spread across numerous individual programs, with no individual or common significant
driver, and a favorable change in net EAC adjustments of $26 million at Pratt & Whitney primarily due to a $50 million favorable
contract adjustment resulting from a contract modification on a commercial aftermarket program in the second quarter of 2022.
The change in net EAC adjustments of $753 million in 2021 compared 2020 was primarily due to a favorable change in net EAC
adjustments of $635 million at Pratt & Whitney, due to the absence of significant unfavorable contract adjustments in 2020, and a
favorable change in net EAC adjustments of $126 million at RIS and $40 million at RMD, primarily due to the Raytheon merger.
This was partially offset by an unfavorable change in net EAC adjustments of $48 million at Collins spread across numerous
individual programs with no individual or common significant driver.
Significant EAC adjustments, when they occur, are discussed in each business segment’s discussion below.
Backlog and Defense Bookings. Total backlog was approximately $175 billion and $156 billion as of December 31, 2022 and 2021.
Our backlog by segment, which does not include intercompany backlog, was as follows at December 31:
(dollars in billions) 2022 2021
Collins Aerospace $ 25 $ 24 
Pratt & Whitney 100 85 
Raytheon Intelligence & Space 16 18 
Raytheon Missiles & Defense 34 29 
Total backlog $ 175 $ 156 
Included in total backlog is defense backlog of $69 billion and $63 billion as of December 31, 2022 and 2021, respectively. Our
defense operations consist primarily of our RIS and RMD businesses and operations in the defense businesses within our Collins
and Pratt & Whitney segments. Defense bookings were approximately $47 billion, $40 billion and $31 billion for 2022, 2021 and
2020 respectively. In the quarter ended March 31, 2022, we reversed $1.3 billion of total backlog related to our sales contracts in
Russia at Pratt & Whitney and Collins as discussed further in “Note 1: Basis of Presentation and Summary of Accounting
Principles” within Item 8 of this Form 10-K.
Backlog, which is equivalent to our RPO for our sales contracts, represents the aggregate dollar value of firm orders for which
products have not been provided or service has not been performed and excludes unexercised contract options and potential orders
under ordering-type contracts (e.g., IDIQ type contracts). Backlog generally increases with bookings and generally decreases as
sales are recognized on these bookings and is affected by changes in foreign exchange rates, as well as contract cancellations and
terminations as discussed further below.
We believe defense bookings are an important measure of future performance for our defense operations and are an indicator of
potential future changes in these operations’ Total Net Sales, because we cannot record revenues under a new contract without first
having a booking in the current or a preceding period. Defense bookings generally represent the dollar value of new external
defense contracts awarded to us during the reporting period and include firm orders for which funding has not been appropriated.
Defense bookings exclude unexercised contract options and potential orders under ordering-type contracts (e.g., IDIQ type
contracts). We reflect contract cancellations and terminations, as well as the impact of changes in foreign exchange rates,
41
Table of Contents
directly as an adjustment to backlog in the period in which the cancellation or termination occurs and the impact is determinable.
Contract cancellations and terminations also include contract underruns on cost-type programs.
Collins Aerospace
% Change
(dollars in millions) 2022 2021 20202022 compared
with 20212021 compared
with 2020
Net sales $ 20,597 $ 18,449 $ 19,288 12 % (4)%
Operating profit 2,343 1,759 1,466 33 % 20 %
Operating profit margins 11.4 % 9.5 % 7.6 %
2022 Compared with 2021
 Factors Contributing to Total Change
(dollars in millions) OrganicAcquisitions /
Divestitures, netRestructuring
Costs Other Total Change
Net sales $ 2,384 $ (49)$ — $ (187)$ 2,148 
Operating profit 724 (12) 19 (147) 584 
2021 Compared with 2020
 Factors Contributing to Total Change
(dollars in millions) OrganicAcquisitions /
Divestitures, netRestructuring
Costs Other Total Change
Net sales $ (574)$ (333)$ — $ 68 $ (839)
Operating profit 653 (91) 320 (589) 293 
(1)    See “Segment Review” above for definition of organic. A reconciliation of these measures to reported U.S. GAAP amounts is provided in the table above.
2022 Compared with 2021
The organic sales increase of $2.4 billion in 2022 compared to 2021 primarily relates to higher commercial aerospace aftermarket
sales of $1.7 billion, including increases across all aftermarket sales channels, and higher commercial aerospace OEM sales of $1.0
billion, both principally driven by the recovery of commercial air traffic which has resulted in an increase in flight hours, aircraft
fleet utilization and narrow-body commercial OEM volume growth. These increases were partially offset by lower military sales of
$0.3 billion in 2022 compared to 2021 primarily due to lower material receipts and decreased volume.
The organic profit increase of $0.7 billion in 2022 compared to 2021 was primarily due to higher commercial aerospace operating
profit of $1.2 billion principally driven by the higher commercial aerospace aftermarket sales discussed above, partially offset by
the absence of a favorable $52 million impact from a contract-related matter in 2021. The increase in commercial aerospace
operating profit was partially offset by lower military operating profit of $0.2 billion principally driven by the lower military sales
discussed above, and higher selling, general and administrative expenses of $0.2 billion, which includes the benefits of cost
reduction initiatives.
The decrease in net sales and operating profit due to acquisitions / divestitures, net primarily relates to the disposition of two non-
core businesses in the second quarter of 2022.
The decrease in Other operating profit of $0.1 billion in 2022 compared to 2021 primarily relates to $141 million of pretax charges
related to increased estimates for credit losses, inventory reserves, recognition of purchase order obligations and a loss resulting
from the exit of our investment in a Russia-based joint venture, all due to global sanctions on and export controls with respect to
Russia in the first quarter of 2022. In addition, we recognized $69 million of charges associated with the disposition of two non-
core businesses in the second quarter of 2022. See “Note 1: Basis of Presentation and Summary of Accounting Principles” within
Item 1 of this Form 10-K for additional information on Russia sanctions.
2021 Compared with 2020
The organic sales decrease of $0.6 billion in 2021 compared to 2020 primarily relates to lower commercial aerospace OEM sales of
$0.8 billion, predominantly due to wide body volume declines principally driven by lower 787 deliveries. This was partially offset
by higher commercial aerospace aftermarket sales of $0.3 billion primarily due to an increase in flight hours and aircraft fleet
utilization as commercial aerospace continued to recover from the unfavorable economic environment principally driven by the
COVID-19 pandemic. Military sales were down slightly in 2021 compared to 2020.(1)
(1)
42
Table of Contents
The organic profit increase of $0.7 billion in 2021 compared to 2020 was primarily due to higher commercial aerospace operating
profit of $0.5 billion and lower selling, general and administrative expenses of $0.1 billion. The higher commercial aerospace
operating profit was principally driven by the higher commercial aerospace aftermarket sales discussed above, the benefit of cost
reduction initiatives, the absence of $157 million of prior year significant unfavorable adjustments, and a $52 million favorable
impact from a contract-related matter in 2021. The significant unfavorable adjustments in 2020 were primarily driven by the
expected acceleration of fleet retirements of a certain aircraft type. The lower selling, general and administrative expenses were
primarily driven by the absence of a $125 million charge for allowances for credit losses in 2020, primarily related to the impact of
the COVID-19 pandemic. Included in organic profit in 2020 was $72 million of foreign government wage subsidies related to
COVID-19.
The decrease in net sales and operating profit due to acquisitions / divestitures, net primarily relates to the sale of our Collins
military GPS and space-based precision optics businesses in the third quarter of 2020, as further discussed in “Note 2: Business
Acquisitions, Dispositions, Goodwill and Intangible Assets” within Item 8 of this Form 10-K.
The decrease in other operating profit of $0.6 billion in 2021 compared to 2020 primarily relates to the absence of prior year gains
of $595 million on the sales of the Collins military GPS and space-based precision optics businesses.
Pratt & Whitney
% Change
(dollars in millions) 2022 2021 20202022 compared
with 20212021 compared
with 2020
Net sales $ 20,530$ 18,150$ 16,799 13 % 8 %
Operating profit (loss) 1,075 454 (564) 137 % 180 %
Operating profit (loss) margins 5.2 % 2.5 % (3.4)%
2022 Compared with 2021
 Factors Contributing to Total Change
(dollars in millions) OrganicAcquisitions /
Divestitures, netRestructuring
Costs Other Total Change
Net sales $ 2,478 $ — $ — $ (98)$ 2,380 
Operating profit (loss) 773 — (13) (139) 621 
2021 Compared with 2020
 Factors Contributing to Total Change
(dollars in millions) OrganicAcquisitions /
Divestitures, netRestructuring
Costs Other Total Change
Net sales $ 1,255 $ — $ — $ 96 $ 1,351 
Operating profit (loss) 702 — 173 143 1,018 
(1)    See “Segment Review” above for definition of organic. A reconciliation of these measures to reported U.S. GAAP amounts is provided in the table above.
2022 Compared with 2021
The organic sales increase of $2.5 billion in 2022 compared to 2021 primarily reflects higher commercial aftermarket sales of $1.8
billion primarily due to an increase in shop visits and related spare part sales as the commercial aerospace environment continues to
recover. The increase also includes higher commercial OEM sales of $0.9 billion driven by favorable mix and higher volume on
commercial engine shipments. These increases were partially offset by lower military sales of $0.2 billion primarily due to lower
sales on F135 production volume and lower volume on legacy aftermarket programs, partially offset by higher F135 sustainment
volume.
The organic profit increase of $0.8 billion in 2022 compared to 2021 was primarily driven by higher commercial aerospace
operating profit of $1.1 billion principally due to the aftermarket sales volume increase discussed above and favorable OEM mix.
The organic profit increase also includes slightly higher military operating profit primarily driven by favorable mix. These
increases were partially offset by a combined increase in selling, general and administrative expenses and research and
development costs of $0.3 billion. The year over year increase in commercial aerospace operating profit includes a $50 million
favorable contract adjustment on a commercial aftermarket program in the second quarter of 2022. In 2021, our organic profit
included approximately $50 million related to foreign government wage subsidies due to COVID-19.
The decrease in other operating profit of $0.1 billion in 2022 compared to 2021 was primarily due to $155 million of pretax charges
related to impairment of customer financing assets for products under lease, increased estimates for credit losses,(1)
(1)
43
Table of Contents
inventory reserves and recognition of purchase order obligations, all due to global sanctions on and export controls with respect to
Russia in the first quarter of 2022. See “Note 1: Basis of Presentation and Summary of Accounting Principles” within Item 1 of this
Form 10-K for additional information on Russia sanctions.
2021 Compared with 2020
The organic sales increase of $1.3 billion in 2021 compared to 2020 primarily reflects higher commercial aftermarket sales of $1.2
billion, primarily due to an increase in shop visits and related spare part sales driven by the recovery from the unfavorable
economic environment largely due to the COVID-19 pandemic, and higher commercial OEM sales of $0.1 billion. Prior year
commercial aftermarket sales include unfavorable EAC adjustments of $0.4 billion, discussed further below. These increases were
partially offset by lower military sales of $0.1 billion in 2021 compared to 2020.
The organic profit increase of $0.7 billion in 2021 compared to 2020 was primarily driven by higher commercial aerospace
operating profit of $0.7 billion principally due to favorable change in net EAC adjustments of $0.6 billion, and lower selling,
general and administrative expenses of $0.1 billion. The higher commercial aerospace operating profit also includes the impact of
the aftermarket sales volume increase discussed above, which was partially offset by lower commercial OEM operating profit due
to unfavorable mix on the increased sales volume. The lower year-over-year unfavorable commercial aerospace EAC adjustments
were principally driven by prior year unfavorable EAC adjustments including a $334 million unfavorable EAC adjustment on a
commercial engine aftermarket contract due to lower estimated revenues driven by a change in the estimated maintenance coverage
period, an unfavorable EAC adjustment of $129 million related to lower estimated revenues due to the restructuring of a customer
contract, and $86 million related to an unfavorable EAC adjustment and increased allowances for warranty for legacy fleet related
retrofits. The lower selling, general and administrative expenses were primarily driven by the absence of a $257 million charge in
2020 for allowances for credit losses, partially offset by higher employee-related costs. The change in organic operating profit was
also impacted by $106 million of lower government wage subsidies, and the absence of prior year unfavorable EAC adjustments on
certain commercial aftermarket and military programs.
The increase in other operating profit of $0.1 billion in 2021 compared to 2020 was primarily driven by the absence of an $89
million impairment of commercial aircraft program assets and $43 million of reserves related to a commercial financing
arrangement, both recorded in 2020.
Defense Bookings – In addition to a number of smaller bookings, in 2022 Pratt & Whitney booked $4.9 billion for F135 production
Lots 15, 16 and 17, $1.4 billion for F135 sustainment, $251 million for tanker production Lots 7 and 8 and $210 million for F117
sustainment.
Raytheon Intelligence & Space
% Change
(dollars in millions) 2022 2021 20202022 compared
with 20212021 compared with
2020
Net sales $ 14,312$ 15,180 $ 11,069 (6)% 37 %
Operating profit 1,342 1,833 1,020 (27)% 80 %
Operating profit margins 9.4 % 12.1 % 9.2 %
Bookings $ 12,391$ 14,019 $ 10,568 (12)% 33 %
2022 Compared with 2021
 Factors Contributing to Total Change in Net Sales
(dollars in millions) OrganicAcquisitions /
Divestitures, net Other Total Change
Net sales $ (184)$ (627)$ (57)$ (868)
(1)    See “Segment Review” above for definition of organic. A reconciliation of these measures to reported U.S. GAAP amounts is provided in the table above.
Factors Contributing to Change in Operating Profit
(dollars in millions) VolumeNet change in EAC
adjustmentsAcquisitions /
Divestitures, netMix and other
performance Total Change
Operating profit$ (9)$ (69)$ (118)$ (295)$ (491)(1)
44
Table of Contents
2021 Compared with 2020
 Factors Contributing to Total Change in Net Sales
(dollars in millions) OrganicAcquisitions /
Divestitures, net Other Total Change
Net sales $ 86 $ 3,991 $ 34 $ 4,111 
(1)    See “Segment Review” above for definition of organic. A reconciliation of these measures to reported U.S. GAAP amounts is provided in the table above.
Factors Contributing to Change in Operating Profit
(dollars in millions) VolumeNet change in EAC
adjustmentsAcquisitions /
Divestitures, netMix and other
performance Total Change
Operating profit$ (10)$ 132 $ 399 $ 292 $ 813 
2022 Compared with 2021
The organic sales decrease of $0.2 billion in 2022 compared to 2021 was driven by lower Command, Control and Communications
sales of $0.3 billion partially offset by higher sales at both Cyber, Training and Services and Sensing and Effects. The lower
Command, Control and Communications sales were primarily driven by an anticipated decrease in production volumes on certain
tactical communications systems programs. The higher Cyber, Training and Services sales were driven by certain classified cyber
programs. The higher Sensing and Effects sales were primarily driven by an increase in sales on classified programs and an
increase due to certain electro-optical development programs transitioning into production, partially offset by a decrease in
surveillance and targeting systems due to lower production volume on certain legacy programs.
The decrease in operating profit of $0.5 billion and the related decrease in operating profit margins in 2022 compared to 2021, were
primarily due to an unfavorable change in mix and other performance of $0.3 billion driven by the absence of a prior year $239
million gain, net of transaction costs, on the sale of the global training and services business, as further discussed in “Note 2:
Business Acquisitions, Dispositions, Goodwill and Intangible Assets” within Item 8 of this Form 10-K and acquisition /
divestitures, net of $0.1 billion described below.
The decrease in net sales and operating profit due to acquisitions / divestitures, net primarily relates to the sale of the global training
and services business in the fourth quarter of 2021.
2021 Compared with 2020
Organic sales in 2021 were relatively consistent with 2020. The increase in net sales due to acquisitions / divestitures, net primarily
relates to the Raytheon merger on April 3, 2020.
The increase in operating profit of $0.8 billion and the related increase in operating profit margins in 2021 compared to 2020, were
primarily due to the change in acquisitions / divestitures, net of $399 million, primarily due to the Raytheon merger on April 3,
2020, a favorable change in mix and other performance of $292 million primarily due to a $239 million gain, net of transaction
costs, on the sale of RIS’s global training and services business in December 2021, as further discussed in “Note 2: Business
Acquisitions, Dispositions, Goodwill and Intangible Assets” within Item 8 of this Form 10-K, and the net favorable change in EAC
adjustments of $132 million, which was primarily driven by the absence of $124 million of unfavorable EAC adjustments in 2020
for loss reserves related to a domestic classified fixed price development program in a net loss position.
Backlog and Bookings – Backlog was $16 billion at December 31, 2022 compared to $18 billion at December 31, 2021. In addition
to a number of smaller bookings, in 2022, RIS booked $5.0 billion on a number of classified contracts, and a major award for a
prototype Missile Track Custody system for the U.S. Space Force. RIS also booked $311 million on the Next-Generation Overhead
Persistent Infrared (Next-Gen OPIR) GEO missile warning and defense contract for the U.S. Space Force, $271 million to provide
communications satellite payloads to a commercial customer, and $253 million on the Development, Operations and Maintenance
(DOMino) cyber program for the Department of Homeland Security (DHS).
Raytheon Missiles & Defense
% Change
(dollars in millions) 2022 2021 20202022 compared
with 20212021 compared with
2020
Net sales $ 14,863$ 15,539 $ 11,396 (4)% 36 %
Operating profit 1,519 2,004 880 (24)% 128 %
Operating profit margins 10.2 % 12.9 % 7.7 %
Bookings $ 20,048$ 15,650 $ 9,716 28 % 61 %(1)
45
Table of Contents
2022 Compared with 2021
 Factors Contributing to Total Change in Net Sales
(dollars in millions) OrganicAcquisitions /
Divestitures, net Other Total Change
Net sales $ (628)$ — $ (48)$ (676)
(1)    See “Segment Review” above for definition of organic. A reconciliation of these measures to reported U.S. GAAP amounts is provided in the table above.
Factors Contributing to Change in Operating Profit
(dollars in millions) VolumeNet change in EAC
adjustmentsAcquisitions /
Divestitures, netMix and other
performance Total Change
Operating profit$ (25)$ (183)$ — $ (277)$ (485)
2021 Compared with 2020
 Factors Contributing to Total Change in Net Sales
(dollars in millions) OrganicAcquisitions /
Divestitures, net Other Total Change
Net sales $ 130 $ 3,999 $ 14 $ 4,143 
(1)    See “Segment Review” above for definition of organic. A reconciliation of these measures to reported U.S. GAAP amounts is provided in the table above.
Factors Contributing to Change in Operating Profit
(dollars in millions) VolumeNet change in EAC
adjustmentsAcquisitions /
Divestitures, netMix and other
performance Total Change
Operating profit$ 7 $ (14)$ 521 $ 610 $ 1,124 
2022 Compared with 2021
The organic sales decrease of $0.6 billion in 2022 compared to 2021 was primarily due to lower net sales of $0.7 billion from our
Land Warfare and Air Defense programs, lower net sales of $0.3 billion from our Air Power programs, and lower net sales of $0.2
billion on our Naval Power programs. These decreases were partially offset by higher net sales of $0.4 billion from our Strategic
Missile Defense programs. The decrease in Land Warfare and Air Defense programs includes lower sales on certain international
air and missile defense programs primarily driven by lower material receipts as a result of supply chain constraints and anticipated
decreases in production. The decrease in Air Power programs includes lower net sales on the Paveway program and the Advanced
Medium Range Air-to-Air Missile (AMRAAM) program. The lower net sales in Naval Power programs was driven by lower
volume across multiple programs, partially offset by higher net sales from SPY-6 programs. The increased sales in Strategic Missile
Defense programs included higher net sales from the Next Generation Interceptor (NGI) program.
The decrease in operating profit of $0.5 billion and the related decrease in operating profit margins in 2022 compared to 2021 were
primarily due to a change in mix and other performance of $0.3 billion and a net unfavorable change in EAC adjustments of $0.2
billion. The change in mix and other performance includes unfavorable program mix and a $42 million charge associated with a
divestiture of a small non-core Naval Power business. The net unfavorable change in EAC adjustments was spread across
numerous programs and includes the impact of continued supply chain and labor market constraints.
2021 Compared with 2020
Organic sales in 2021 were relatively consistent with 2020. The increase in net sales due to acquisitions / divestitures, net relates to
the Raytheon merger on April 3, 2020.
The increase in operating profit of $1.1 billion and the related increase in operating profit margins in 2021 compared to 2020 was
primarily due to a change in mix and other performance of $0.6 billion, primarily driven by the absence of an unfavorable profit
impact of $516 million in 2020 related to certain international contracts as further described below, and a change in acquisitions /
divestitures, net of $0.5 billion due to the Raytheon merger on April 3, 2020.
In the fourth quarter of 2020, RMD reversed $119 million of sales for work performed subsequent to the date of the Raytheon
merger through the end of the third quarter of 2020, and the related operating profit, on our direct commercial sales contracts for
precision guided munitions with a certain Middle East customer, for which we have not yet obtained regulatory approval. Due to
the U.S. presidential and congressional elections and the resulting uncertainty surrounding U.S. foreign policy on direct commercial
sales for precision guided munitions with this customer, we determined that it was no longer probable that we will be able to obtain
regulatory approvals for these contracts. RMD also recognized an unfavorable profit impact of $516 million related to these
contracts, primarily related to inventory reserves, contract asset impairments and recognition of supplier related obligations related
to termination liability, which we do not expect to be utilized or otherwise directed to other customers.(1)
(1)
46
Table of Contents
Backlog and Bookings– Backlog was $34 billion at December 31, 2022 compared to $29 billion at December 31, 2021. In 2022,
RMD booked $3.5 billion on a number of classified contracts, including a strategic competitive award. RMD also booked $1.1
billion for the SPY-6 Hardware Production and Sustainment contract for the U.S. Navy, $1.0 billion to provide Guidance Enhanced
Missile (GEM-T) for an international customer, $1.0 billion for the first Hypersonic Attack Cruise Missile (HACM) for the U.S. Air
Force, $972 million for AMRAAM for the U.S. Air Force and Navy and international customers, $762 million for AIM-9X
Sidewinder short-range air-to-air missiles for the U.S. Navy and Air Force and international customers, $698 million to provide
National Advanced Surface-to-Air Missile System (NASAMS) for Ukraine, $662 million on Stinger for the U.S. Army, $648
million for Standard Missile-3 (SM-3) for the Missile Defense Agency (MDA), $415 million on Evolved Seasparrow Missile
(ESSM) for the U.S. Navy and international customers, $405 million on a Surveillance Radar Program (SRP) for an international
customer, $384 million for Excalibur Rapid Demonstration Phase 2 for the U.S. Army, $353 million for the Lower Tier Air and
Missile Defense Sensor (LTAMDS) Pre-planned Product Improvement program for the U.S. Army, $247 million on MIR
replenishment for an international customer through our consolidated Raytheon-Rafael joint venture, $218 million to provide
Patriot engineering support services for the U.S. Army and international customers, $217 million on Tomahawk for the U.S. Navy,
$209 million for Naval Strike Missiles (NSM) Coastal Defense System (CDS) for the U.S. Navy, and $207 million for integrated
effectors and sensors for Counter-Unmanned Aircraft Systems (C-UAS) defense system for the U.S. Army.
Corporate and Eliminations and other
Eliminations and other reflects the elimination of sales, other income and operating profit transacted between segments, as well as
the operating results of certain smaller non-reportable business segments, including Forcepoint, which was acquired as part of the
Raytheon merger and subsequently disposed of on January 8, 2021, as further discussed in “Note 2: Business Acquisitions,
Dispositions, Goodwill and Intangible Assets” within Item 8 of this Form 10-K.
Corporate expenses and other unallocated items consists of costs and certain other unallowable corporate costs not considered part
of management’s evaluation of reportable segment operating performance including restructuring and merger costs related to the
Raytheon merger, net costs associated with corporate research and development, including the LTAMDS program and certain
reserves.
Net Sales Operating Profit
(dollars in millions) 2022 2021 2020 2022 2021 2020
Eliminations and other $(3,228)$(2,930)$(1,965)$ (174)$ (133)$ (107)
Corporate expenses and other unallocated items — — — (318) (552) (590)
The increase in eliminations and other sales in 2022 compared to 2021 was primarily due to an increase in intersegment
eliminations, principally driven by Collins and RIS. Eliminations and other operating profit in 2022 was relatively consistent with
2021.
The increase in eliminations and other sales in 2021 compared to 2020 was primarily due to the sale of our Forcepoint business in
the first quarter of 2021 and an increase in intersegment eliminations, principally driven by RIS. The change in eliminations and
other operating profit in 2021 compared to 2020 was primarily due to the sale of our Forcepoint business in the first quarter of
2021.
The change in corporate expenses and other unallocated items of $234 million in 2022 compared to 2021 was primarily driven by
the absence of an accrual of $147 million in the fourth quarter of 2021 related to the ongoing DOJ investigation into contract
pricing matters at RMD, a decrease in expenses related to the LTAMDS project and lower restructuring costs, partially offset by an
increase in information technology-related costs.
The change in corporate expenses and other unallocated items of $38 million in 2021 compared to 2020 was primarily driven by a
decrease in merger-related costs related to the Raytheon merger of $148 million and lower restructuring costs of $112 million,
partially offset by an accrual of $147 million in the fourth quarter of 2021 related to the ongoing DOJ investigation into contract
pricing matters at RMD and an increase in net expenses related to the LTAMDS project.
FAS/CAS operating adjustment
The segment results of RIS and RMD include pension and PRB expense as determined under U.S. government Cost Accounting
Standards (CAS), which we generally recover through the pricing of our products and services to the U.S. government. The
difference between our CAS expense and the Financial Accounting Standards (FAS) service cost attributable to these segments
under U.S. GAAP is the FAS/CAS operating adjustment. The FAS/CAS operating adjustment results in
47
Table of Contents
consolidated pension expense in operating profit equal to the service cost component of FAS expense under U.S. GAAP. The
segment results of Collins Aerospace and Pratt & Whitney generally include FAS service cost.
The CAS expense calculation is different from the FAS requirements and calculation methodology. While the ultimate liability for
pension costs under FAS and CAS is similar, the pattern of cost recognition is different. Our CAS pension expense is comprised
primarily of CAS service cost, as well as amortization amounts resulting from demographic or economic experience different than
expected, changes in assumptions, or changes in plan provisions. Unlike FAS, CAS expense is only recognized for plans that are
not fully funded. Consequently, if plans become or cease to be fully funded under CAS due to our asset or liability experience, our
CAS expense will change accordingly.
The components of the FAS/CAS operating adjustment were as follows:
(dollars in millions) 2022 2021 2020
FAS service cost (expense) $ (365)$ (405)$ (354)
CAS expense 1,885 2,201 1,460 
FAS/CAS operating adjustment $ 1,520 $ 1,796 $ 1,106 
The change in our FAS/CAS operating adjustment of $276 million in 2022 compared to 2021 was driven by a $316 million
decrease in CAS expense, partially offset by a $40 million decrease in FAS service cost. The decrease in CAS expense was
primarily due to an increase in applicable discount rates as a result of U.S. qualified pension plan funding relief included in the
American Rescue Plan Act of 2021 (ARPA).
The change in our FAS/CAS operating adjustment of $690 million in 2021 compared to 2020 was driven by a $741 million
increase in CAS expense, partially offset by a $51 million increase in FAS service cost. The increase in our CAS expense was
primarily due to the Raytheon merger.
In December 2020, we approved a change to the Raytheon Company domestic defined benefit pension plans for non-union
participants to cease future benefit accruals based on an employee’s years of service and compensation under the historical formula
effective December 31, 2022. The plan change does not impact participants’ historical benefit accruals. Benefits for service after
December 31, 2022 will be based on a cash balance formula.
Acquisition accounting adjustments
Acquisition accounting adjustments include the amortization of acquired intangible assets related to acquisitions, the amortization
of the property, plant and equipment fair value adjustment acquired through acquisitions, the amortization of customer contractual
obligations related to loss making or below market contracts acquired, and goodwill impairment. These adjustments are not
considered part of management’s evaluation of segment results.
The components of Acquisition accounting adjustments were as follows:
(dollars in millions) 2022 2021 2020
Goodwill impairment charge $ — $ — $ (3,183)
Amortization of acquired intangibles (1,912) (2,404) (2,142)
Amortization of property, plant and equipment fair value adjustment (89) (111) (69)
Amortization of customer contractual obligations related to acquired loss-
making and below-market contracts 108 312 294 
Acquisition accounting adjustments $ (1,893)$ (2,203)$ (5,100)
48
Table of Contents
Acquisition accounting adjustments related to acquisitions in each segment were as follows:
(dollars in millions) 2022 2021 2020
Collins Aerospace $ (800)$ (641)$ (3,926)
Pratt & Whitney (243) (160) (117)
Raytheon Intelligence & Space (303) (563) (394)
Raytheon Missiles & Defense (547) (838) (607)
Total segment (1,893) (2,202) (5,044)
Eliminations and other — (1) (56)
Acquisition accounting adjustments $ (1,893)$ (2,203)$ (5,100)
The change in the Acquisition accounting adjustments of $0.3 billion in 2022 compared to 2021, is primarily driven by a decrease
in RIS and RMD intangibles amortization related to the Raytheon merger, partially offset by the absence of $116 million of
amortization of customer contractual obligations due to the accelerated liquidation of below-market contract reserves at Collins in
2021 driven by the termination of two customer contracts.
The change in the Acquisition accounting adjustments of $2.9 billion in 2021 compared to 2020, is primarily driven by the absence
of the $3.2 billion goodwill impairment loss in the second quarter of 2020 related to two Collins reporting units partially offset by
an increase of $0.4 billion for acquisition accounting adjustments related to the Raytheon merger, primarily due to the timing of the
merger in 2020. Included in Acquisition accounting adjustments in 2021 was $116 million of amortization of customer contractual
obligations due to the accelerated liquidation of below-market contract reserves at Collins driven by the termination of two
customer contracts. Refer to “Note 2: Business Acquisitions, Dispositions, Goodwill and Intangible Assets” within Item 8 of this
Form 10-K for additional information on the goodwill impairment.
LIQUIDITY AND FINANCIAL CONDITION
(dollars in millions) 2022 2021
Cash and cash equivalents $ 6,220 $ 7,832 
Total debt 31,914 31,485 
Total equity 74,178 74,664 
Total capitalization (total debt plus total equity) 106,092 106,149 
Total debt to total capitalization 30 % 30 %
We assess our liquidity in terms of our ability to generate cash to fund our operating, investing and financing activities. Our
principal source of liquidity is cash flows from operating activities. In addition to operating cash flows, other significant factors that
affect our overall management of liquidity include: capital expenditures, customer financing requirements, investments in and
divestitures of businesses, dividends, common stock repurchases, pension funding, access to the commercial paper markets,
adequacy of available bank lines of credit, redemptions of debt and the ability to attract long-term capital at satisfactory terms.
At December 31, 2022, we had cash and cash equivalents of $6.2 billion, of which approximately 34% was held by RTC’s foreign
subsidiaries. We manage our worldwide cash requirements by reviewing available funds among the many subsidiaries through
which we conduct our business and the cost effectiveness with which those funds can be accessed. The Company does not intend to
reinvest certain undistributed earnings of its international subsidiaries that have been previously taxed in the U.S. Taxes associated
with the future remittance of these earnings have been recorded. For the remainder of the Company’s undistributed international
earnings, unless tax effective to repatriate, RTC will continue to permanently reinvest these earnings.
Historically, our strong credit ratings and financial position have enabled us to issue long-term debt at favorable market rates.
As of December 31, 2022, we had revolving credit agreements with various banks permitting aggregate borrowings of up to $7.0
billion, consisting of a $5.0 billion revolving credit agreement, which expires in April 2025, and a $2.0 billion revolving credit
agreement, which was renewed in September 2022 and expires in September 2023. As of December 31, 2022, there were no
borrowings outstanding under these agreements.
From time to time, we use commercial paper borrowings for general corporate purposes, including the funding of potential
acquisitions, pension contributions, debt refinancing, dividend payments and repurchases of our common stock. The commercial
paper notes have original maturities of not more than 364 days from the date of issuance. As of December 31, 2022, our maximum
commercial paper borrowing limit was $5.0 billion as the commercial paper is backed by our $5.0 billion revolving credit
agreement. We had $0.5 billion of commercial paper outstanding at December 31, 2022, which is reflected in Short-term
borrowings in our Consolidated Balance Sheet. The proceeds from these borrowings have primarily been used to
49
Table of Contents
fund payments related to the impact of a provision enacted in the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act of 2017 requiring the capitalization of
research and experimental expenditures for tax purposes. At December 31, 2022, short-term commercial paper borrowings
outstanding had a weighted-average interest rate of 4.4%.
We have an existing universal shelf registration statement, which we filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC) on
September 22, 2022, for an indeterminate amount of debt and equity securities for future issuance, subject to our internal
limitations on the amount of debt to be issued under this shelf registration statement.
The Company offers voluntary supply chain finance (SCF) programs with global financial institutions which enables our suppliers,
at their sole discretion, to sell their receivables from the Company to the financial institutions at a rate that leverages our credit
rating, which might be beneficial to them. Our suppliers’ participation in the SCF programs does not impact or change our terms
and conditions with those suppliers, and therefore, we have no economic interest in a supplier’s decision to participate in the
programs. In addition, we do not pay for any of the costs of the programs incurred by those suppliers that choose to participate, and
have no direct financial relationship with the financial institutions, as it relates to sales of receivables made by those suppliers. As
such, the SCF programs do not impact our working capital, cash flows or overall liquidity.
We believe our cash on hand and future operating cash flows will be sufficient to meet our future operating cash needs. Further, we
continue to have access to the commercial paper markets and our existing credit facilities, and our ability to obtain debt or equity
financing, as well as the availability under committed credit lines, provides additional potential sources of liquidity should they be
required or appropriate.
Cash Flow - Operating Activities
(dollars in millions) 2022 2021 2020
Net cash flows provided by operating activities from continuing operations $ 7,168 $ 7,142 $ 4,334 
Net cash flows used in operating activities from discontinued operations — (71) (728)
2022 Compared with 2021 Operating Activities - Continuing Operations
Cash flows provided by operating activities in 2022 were relatively consistent with 2021 and benefited from an improvement in
working capital, which was more than offset by the net increase in tax payments resulting from a change in tax law discussed
below. Included in the change in working capital was a favorable impact from accounts receivable driven by higher collections
resulting from increased sales volume and a related increase in factoring as discussed below. The change in working capital also
included a favorable impact from contract assets compared to 2021 primarily due to the timing of billings and collections, and
increases in accounts payable and accrued liabilities primarily driven by higher inventory purchasing activity, deferred revenue and
advanced payments. This impact was largely offset by an unfavorable impact from inventory principally due to current year
increases to support sales volume growth.
The Company enters into various factoring agreements with third-party financial institutions to sell certain of its receivables.
Higher sales volume in the current year supported increased factoring activity that resulted in approximately $2.3 billion of
increased cash flows provided by operating activities during 2022, compared to a decrease in cash flows provided by operating
activities of $0.2 billion during 2021. Factoring activity includes amounts factored on certain aerospace receivables at the
customers’ request for which we may be compensated by the customer.
2021 Compared with 2020 Operating Activities - Continuing Operations
Cash generated from operating activities in 2021 was $2.8 billion higher than 2020. This increase was primarily due to higher net
income of $4.1 billion after adjustments for depreciation and amortization, deferred income tax provision, stock compensation
costs, net periodic pension and other postretirement benefit, the goodwill impairment charge and debt extinguishment costs, as well
as lower pension and PRB contributions to trusts of $1.0 billion in 2021 compared to 2020. This was partially offset by an
unfavorable change in working capital of $1.1 billion in 2021 compared to 2020, primarily due to activity at the RIS and RMD
segments in the first quarter of 2021 with no comparable activity in the first quarter of 2020 as a result of the Raytheon merger.
This unfavorable change in working capital at RIS and RMD includes a cash outflow for accounts payable and accrued liabilities
due to the timing of incentive compensation payments. Also included in the total unfavorable change in working capital was an
increase in contract assets principally driven by sales in excess of billings at Pratt & Whitney and contractual billing terms on U.S.
government and foreign military sales contracts at RMD, and growth in accounts payable and accounts receivable at Collins and
Pratt & Whitney due to an increase in sales volume as commercial aerospace recovered.
Factoring activity resulted in a decrease of approximately $0.2 billion in cash provided by operating activities during 2021,
compared to a decrease of approximately $1.3 billion in cash provided by operating activities during 2020. The year over year
50
Table of Contents
favorable impact from factoring activity was primarily due to the significant decline in sales volume in 2020 principally driven by
the economic environment primarily due to COVID-19.
Operating Activities - Continuing Operations
We made pension and PRB contributions to trusts of $94 million, $59 million, and $1,025 million in 2022, 2021, and 2020,
respectively. The contributions in 2020 include discretionary contributions of $801 million. We make both required and
discretionary contributions to our pension plans. Required contributions are primarily determined by Employee Retirement Income
Security Act of 1974 (ERISA) funding rules, which require us to fully fund our U.S qualified pension plans over a rolling seven-
year period as determined annually based on the Pension Protection Act of 2006 (PPA) calculated funded status at the beginning of
each year. The funding requirements are primarily based on the year’s expected service cost and amortization of other previously
unfunded liabilities, which are dependent upon many factors, including returns on invested assets, the level of market interest rates
and actuarial assumptions. We can contribute cash or RTC shares to our plans at our discretion, subject to applicable regulations. As
of December 31, 2022, the total investment by the U.S. qualified pension plans in RTC shares was less than 1% of total plan assets.
In response to the economic environment resulting from the COVID-19 pandemic, Congress passed the ARPA in March 2021,
which included pension funding relief provisions. These provisions extended and expanded upon existing pension funding relief,
most notably by increasing the liability interest rates used to determine the required cash contributions for our U.S. qualified
pension plans. The Infrastructure Investment and Jobs Act passed by Congress in November 2021 further extended the interest rate
pension funding relief provisions included in ARPA. Global pension and PRB cash funding requirements are expected to be
approximately $0.4 billion in 2023, which includes benefit payments to be paid directly by the company.
We made net tax payments of $2.4 billion, $1.1 billion, and $1.7 billion in 2022, 2021, and 2020, respectively. A provision enacted
in the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act of 2017 related to the capitalization of research and experimental expenditures for tax purposes
became effective on January 1, 2022. As this provision was not deferred legislatively, we have made incremental tax payments of
$1.6 billion in 2022.
Included in cash flows from operating activities are payments related to our operating lease obligations. See “Note 12: Leases”
within Item 8 of this Form 10-K for actual and expected payments on operating lease obligations.
In addition, the majority of our cash flows for purchase obligations are classified as cash flows from operating activities. We expect
future payments related to our purchase obligations to be $27.6 billion, of which $19.4 billion is payable in 2023. Purchase
obligations include current amounts committed for the purchase of goods and services under legally enforceable contracts or
purchase orders, and do not represent our entire anticipated purchases in the future. Approximately 50% of our purchase obligations
described above represent purchase orders for products to be delivered under firm contracts with the U.S. government for which we
have full recourse under customary contract termination clauses.
Operating Activities - Discontinued Operations
Cash flows provided by operating activities from discontinued operations in 2022 and 2021 were not significant as the Separation
Transactions occurred on April 3, 2020. The $657 million increase in cash flows provided by operating activities from discontinued
operations in 2021 compared to 2020 was primarily driven by the absence of prior year separation costs as the Separation
Transactions occurred in 2020.
Cash Flow - Investing Activities
(dollars in millions) 2022 2021 2020
Net cash flows (used in) provided by investing activities from continuing operations $(2,829)$(1,364)$ 3,343 
Net cash flows used in investing activities from discontinued operations — — (241)
Our investing activities primarily include capital expenditures, cash investments in customer financing assets, investments in and
dispositions of businesses, payments related to our collaboration intangible assets and contractual rights to provide product on new
aircraft platforms, and settlements of derivative contracts not designated as hedging instruments.
2022 Compared with 2021 Investing Activities - Continuing Operations
The $1.5 billion change in cash flows (used in) provided by investing activities in 2022 compared to 2021 primarily relates to the
absence of 2021 investments in and dispositions of businesses, as discussed below.
51
Table of Contents
2021 Compared with 2020 Investing Activities - Continuing Operations
The $4.7 billion change in cash flows (used in) provided by investing activities in 2021 compared to 2020 primarily relates to the
absence of cash acquired in the Raytheon merger in 2020 of $3.2 billion, and investments in and dispositions of businesses, as
discussed below.
Investing Activities - Continuing Operations
There were no material acquisitions in 2022. Investments in businesses in 2021 of $1.1 billion primarily related to the acquisitions
of FlightAware at Collins and SEAKR Engineering Inc. at RIS. Investments in businesses in 2020 of $0.4 billion primarily related
to the acquisition of Blue Canyon Technologies at RIS. For additional detail, see “Note 2: Business Acquisitions, Dispositions,
Goodwill and Intangible Assets” within Item 8 of this Form 10-K.
There were no material dispositions of businesses in 2022. Dispositions of businesses in 2021 of $1.9 billion, net of cash
transferred, primarily related to the sale of our Forcepoint business and the sale of our global training and services business within
RIS. Dispositions of businesses in 2020 of $2.6 billion, net of cash transferred, primarily related to the sale of our Collins military
GPS and space-based precision optics businesses. For additional detail, see “Note 2: Business Acquisitions, Dispositions, Goodwill
and Intangible Assets” within Item 8 of this Form 10-K.
Capital expenditures were $2.3 billion, $2.1 billion and $1.8 billion in 2022, 2021, and 2020, respectively. Capital expenditures
increased $154 million in 2022 compared to 2021, primarily due to investments in production facilities at Pratt & Whitney. Capital
expenditures increased $339 million in 2021 from 2020, primarily due to increases at RIS and RMD principally driven by the
Raytheon merger and increases at Pratt & Whitney.
Payments on customer financing assets were $150 million, $231 million, and $280 million in 2022, 2021 and 2020, respectively.
The decrease in payments in 2022 compared to 2021 was primarily due to fewer engines added to our leased asset pool. The
decrease in payments in 2021 compared to 2020 was due to fewer engines added to our leased asset pool, partially offset by
increased customer financing. Receipts from customer financing assets were $179 million, $389 million and $368 million in 2022,
2021 and 2020, respectively. The decrease in receipts in 2022 compared to 2021 was primarily driven by the absence of the prior
year sale and leaseback transaction. Receipts in 2021 were relatively consistent with 2020, as both periods included similar sale and
leaseback transactions for the sale of equipment. Refer to “Note 12: Leases” within Item 8 of this Form 10-K for additional
discussion of these transactions.
In 2022, 2021, and 2020 we increased other intangible assets by approximately $487 million, $308 million, $312 million,
respectively, which primarily relates to collaboration payment commitments made under our 2012 agreement to acquire Rolls-
Royce’s collaboration interests in International Aero Engines AG (IAE) and exclusivity payments made on contractual
commitments included within intangible assets that are amortized over the term of the underlying economic benefit. At
December 31, 2022, we had commercial aerospace financing and other contractual commitments, including exclusivity and
collaboration payment commitments, of approximately $15.3 billion, on a gross basis before reduction for our collaboration
partners’ share. Refer to “Note 18: Commitments and Contingencies” within Item 8 of this Form 10-K for further details on our
commercial aerospace financing and other contractual commitments.
As discussed in “Note 14: Financial Instruments” within Item 8 of this Form 10-K, we enter into derivative instruments primarily
for risk management purposes, including derivatives designated as hedging instruments and those utilized as economic hedges. We
operate internationally and in the normal course of business, are exposed to fluctuations in interest rates, foreign exchange rates and
commodity prices. These fluctuations can increase the costs of financing, investing and operating the business. We have used
derivative instruments, including swaps, forward contracts and options, to manage certain foreign currency, interest rate and
commodity price exposures. During 2022, 2021, and 2020 we had net cash payments of $205 million, $16 million, and $32 million,
respectively, from the settlement of these derivative instruments not designated as hedging instruments.
Investing Activities - Discontinued Operations
Cash flows used in investing activities from discontinued operations in 2022 and 2021 were not significant as the Separation
Transactions occurred on April 3, 2020. The $241 million decrease in cash flows used in investing activities from discontinued
operations in 2021 compared to 2020 was due to the fact that the Separation Transactions occurred in 2020.
52
Table of Contents
Cash Flow - Financing Activities
(dollars in millions) 2022 2021 2020
Net cash flows used in financing activities from continuing operations $(5,859)$(6,756)$(3,860)
Net cash flows provided by (used in) financing activities from discontinued operations — 71 (1,414)
Our financing activities primarily include the issuance and repayment of commercial paper and other short-term and long-term
debt, payment of dividends and stock repurchases.
2022 Compared with 2021 Financing Activities- Continuing Operations
The $0.9 billion change in cash flows used in financing activities in 2022 compared to 2021 was primarily driven by the absence of
2021 repayments of long-term debt, including debt extinguishment costs, net of issuances of $0.8 billion and an increase in
commercial paper borrowings, net of $0.7 billion, partially offset by an increase in share repurchases of $0.5 billion, as discussed
below.
2021 Compared with 2020 - Financing Activities- Continuing Operations
The $2.9 billion change in cash flows used in financing activities in 2021 compared to 2020 primarily relates to an increase in share
repurchases of $2.3 billion, as discussed below. In addition, in 2021, we had debt repayments, including debt extinguishment costs,
of $4.9 billion and long-term debt issuances of $4.1 billion.
Financing Activities- Continuing Operations
Included in cash flows from financing activities are payments related to our long term debt, including both interest and principal
payments. A summary of our long-term debt commitments as of December 31, 2022 was as follows:
 Payments Due by Period
(dollars in millions) 2023 2024 2025 Thereafter
Long-term debt—principal $ 588 $ 1,270 $ 1,590 $ 27,801 
Long-term debt—future interest 1,257 1,220 1,193 14,552 
Our share repurchases were as follows for the years ended December 31:
(dollars in millions; shares in thousands) 2022 2021 2020
$ Shares $ Shares $ Shares
Shares of common stock repurchased $ 2,803 29,943 $ 2,327 28,003 $ 47 330 
(1) Relates to share repurchases that were settled in cash during the period.
At December 31, 2022, management had remaining authority to repurchase approximately $6.0 billion of our common stock under
the December 12, 2022 share repurchase program. Under this program, shares may be purchased on the open market, in privately
negotiated transactions, under accelerated share repurchase programs, and under plans complying with Rules 10b5-1 and 10b-18
under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended. We may also reacquire shares outside of the program from time to time in
connection with the surrender of shares to cover taxes on vesting of restricted stock and as required under our employee savings
plan. Our ability to repurchase shares is subject to applicable law.
Our Board of Directors authorized the following cash dividends for the years ended December 31:
(dollars in millions, except per share amounts) 2022 2021 2020
Dividends paid per share of common stock $ 2.160 $ 2.005 $ 2.160 
Total dividends paid $ 3,128 $ 2,957 $ 2,732 
On February 3, 2023, the Board of Directors declared a dividend of $0.55 per share payable March 23, 2023 to shareowners of
record at the close of business on February 24, 2023.
Financing Activities - Discontinued Operations
Cash flows provided by financing activities from discontinued operations in 2022 and 2021 were not significant as the Separation
Transactions occurred on April 3, 2020. The $1.5 billion decrease in cash flows used in financing activities from discontinued
operations in 2021 compared to 2020 was due to the fact that the Separation Transactions occurred in 2020. (1)
53
Table of Contents
CRITICAL ACCOUNTING ESTIMATES
Preparation of our financial statements requires management to make estimates and assumptions that affect the reported amounts of
assets, liabilities, revenues and expenses. Management believes the most complex and sensitive judgments, because of their
significance to the Consolidated Financial Statements, result primarily from the need to make estimates about the effects of matters
that are inherently uncertain. The most significant areas involving management judgments and estimates are described below.
Actual results in these areas could differ from management’s estimates.
Long-Term Contract Accounting. We recognize revenue on an over-time basis for substantially all defense contracts and certain
long-term aerospace aftermarket contracts. We measure progress toward completion of these contracts on a percentage of
completion basis, generally using costs incurred to date relative to total estimated costs at completion. Contract costs are incurred
over a period of time, which can be several years, and the estimation of these costs requires management’s judgment. We review
our Estimates at Completion (EACs) at least annually or when a change in circumstances warrants a modification to a previous
estimate. For significant contracts, we review our EACs more frequently. Due to the nature of the work required to be performed on
many of the Company’s performance obligations, the estimation of total revenue and cost at completion is complex, subject to
many variables and requires significant judgment by management on a contract by contract basis. As part of this process,
management reviews information including, but not limited to, any outstanding key contract matters, progress towards completion
and the related program schedule, identified risks and opportunities and the related changes in estimates of revenues and costs. The
risks and opportunities relate to management’s judgment about the ability and cost to achieve the schedule, consideration of
customer-directed delays or reductions in scheduled deliveries, technical requirements, customer activity levels, such as flight hours
or aircraft landings, and related variable consideration. Management must make assumptions and estimates regarding contract
revenue and costs, including estimates of labor productivity and availability, the complexity and scope of the work to be performed,
the availability and cost of materials, including any impact from rising costs or inflation, the length of time to complete the
performance obligation, execution by our subcontractors, the availability and timing of funding from our customer, overhead cost
rates, and current and past maintenance cost and frequency driven by estimated aircraft and engine utilization and estimated useful
lives of components, among others. In particular, fixed-price development programs involve significant management judgment, as
development contracts by nature have elements that have not been done before and thus, are highly subject to future unexpected
cost changes. Cost estimates may also include the estimated cost of satisfying our industrial cooperation agreements, sometimes in
the form of either offset obligations or in-country industrial participation (ICIP) agreements, required under certain contracts. These
obligations may or may not be distinct depending on their nature. If cash is paid to a customer to satisfy our offset obligations it is
recorded as a reduction in the transaction price. Changes in estimates of net sales, cost of sales and the related impact to operating
profit on contracts recognized over time are recognized on a cumulative catch-up basis, which recognizes the cumulative effect of
the profit changes on current and prior periods based on a performance obligation’s percentage of completion in the current period.
A significant change in one or more of these estimates could affect the profitability of one or more of our performance obligations.
Our EAC adjustments also include the establishment of and changes to loss provisions for our contracts accounted for on a
percentage of completion basis.
Net EAC adjustments had the following impact on our operating results:
(dollars in millions, except per share amounts) 2022 2021 2020
Total net sales $ 152 $ 296 $ (407)
Operating profit (loss) (37) 110 (643)
Income (loss) from continuing operations attributable to common
shareowners (29) 87 (508)
Diluted earnings (loss) per share from continuing operations attributable to
common shareowners $ (0.02)$ 0.06 $ (0.37)
(1)    Amounts reflect a U.S. statutory tax rate of 21%, which approximates our tax rate on our EAC adjustments.
As a result of the Raytheon merger, Raytheon Company’s contracts accounted for on a percentage of completion basis were reset to
zero percent complete as of the merger date, because only the unperformed portion of the contract at the merger date represented
the obligation of the Company. This had the impact of reducing EAC adjustments for these segments in the short term period
following the merger, most notably in 2020. For additional information related to the Raytheon merger, see “Note 2: Business
Acquisitions, Dispositions, Goodwill and Intangible Assets” within Item 8 of this Form 10-K.(1)
(1)
54
Table of Contents
Costs incurred for engineering and development of certain aerospace products under contracts with customers are capitalized as
contract fulfillment costs, to the extent recoverable from the associated contract margin and customer funding, and subsequently
amortized as the products are delivered to the customer. The estimation of contract costs, and margin, considered as part of this
recoverability assessment requires significant judgment. See “Note 1: Basis of Presentation and Summary of Accounting
Principles” within Item 8 of this Form 10-K for further discussion. We regularly assess capitalized contract fulfillment costs for
impairment. In 2020, we recognized impairment of $111 million related to contract fulfillment costs in conjunction with the related
impacts of the COVID 19 pandemic.
Income Taxes. Management believes that our earnings during the periods when the temporary differences become deductible will
be sufficient to realize the related future income tax benefits, which may be realized over an extended period of time. For those
jurisdictions where the expiration date of tax carryforwards or the projected operating results indicate that realization is not likely, a
valuation allowance is provided.
In assessing the need for a valuation allowance, we consider available positive and negative evidence including past operating
results, projections of future taxable income, the feasibility of ongoing tax planning strategies and the realizability of tax loss
carryforwards. Our projections of future taxable income include estimates and assumptions regarding our volume, pricing, and
costs, as well as the timing and amount of reversals of taxable temporary differences. Valuation allowances related to deferred tax
assets can be affected by changes to tax laws, changes to statutory tax rates and future taxable income levels. In the event we were
to determine that we would not be able to realize all or a portion of our deferred tax assets in the future, we would reduce such
amounts through an increase to tax expense in the period in which that determination is made or when tax law changes are enacted.
Conversely, if we were to determine that we would be able to realize our deferred tax assets in the future in excess of the net
carrying amounts, we would decrease the recorded valuation allowance through a decrease to tax expense in the period in which
that determination is made.
In the ordinary course of business there is inherent uncertainty in quantifying our income tax positions. Significant judgment is
required when assessing our income tax positions and in determining our tax expense and benefits. Management assesses our tax
positions based on an evaluation of the facts, circumstances, applicable tax laws, including regulations, case law, and other
interpretive guidance, as well as any other relevant information. Adjustments to our tax positions are made as new information
becomes available or when our assessments change. In addition, we have entered into certain internal legal entity restructuring
transactions necessary to effectuate the Separation Transactions. We have accrued tax on these transactions based on our
interpretation of the applicable tax laws and our determination of appropriate entity valuations. See “Note 1: Basis of Presentation
and Summary of Accounting Principles” and “Note 13: Income Taxes” within Item 8 of this Form 10-K for further discussion.
Management has determined that the distributions of Carrier and Otis on April 3, 2020, and certain related internal business
separation transactions, qualified as tax-free under applicable law. In making these determinations, we applied the tax law in the
relevant jurisdictions to our facts and circumstances and obtained tax rulings from the relevant taxing authorities, tax opinions,
and/or other external tax advice related to the concluded tax treatment. If the completed distributions of Carrier or Otis, in each
case, or certain internal business separation transactions, were to fail to qualify for tax-free treatment, the Company could be
subject to significant liabilities, and there could be material adverse impacts on the Company’s business, results of operations,
financial condition and liquidity in future reporting periods.
Goodwill and Intangible Assets. The assets and liabilities of acquired businesses are recorded under the acquisition method of
accounting at their estimated fair values at the dates of acquisition. Goodwill represents costs in excess of fair values assigned to
the underlying identifiable net assets of acquired businesses. Intangible assets acquired in business combinations consist of patents,
trademarks/tradenames, developed technology, customer relationships, and other intangible assets. The fair value for acquired
customer relationship intangibles is determined as of the acquisition date based on estimates and judgments regarding expectations
for the future after-tax cash flows arising from the follow-on revenue from customer relationships that existed on the acquisition
date over their estimated lives, including the probability of expected future contract renewals and revenue, less a contributory assets
charge, all of which is discounted to present value. The fair value of the trademark and tradename intangible assets are determined
utilizing the relief from royalty method which is a form of the income approach. Under this method, a royalty rate based on
observed market royalties is applied to projected revenue supporting the tradename and discounted to present value using an
appropriate discount rate. See “Note 1: Basis of Presentation and Summary of Accounting Principles” within Item 8 of this Form
10-K for further details.
Also included within intangible assets are exclusivity assets, which are payments made to secure certain contractual rights to
provide products on new commercial aerospace platforms. At December 31, 2022, our exclusivity assets, net of accumulated
amortization, were approximately $2.6 billion, and our remaining estimated commitments, net of collaborator share, were
approximately $6.2 billion. We regularly assess the recoverability of these intangibles, which is dependent upon our
55
Table of Contents
assumptions around the future success and profitability of the underlying aircraft platforms including the associated aftermarket
revenue streams, and the related future cash flows.
Goodwill and intangible assets deemed to have indefinite lives are not amortized, but are subject to impairment testing annually, or
more frequently if events or changes in circumstances indicate the asset might be impaired. The impairment test compares carrying
values of the reporting units and indefinite-lived intangible assets to their estimated fair values. If the carrying value exceeds the
fair value, then the carrying value is reduced to fair value. In testing our reporting units and indefinite-lived intangible assets for
impairment, we may perform both qualitative and quantitative assessments. For the quantitative assessments that are performed for
goodwill, we utilize a combination of discounted cash flows (DCF) and market-based valuation methodologies. For the quantitative
assessments of indefinite-lived intangible assets, fair value is primarily based on the relief from royalty method. These quantitative
assessments incorporate significant assumptions that include sales growth rates, projected operating profit, terminal growth rates,
discount rates, royalty rates and comparable multiples from publicly traded companies in our industry. Such assumptions are
subject to variability from year to year and are directly impacted by, among other things, global market conditions.
We completed our annual goodwill impairment testing as of October 1, 2022 and determined that no adjustments to the carrying
value of goodwill were necessary. For those reporting units where we performed a quantitative test, we estimated the fair value of
our reporting units using a combination of DCF and market-based valuation methodologies. As noted above, these methodologies
involve significant assumptions that are subject to variability. The key assumptions used in our quantitative analysis include our
business projections, including revenue growth rates and operating profit margins, the long-term growth rate used to calculate the
terminal value of the reporting unit, the discount rate, and comparable multiples from publicly traded companies in our industry.
We consider both internal and external factors and refresh key assumptions annually or as considered necessary. Material changes
in these estimates could occur and result in impairments in future periods.
Based on our annual impairment analysis as of October 1, 2022, the reporting units that were closest to impairment were two
previously combined Collins reporting units with fair values in excess of book values, including goodwill, of 15% and 17%. The
combined value of goodwill allocated to these two reporting units is approximately $9.5 billion as of the date testing was
performed. All other reporting units had a fair value substantially in excess of book value. The Company continuously monitors and
evaluates relevant events and circumstances that could unfavorably impact the significant assumptions noted above, including
changes to U.S. treasury rates and equity risk premiums, tax rates, recent market valuations from transactions by comparable
companies, volatility in the Company’s market capitalization, and general industry, market and macro-economic conditions. It is
possible that future changes in such circumstances or in the inputs and assumptions used in estimating the fair value of our
reporting units, could require the Company to record a non-cash impairment charge.
In 2020, we recognized goodwill impairments of $3.2 billion related to two Collins reporting units. Refer to “Note 2: Business
Acquisitions, Dispositions, Goodwill and Intangible Assets” within Item 8 of this Form 10-K for additional details.
We also completed our annual indefinite-lived intangible assets impairment testing as of October 1, 2022 and determined that no
adjustments to the carrying value of these assets were necessary. As noted above, our indefinite-lived intangible assets impairment
analysis involves significant assumptions that are subject to variability. Material changes in these assumptions could occur and
result in impairments in future periods.
Contingent Liabilities. As described in “Note 18: Commitments and Contingencies” within Item 8 of this Form 10-K, contractual,
regulatory and other matters in the normal course of business may arise that subject us to claims or litigation, including with respect
to matters relating to technical issues on programs, government contracts, performance and operating cost guarantees, employee
benefit plans, legal, and environmental, health and safety matters. In particular, the design, development, production and support of
aerospace technologies is inherently complex and subject to risk. Technical issues associated with these technologies may arise in
the normal course and may result in financial impacts, including increased warranty provisions, customer contract settlements, and
changes in contract performance estimates. These impacts could be material to the Company’s results of operations, financial
condition and liquidity. Additionally, we have significant contracts with the U.S. government, subject to government oversight and
audit, which may require significant adjustment of contract prices. We accrue for liabilities associated with these matters when it is
probable that a liability has been incurred and the amount can be reasonably estimated. Estimating our liability based on both the
likelihood of any adverse judgments or outcomes, and the costs associated with these matters, requires significant judgment. The
inherent uncertainty related to the outcome of these matters could result in amounts materially different from any provisions made
with respect to their resolution.
Employee Benefit Plans. We sponsor domestic and foreign defined benefit pension and PRB plans. Assumptions used to calculate
our funded status are determined based on company data and appropriate market indicators. They are evaluated annually at
December 31 and when significant events require a mid-year remeasurement. A change in any of these assumptions
56
Table of Contents
or actual experience that differs from these assumptions are subject to recognition in pension and postretirement net periodic
benefit (income) expense reported in the Consolidated Financial Statements.
Assumptions used in the accounting for these employee benefit plans require judgement. Major assumptions include the discount
rate and EROA. Other assumptions include mortality rates, demographic assumptions (such as retirement age), rate of increase in
employee compensation levels, and health care cost increase projections.
The weighted-average discount rates used to measure pension and PRB liabilities are based on yield curves developed using high-
quality corporate bonds, which are subject to macroeconomic factors, as well as plan specific expected cash flows. For our
significant plans, we utilize a full yield curve approach in the estimation of the service cost and interest cost components of net
periodic benefit expense by applying the specific spot rates along the yield curve used in determination of the benefit obligation to
the relevant discounted projected cash flows.
The following table shows the sensitivity of our pension and PRB plan liabilities and net periodic benefit income to a 25 basis point
change in the discount rates for benefit obligations, interest cost and service cost as of December 31, 2022:
(dollars in millions)Increase in Discount 
Rate of 25 bpsDecrease in Discount 
Rate of 25 bps
Projected benefit obligation increase (decrease) $ (1,144)$ 1,194 
Net periodic benefit income increase (decrease) (23) 28 
The discount rate sensitivities assume no change in the shape of the yield curve that will be applied to the projected cash outflows
for future benefit payments in order to calculate interest and service cost. A flattening of the yield curve results in a narrowing of
the spread between interest and obligation discount rates and would decrease our net periodic benefit income. Conversely, a
steepening of the yield curve would result in an increase in the spread between interest and obligation discount rates and would
increase our net periodic benefit income.
The EROA is the average rate of earnings expected over the long term on assets invested to fund anticipated future benefit payment
obligations. In determining the EROA assumption, we consider the target asset allocation of plan assets, as well as economic and
other indicators of future performance. We consult with and consider the opinions of financial and other professionals in
determining the appropriate capital market assumptions. Return projections are validated using a simulation model that incorporates
yield curves, credit spreads and risk premiums to project long-term prospective returns. As a result of this analysis at year end 2022,
our weighted average pension EROA assumption for 2023 increased to 7.1%. Differences between actual asset returns in a given
year and the EROA do not necessarily indicate a change in the assumption is required, as the EROA represents the expected
average returns over a long-term horizon.
Net periodic benefit income is also sensitive to changes in the EROA. An increase or decrease of 25 basis points in the EROA
would have increased or decreased our 2022 net periodic benefit income by approximately $139 million.
Refer to “Note 11: Employee Benefit Plans” within Item 8 of this Form 10-K for discussion of current and prior year discount rate
and EROA assumptions.
ACCOUNTING STANDARDS
For a discussion of recent accounting pronouncements, see the Accounting Pronouncements section in “Note 1: Basis of
Presentation and Summary of Accounting Principles” within Item 8 of this Form 10-K.
COMMITMENTS AND CONTINGENCIES
Refer to “Note 18: Commitments and Contingencies” within Item 8 of this Form 10-K for discussion on contractual commitments
and contingencies.
GOVERNMENT MATTERS
As described above in “Critical Accounting Estimates—Contingent Liabilities,” our contracts with the U.S. government are subject
to audits. Such audits may recommend that certain contract prices should be reduced to comply with various government
regulations, or that certain payments be delayed or withheld. We are also the subject of one or more investigations and legal
proceedings initiated by the U.S. government with respect to government contract matters. See “Note 18: Commitments and
Contingencies” within Item 8 of this Form 10-K for further discussion of these and other government matters.
57
Table of Contents
ITEM 7A. QUANTITATIVE AND QUALITATIVE DISCLOSURES ABOUT MARKET RISK
Our primary market exposures are to fluctuations in foreign currency exchange rates and interest rates as it relates to our market
risk sensitive instruments, which are primarily cash, debt and derivative instruments. To quantify our market risk exposure, we
perform a sensitivity analysis based on hypothetical changes in foreign currency exchange rates and interest rates. Refer to “Note 1:
Basis of Presentation and Summary of Accounting Principles,” “Note 10: Borrowings and Lines of Credit” and “Note 14: Financial
Instruments” within Item 8 of this Form 10-K for additional discussion of foreign currency exchange, interest rates and financial
instruments.
Foreign Currency Exchange Rate Risk. We are subject to foreign currency exchange rate risk relating to receipts from customers
and payments to suppliers in foreign currencies and to various internal or external financing arrangements. We use foreign currency
forward contracts to hedge the price risk associated with firmly committed and forecasted foreign denominated payments and
receipts related to our ongoing business and financing. We actively manage foreign currency exposures that are associated with
committed foreign currency purchases and sales, and other assets and liabilities created in the normal course of business at the
operating unit level. More than insignificant exposures that cannot be naturally offset within an operating unit are hedged with
foreign currency derivatives. Foreign exchange exposures arising from intercompany loan and deposit transactions are also hedged
regularly. The aggregate notional amount of our outstanding foreign currency hedges was $11.2 billion and $8.5 billion at
December 31, 2022 and 2021, respectively. Foreign currency forward contracts are sensitive to changes in foreign currency
exchange rates. A 10% unfavorable exchange rate movement in our portfolio of foreign currency contracts would have resulted in
an increase in unrealized losses of $0.9 billion and $0.6 billion at December 31, 2022 and 2021, respectively. Such losses or gains
would be offset by corresponding gains or losses in the remeasurement of the underlying transactions being hedged. We believe
these foreign currency forward exchange contracts and the offsetting underlying commitments, when taken together, do not create
material market risk.
Within our aerospace business, our sales are typically denominated in U.S. Dollars. However, for our non-U.S. based entities, such
as Pratt & Whitney Canada (P&WC), a substantial portion of their costs are incurred in local currencies. Consequently, there is a
foreign currency exchange impact and risk to operational results as U.S. Dollars must be converted to local currencies such as the
Canadian Dollar in order to meet local currency cost obligations. Additionally, we transact business in various foreign currencies
which exposes our cash flows and earnings to changes in foreign currency exchange rates. In order to minimize the exposure that
exists from changes in the exchange rate of the U.S. Dollar against these other currencies, we hedge a certain portion of sales to
secure the rates at which U.S. Dollars will be converted. The majority of this hedging activity occurs at P&WC and Collins, and
hedging activity also occurs to a lesser extent at the remainder of Pratt & Whitney. At P&WC and Collins, firm and forecasted sales
for both original equipment and spare parts are hedged at varying amounts for up to 49 months on the U.S. Dollar sales exposure as
represented by the excess of U.S. Dollar sales over U.S. Dollar denominated purchases. Hedging gains and losses resulting from
movements in foreign currency exchange rates are partially offset by the foreign currency translation impacts that are generated on
the translation of local currency operating results into U.S. Dollars for reporting purposes. While the objective of the hedging
program is to minimize the foreign currency exchange impact on operating results, there are typically variances between the
hedging gains or losses and the translational impact due to the length of hedging contracts, changes in the sales profile, volatility in
the exchange rates and other such operational considerations.
Interest Rate Risk. We have financial instruments that are subject to interest rate risk, principally fixed-rate debt obligations. A
100 basis points unfavorable interest rate movement would have had an approximate $3 billion and $4 billion impact on the fair
value of our fixed-rate debt at December 31, 2022 and 2021. The investors in our fixed-rate debt obligations generally do not have
the right to demand we pay off these obligations prior to maturity. Therefore, we believe our exposure to interest rate risk on our
fixed-rate debt is not material. From time to time, we may hedge to floating rates using interest rate swaps. Currently, we do not
hold any derivative contracts that hedge our interest exposures, but may consider such strategies in the future.
58
Table of Contents
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA
MANAGEMENT’S REPORT ON INTERNAL CONTROL OVER FINANCIAL REPORTING
The management of RTC is responsible for establishing and maintaining adequate internal control over financial reporting. Internal
control over financial reporting is a process designed to provide reasonable assurance regarding the reliability of financial reporting
and the preparation of financial statements for external reporting purposes in accordance with accounting principles generally
accepted in the United States of America. Because of its inherent limitations, internal control over financial reporting may not
prevent or detect misstatements.
Management has assessed the effectiveness of RTC’s internal control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2022. In making
its assessment, management has utilized the criteria set forth by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway
Commission in its Internal Control—Integrated Framework, released in 2013. Management concluded that based on its
assessment, RTC’s internal control over financial reporting was effective as of December 31, 2022. The effectiveness of RTC’s
internal control over financial reporting, as of December 31, 2022, has been audited by PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP, an
independent registered public accounting firm, as stated in their report which is included herein.
/s/ GREGORY J. HAYES
Gregory J. Hayes
President and Chief Executive Officer
/s/ NEIL G. MITCHILL, JR.
Neil G. Mitchill, Jr.
Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer
/s/ AMY L. JOHNSON
Amy L. Johnson
Corporate Vice President and Controller
59
Table of Contents
REPORT OF INDEPENDENT REGISTERED PUBLIC ACCOUNTING FIRM
To the Shareowners and Board of Directors of Raytheon Technologies Corporation
Opinions on the Financial Statements and Internal Control over Financial Reporting
We have audited the accompanying consolidated balance sheets of Raytheon Technologies Corporation and its subsidiaries (the
“Company”) as of December 31, 2022 and 2021, and the related consolidated statements of operations, of comprehensive income
(loss), of changes in equity and of cash flows for each of the three years in the period ended December 31, 2022, including the
related notes and financial statement schedule listed in the index appearing under Item 15(a)(2) (collectively referred to as the
“consolidated financial statements”). We also have audited the Company’s internal control over financial reporting as of
December 31, 2022, based on criteria established in Internal Control - Integrated Framework (2013) issued by the Committee of
Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission (COSO).
In our opinion, the consolidated financial statements referred to above present fairly, in all material respects, the financial position
of the Company as of December 31, 2022 and 2021, and the results of its operations and its cash flows for each of the three years in
the period ended December 31, 2022 in conformity with accounting principles generally accepted in the United States of America.
Also in our opinion, the Company maintained, in all material respects, effective internal control over financial reporting as of
December 31, 2022, based on criteria established in Internal Control - Integrated Framework (2013) issued by the COSO.
Basis for Opinions
The Company’s management is responsible for these consolidated financial statements, for maintaining effective internal control
over financial reporting, and for its assessment of the effectiveness of internal control over financial reporting, included in the
accompanying Management’s Report on Internal Control over Financial Reporting. Our responsibility is to express opinions on the
Company’s consolidated financial statements and on the Company’s internal control over financial reporting based on our audits.
We are a public accounting firm registered with the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United States) (PCAOB) and
are required to be independent with respect to the Company in accordance with the U.S. federal securities laws and the applicable
rules and regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission and the PCAOB.
We conducted our audits in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we plan and perform the
audits to obtain reasonable assurance about whether the consolidated financial statements are free of material misstatement,
whether due to error or fraud, and whether effective internal control over financial reporting was maintained in all material respects.
Our audits of the consolidated financial statements included performing procedures to assess the risks of material misstatement of
the consolidated financial statements, whether due to error or fraud, and performing procedures that respond to those risks. Such
procedures included examining, on a test basis, evidence regarding the amounts and disclosures in the consolidated financial
statements. Our audits also included evaluating the accounting principles used and significant estimates made by management, as
well as evaluating the overall presentation of the consolidated financial statements. Our audit of internal control over financial
reporting included obtaining an understanding of internal control over financial reporting, assessing the risk that a material
weakness exists, and testing and evaluating the design and operating effectiveness of internal control based on the assessed risk.
Our audits also included performing such other procedures as we considered necessary in the circumstances. We believe that our
audits provide a reasonable basis for our opinions.
Definition and Limitations of Internal Control over Financial Reporting
A company’s internal control over financial reporting is a process designed to provide reasonable assurance regarding the reliability
of financial reporting and the preparation of financial statements for external purposes in accordance with generally accepted
accounting principles. A company’s internal control over financial reporting includes those policies and procedures that (i) pertain
to the maintenance of records that, in reasonable detail, accurately and fairly reflect the transactions and dispositions of the assets of
the company; (ii) provide reasonable assurance that transactions are recorded as necessary to permit preparation of financial
statements in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, and that receipts and expenditures of the company are
being made only in accordance with authorizations of management and directors of the company; and (iii) provide reasonable
assurance regarding prevention or timely detection of unauthorized acquisition, use, or disposition of the company’s assets that
could have a material effect on the financial statements.
60
Table of Contents
Because of its inherent limitations, internal control over financial reporting may not prevent or detect misstatements. Also,
projections of any evaluation of effectiveness to future periods are subject to the risk that controls may become inadequate because
of changes in conditions, or that the degree of compliance with the policies or procedures may deteriorate.
Critical Audit Matters
The critical audit matters communicated below are matters arising from the current period audit of the consolidated financial
statements that were communicated or required to be communicated to the audit committee and that (i) relate to accounts or
disclosures that are material to the consolidated financial statements and (ii) involved our especially challenging, subjective, or
complex judgments. The communication of critical audit matters does not alter in any way our opinion on the consolidated
financial statements, taken as a whole, and we are not, by communicating the critical audit matters below, providing separate
opinions on the critical audit matters or on the accounts or disclosures to which they relate.
Revenue Recognition - Contract Estimates at Completion
As described in Note 1 to the consolidated financial statements, a significant portion of the Company’s revenues of $67.1 billion for
the year ended December 31, 2022 are from long-term contracts associated with the design, development, manufacture or
modification of complex aerospace or defense equipment or related services. The timing of the satisfaction of performance
obligations varies across the Company’s businesses due to their diverse product and service mix, customer base, and contractual
terms. Substantially all of the Company’s revenues from the Raytheon Intelligence & Space and Raytheon Missiles & Defense
segments are recognized over time because of the continuous transfer of control to the customer. The Company’s revenues from
certain long-term aftermarket contracts within its Pratt & Whitney segment are recognized over the contract period as a series of
daily performance obligations to stand ready to provide spare parts, product maintenance and aftermarket services. For these
performance obligations satisfied over time, revenue is recognized on a percentage of completion basis using costs incurred to date
relative to total estimated costs at completion to measure progress. Due to the nature of the work required to be performed on many
of the Company’s performance obligations, the estimation of total revenue and cost at completion is complex, subject to many
variables and requires significant judgment by management on a contract by contract basis. Within the Raytheon Intelligence &
Space and Raytheon Missiles & Defense segments, the variables and significant judgments relate to key contract matters, progress
towards completion and the related program schedule, identified risks and opportunities and the related changes in estimates of
revenues and costs. The risks and opportunities for the contracts relate to management’s ability and cost to achieve the schedule,
consideration of customer-directed delays or reductions in scheduled deliveries, technical requirements, customer activity levels
and related variable consideration. Management also makes judgments about variables related to estimates of labor productivity
and availability, the complexity and scope of the work to be performed, the availability and cost of materials, including any impact
from rising costs or inflation, the length of time to complete the performance obligation, execution by the Company’s
subcontractors, the availability and timing of funding from the customer, overhead cost rates, and the estimated cost of satisfying
the Company’s industrial cooperation agreements required under certain contracts. Within the Pratt & Whitney segment, the
variables and significant judgments relate to current and past maintenance cost and frequency experience. Management reviews
contract estimates at completion on a periodic basis and no less than annually or when a change in circumstances warrants a
modification to a previous estimate.
The principal considerations for our determination that performing procedures relating to revenue recognition - contract estimates
at completion is a critical audit matter are (i) the significant judgment by management in developing their estimates of total revenue
and total costs at completion, including significant judgments and assumptions on a contract by contract basis, and (ii) a high
degree of auditor judgment, subjectivity, and effort in performing procedures and evaluating audit evidence related to
management’s estimates of total revenue and total costs at completion for contracts.
Addressing the matter involved performing procedures and evaluating audit evidence in connection with forming our overall
opinion on the consolidated financial statements. These procedures included testing the effectiveness of controls relating to the
revenue recognition process, including controls over the estimates of total revenue and total costs at completion. These procedures
also included, among others, testing management’s process for developing the estimated total revenue and total costs at completion,
including evaluating on a test basis the reasonableness of certain significant judgments and variables considered by management
specific to each contract or performance obligation. Evaluating the significant judgments and assumptions related to the estimates
of total revenue and total costs at completion involved evaluating whether the significant judgments and assumptions used were
reasonable considering: (i) management’s historical forecasting accuracy, (ii) evidence to support the relevant aforementioned
variables, (iii) the consistent application of accounting policies, and (iv) the timely identification of circumstances which may
warrant a modification to a previous estimate.
61
Table of Contents
Goodwill and Indefinite-lived Intangible Assets Impairment Assessments
As described in Notes 1 and 2 to the consolidated financial statements, the Company’s consolidated goodwill and indefinite-lived
intangible assets balances were $53.8 billion and $8.6 billion, respectively, as of December 31, 2022. A portion of the total goodwill
balance relates to certain reporting units of the Collins Aerospace segment. A portion of the total indefinite-lived intangible assets
balance relates to the Collins Aerospace segment. Goodwill and indefinite-lived intangible assets are subject to impairment testing
annually, or more frequently if events or changes in circumstances indicate the asset might be impaired. For the quantitative
assessments that are performed, fair value is primarily based on market-based valuation methods, income-based methods using a
discounted cash flow model, relief from royalty methods, or a combination of such. These assessments utilize significant
assumptions related to sales growth rates, projected operating profit, terminal growth rates, discount rates, royalty rates, and
comparable multiples from publicly traded companies in the aerospace and defense industry. The impairment testing compares
carrying values to estimated fair values. If the carrying value exceeds the fair value, then the carrying value is reduced to fair value.
The principal considerations for our determination that performing procedures relating to the goodwill and indefinite-lived
intangible assets impairment assessments is a critical audit matter are (i) the significant judgment by management when developing
the fair value estimates of certain reporting units and indefinite-lived intangible assets of the Collins Aerospace segment, (ii) a high
degree of auditor judgment, subjectivity, and effort in performing procedures and evaluating management’s significant assumptions
related to sales growth rates, discount rates, and comparable multiples from publicly traded companies in the aerospace and defense
industry, as applicable, and (iii) the audit effort involved the use of professionals with specialized skill and knowledge.
Addressing the matter involved performing procedures and evaluating audit evidence in connection with forming our overall
opinion on the consolidated financial statements. These procedures included testing the effectiveness of controls relating to
management’s goodwill and indefinite-lived intangible assets impairment assessments, including controls over the valuation of
certain reporting units and indefinite-lived intangible assets of the Collins Aerospace segment. These procedures also included,
among others (i) testing management’s process for developing the fair value estimates, (ii) evaluating the appropriateness of the
methodologies used to estimate fair value, (iii) testing the completeness and accuracy of underlying data used in developing the
estimates, and (iv) evaluating the reasonableness of the significant assumptions used by management related to sales growth rates,
discount rates, and comparable multiples from publicly traded companies in the aerospace and defense industry, as applicable.
Evaluating management’s assumptions related to sales growth rates involved evaluating whether the assumptions used by
management were reasonable considering (i) the current and past performance of the relevant businesses, (ii) the consistency with
external market and industry data, and (iii) whether these assumptions were consistent with evidence obtained in other areas of the
audit. Professionals with specialized skill and knowledge were used to assist in evaluating (i) the appropriateness of the Company’s
discounted cash flow, market-based valuation, and relief from royalty methods, and (ii) the reasonableness of the discount rates and
comparable multiples from publicly traded companies in the aerospace and defense industry assumptions.
/s/ PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP
Boston, Massachusetts
February 6, 2023
We have served as the Company’s auditor since 1947.
62
Table of Contents
RAYTHEON TECHNOLOGIES CORPORATION
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENT OF OPERATIONS
(dollars in millions, except per share amounts; shares in millions) 2022 2021 2020
Net sales:
Products sales $ 50,773 $ 49,270 $ 43,319 
Services sales 16,301 15,118 13,268 
Total net sales 67,074 64,388 56,587 
Costs and expenses:
Cost of sales - products 41,927 41,095 38,137 
Cost of sales - services 11,479 10,802 9,919 
Research and development 2,711 2,732 2,582 
Selling, general and administrative 5,663 5,224 5,540 
Total costs and expenses 61,780 59,853 56,178 
Goodwill impairment — — (3,183)
Other income, net 120 423 885 
Operating profit (loss) 5,414 4,958 (1,889)
Non-operating expense (income), net:
Non-service pension income (1,889) (1,944) (902)
Debt extinguishment costs — 649 — 
Interest expense, net 1,276 1,322 1,366 
Total non-operating expense (income), net (613) 27 464 
Income (loss) from continuing operations before income taxes 6,027 4,931 (2,353)
Income tax expense 700 786 575 
Net income (loss) from continuing operations 5,327 4,145 (2,928)
Less: Noncontrolling interest in subsidiaries’ earnings from continuing operations 111 248 181 
Net income (loss) from continuing operations attributable to common shareowners 5,216 3,897 (3,109)
Discontinued operations (Note 3)
Loss from discontinued operations (30) (10) (216)
Income tax expense (benefit) from discontinued operations (11) 23 151 
Loss from discontinued operations (19) (33) (367)
Less: Noncontrolling interest in subsidiaries’ earnings from discontinued
operations — — 43 
Loss from discontinued operations attributable to common shareowners (19) (33) (410)
Net income (loss) attributable to common shareowners $ 5,197 $ 3,864 $ (3,519)
Earnings (loss) per share attributable to common shareowners - basic
Income (loss) from continuing operations attributable to common shareowners $ 3.54 $ 2.60 $ (2.29)
Loss from discontinued operations (0.02) (0.03) (0.30)
Net income (loss) attributable to common shareowners $ 3.52 $ 2.57 $ (2.59)
Earnings (loss) per share attributable to common shareowners - diluted
Income (loss) from continuing operations attributable to common shareowners $ 3.51 $ 2.58 $ (2.29)
Loss from discontinued operations (0.01) (0.02) (0.30)
Net income (loss) attributable to common shareowners $ 3.50 $ 2.56 $ (2.59)
Weighted average number of shares outstanding:
Basic shares 1,475.5 1,501.6 1,357.8 
Diluted shares 1,485.9 1,508.5 1,357.8 
See accompanying Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
63
Table of Contents
RAYTHEON TECHNOLOGIES CORPORATION
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENT OF COMPREHENSIVE INCOME (LOSS)
(dollars in millions) 2022 2021 2020
Net income (loss) from continuing and discontinued operations $ 5,308 $ 4,112 $ (3,295)
Pension and postretirement benefit plans adjustments
Net actuarial gain (loss) arising during period 1,291 3,246 (202)
Prior service credit (cost) arising during period (131) (59) 2,095 
Amortization of actuarial loss and prior service cost 129 258 373 
Other 65 23 (51)
Pension and postretirement benefit plans adjustments 1,354 3,468 2,215 
Change in unrealized cash flow hedging (143) (254) 263 
Foreign currency translation adjustments (1,048) (647) 609 
Other comprehensive income, before tax 163 2,567 3,087 
Income tax expense related to items of other comprehensive income (266) (748) (547)
Other comprehensive income (loss), net of tax (103) 1,819 2,540 
Comprehensive income (loss) 5,205 5,931 (755)
Less: Comprehensive income attributable to noncontrolling interest 111 248 224 
Comprehensive income (loss) attributable to common shareowners $ 5,094 $ 5,683 $ (979)
See accompanying Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
64
Table of Contents
RAYTHEON TECHNOLOGIES CORPORATION
CONSOLIDATED BALANCE SHEET
(dollars in millions; shares in thousands) 2022 2021
Assets
Current assets
Cash and cash equivalents $ 6,220 $ 7,832 
Accounts receivable, net 9,108 9,661 
Contract assets 11,534 11,361 
Inventory, net 10,617 9,178 
Other assets, current 4,964 4,018 
Total current assets 42,443 42,050 
Customer financing assets 2,603 2,848 
Fixed assets, net 15,170 14,972 
Operating lease right-of-use assets 1,829 1,958 
Goodwill 53,840 54,436 
Intangible assets, net 36,823 38,516 
Other assets 6,156 6,624 
Total assets $158,864 $161,404 
Liabilities, Redeemable Noncontrolling Interest and Equity
Current liabilities
Short-term borrowings $ 625 $ 134 
Accounts payable 9,896 8,751 
Accrued employee compensation 2,401 2,658 
Other accrued liabilities 10,999 10,162 
Contract liabilities 14,598 13,720 
Long-term debt currently due 595 24 
Total current liabilities 39,114 35,449 
Long-term debt 30,694 31,327 
Operating lease liabilities, non-current 1,586 1,657 
Future pension and postretirement benefit obligations 4,807 7,855 
Other long-term liabilities 8,449 10,417 
Total liabilities 84,650 86,705 
Commitments and contingencies (Note 18)
Redeemable noncontrolling interest 36 35 
Shareowners’ equity:
Capital stock:
Preferred stock, $1 par value; 250,000 shares authorized; None issued or outstanding — — 
Common stock, $1 par value; 4,000,000 shares authorized; 1,710,960 and 1,708,065 shares
issued 37,939 37,483 
Treasury stock, 244,720 and 214,785 common shares at average cost (15,530) (12,727)
Retained earnings 52,269 50,265 
Unearned ESOP shares (28) (38)
Accumulated other comprehensive loss (2,018) (1,915)
Total shareowners’ equity 72,632 73,068 
Noncontrolling interest 1,546 1,596 
Total equity 74,178 74,664 
Total liabilities, redeemable noncontrolling interest and equity $158,864 $161,404 
See accompanying Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
65
Table of Contents
RAYTHEON TECHNOLOGIES CORPORATION
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENT OF CASH FLOWS
(dollars in millions) 2022 2021 2020
Operating Activities:
Net income (loss) from continuing operations $ 5,327 $ 4,145 $ (2,928)
Adjustments to reconcile net income (loss) from continuing operations to net cash flows provided by operating
activities:
Depreciation and amortization 4,108 4,557 4,156 
Deferred income tax benefit (1,663) (88) (99)
Stock compensation cost 420 442 330 
Net periodic pension and other postretirement income (1,413) (1,414) (413)
Debt extinguishment costs — 649 — 
Goodwill impairment charge — — 3,183 
Change in:
Accounts receivable 437 (570) 1,318 
Contract assets (234) (1,594) 63 
Inventory (1,575) 163 412 
Other current assets (1,027) (566) (445)
Accounts payable and accrued liabilities 2,075 917 (1,666)
Contract liabilities 846 1,372 1,129 
Global pension contributions (94) (59) (1,025)
Other operating activities, net (39) (812) 319 
Net cash flows provided by operating activities from continuing operations 7,168 7,142 4,334 
Investing Activities:
Capital expenditures (2,288) (2,134) (1,795)
Payments on customer financing assets (150) (231) (280)
Receipts from customer financing assets 179 389 368 
Investments in businesses (Note 2) (66) (1,088) (419)
Cash acquired in Raytheon merger — — 3,208 
Dispositions of businesses, net of cash transferred (Note 2) 94 1,879 2,556 
Increase in other intangible assets (487) (308) (312)
Payments from settlements of derivative contracts, net (205) (16) (32)
Other investing activities, net 94 145 49 
Net cash flows (used in) provided by investing activities from continuing operations (2,829) (1,364) 3,343 
Financing Activities:
Issuance of long-term debt 1 4,062 2,004 
Distribution from discontinued operations — — 17,207 
Repayment of long-term debt (3) (4,254) (16,082)
Debt extinguishment costs — (649) — 
Change in commercial paper, net (Note 10) 518 (160) 160 
Change in other short-term borrowings, net (29) 47 (2,201)
Dividends paid on common stock (3,128) (2,957) (2,732)
Repurchase of common stock (2,803) (2,327) (47)
Net transfers to discontinued operations — (71) (2,033)
Other financing activities, net (415) (447) (136)
Net cash flows used in financing activities from continuing operations (5,859) (6,756) (3,860)
Discontinued Operations:
Net cash used in operating activities — (71) (728)
Net cash used in investing activities — — (241)
Net cash provided by (used in) financing activities — 71 (1,414)
Net cash used in discontinued operations — — (2,383)
Effect of foreign exchange rate changes on cash and cash equivalents from continuing operations (42) (1) 54 
Effect of foreign exchange rate changes on cash and cash equivalents from discontinued operations — — (76)
Net (decrease) increase in cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash (1,562) (979) 1,412 
Cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash, beginning of year 7,853 8,832 4,961 
Cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash within assets related to discontinued operations, beginning of year — — 2,459 
Cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash, end of year 6,291 7,853 8,832 
Less: Restricted cash, included in Other assets 71 21 30 
Cash and cash equivalents, end of year $ 6,220 $ 7,832 $ 8,802 
Supplemental Disclosure of Cash Flow Information:
Interest paid, net of amounts capitalized $ 1,263 $ 1,339 $ 1,628 
Income taxes paid, net of refunds 2,400 1,124 1,716 
(1)    Amounts are inclusive of continuing operations and discontinued operations payments.
See accompanying Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements(1)
66
Table of Contents
RAYTHEON TECHNOLOGIES CORPORATION
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENT OF CHANGES IN EQUITY
(dollars in millions, except per share amounts; shares in thousands) 2022 2021 2020
Equity at January 1 $ 74,664 $ 73,852 $ 44,231 
Common Stock
Balance at January 1 37,483 36,930 23,019 
Common stock plans activity 485 553 417 
Common stock issued for Raytheon Company outstanding common stock and equity awards — — 10,897 
Adjustment to Common stock for the Otis Distribution — — 2,598 
Purchase of subsidiary shares from noncontrolling interest, net (29) — (1)
Balance at December 31 37,939 37,483 36,930 
Treasury Stock
Balance at January 1 (12,727) (10,407) (32,626)
Common stock plans activity — — 2 
Common stock repurchased (2,803) (2,331) (43)
Common stock issued for Raytheon Company outstanding common stock and equity awards — — 22,269 
Other — 11 (9)
Balance at December 31 (15,530) (12,727) (10,407)
Retained Earnings
Balance at January 1 50,265 49,423 61,594 
Net income (loss) 5,197 3,864 (3,519)
Adjustment to retained earnings for the Carrier Distribution — — (5,805)
Dividends on common stock (3,128) (2,957) (2,732)
Dividends on ESOP common stock (54) (50) (50)
Other (11) (15) (65)
Balance at December 31 52,269 50,265 49,423 
Unearned ESOP Shares
Balance at January 1 (38) (49) (64)
Common Stock plans activity 10 11 15 
Balance at December 31 (28) (38) (49)
Accumulated Other Comprehensive Loss
Balance at January 1 (1,915) (3,734) (10,149)
Other comprehensive income (loss), net of tax (103) 1,819 2,540 
Separation of Carrier and Otis — — 3,875 
Balance at December 31 (2,018) (1,915) (3,734)
Noncontrolling Interest
Balance at January 1 1,596 1,689 2,457 
Net income 111 248 224 
Less: Redeemable noncontrolling interest net income (loss) (8) (8) (4)
Dividends attributable to noncontrolling interest (132) (332) (159)
Sale (purchase) of subsidiary shares from noncontrolling interest, net (19) — 66 
Acquisition (disposition) of noncontrolling interest, net (13) (1) 1 
Separation of Carrier and Otis — — (865)
Capital contributions (distributions) 11 — (31)
Balance at December 31 1,546 1,596 1,689 
Equity at December 31 $ 74,178 $ 74,664 $ 73,852 
Supplemental share information
Shares of common stock issued under employee plans, net 2,894 1,893 2,689 
Shares of common stock repurchased 29,935 28,052 330 
Shares of common stock issued for Raytheon Company outstanding common stock and equity awards — — 652,638
Dividends declared per share of common stock $ 2.160 $ 2.005 $ 2.160 
See accompanying Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
67
Table of Contents
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
NOTE 1: BASIS OF PRESENTATION AND SUMMARY OF ACCOUNTING PRINCIPLES
The preparation of financial statements requires management to make estimates and assumptions that affect the reported amounts
of assets, liabilities, revenues and expenses. Actual results could differ from those estimates.
Separation Transactions, Distributions and Raytheon Merger. On April 3, 2020, United Technologies Corporation (UTC) (since
renamed Raytheon Technologies Corporation) completed the separation of its business into three independent, publicly traded
companies – UTC, Carrier Global Corporation (Carrier) and Otis Worldwide Corporation (Otis) (the Separation Transactions). UTC
distributed all of the outstanding shares of Carrier common stock and all of the outstanding shares of Otis common stock to UTC
shareowners who held shares of UTC common stock as of the close of business on March 19, 2020 (the Distributions).
Immediately following the Separation Transactions and the Distributions, on April 3, 2020, UTC and Raytheon Company
completed their all-stock merger of equals transaction (the Raytheon merger), pursuant to which Raytheon Company became a
wholly owned subsidiary of UTC, and UTC was renamed “Raytheon Technologies Corporation.” The historical results of Carrier
and Otis are presented as discontinued operations and, as such, have been excluded from both continuing operations and segment
results for all periods presented. Unless otherwise indicated, amounts and activity throughout these Consolidated Financial
Statements are presented on a continuing operations basis. Refer to “Note 3: Discontinued Operations” below for further details.
Unless the context otherwise requires, the terms “we,” “our,” “us,” “the Company,” “Raytheon Technologies,” and “RTC” mean
Raytheon Technologies Corporation and its subsidiaries. UTC was determined to be the accounting acquirer in the Raytheon
merger and, as a result, the financial statements of Raytheon Technologies for the year ended December 31, 2020 include Raytheon
Company’s financial position and results of operations for the period subsequent to the completion of the Raytheon merger on April
3, 2020.
Russia Sanctions. In response to the Russian military’s invasion of Ukraine on February 24, 2022, the U.S. government and the
governments of various jurisdictions in which we operate, including Canada, the United Kingdom, the European Union, and others,
have imposed broad economic sanctions and export controls targeting specific industries, entities and individuals in Russia. The
Russian government has implemented similar counter-sanctions and export controls targeting specific industries, entities and
individuals in the U.S. and other jurisdictions in which we operate, including certain members of the Company’s management team
and Board of Directors. These government measures, among other limitations, restrict transactions involving various Russian banks
and financial institutions and impose enhanced export controls limiting transfers of various goods, software and technologies to and
from Russia, including broadened export controls specifically targeting the aerospace sector. These measures have adversely
affected, and could continue to adversely affect, the Company and/or our supply chain, business partners or customers. As a result
of these sanctions on Russia and export controls, in the first quarter of 2022, we recorded pretax charges of $290 million, $210
million net of tax and the impact of noncontrolling interest, within our Collins Aerospace (Collins) and Pratt & Whitney businesses
primarily related to increased estimates for credit losses on both our accounts receivables and contract assets, inventory reserves
and purchase order obligations, impairment of customer financing assets for products under lease, impairment of contract
fulfillment costs that are no longer recoverable, and a loss on the exit of our investment in a Russia-based joint venture.
Additionally, we reversed approximately $1.3 billion of remaining performance obligations (RPO) in the quarter ended March 31,
2022 related to our sales contracts in Russia at Pratt & Whitney and Collins. We continue to monitor future developments,
including additional sanctions and other measures, that could adversely affect the Company and/or our supply chain, business
partners or customers.
Coronavirus Disease 2019 (COVID-19) Pandemic. The COVID-19 pandemic continues to negatively affect the global economy,
our business and operations, the labor market, supply chains, inflation, and the industries in which we operate. As a result of
COVID-19, commercial air travel demand experienced an unprecedented downturn as governments, businesses and individuals
reacted to the pandemic in ways such as lockdowns, quarantines, border closings and other travel restrictions and requirements, the
adoption of remote working and decreased leisure travel. The unprecedented decrease in air travel adversely affected our airline and
airframer customers and their demand for our products and services of our Collins and Pratt & Whitney businesses. In addition, the
border closings, lockdowns and labor shortages resulting from COVID-19 negatively impacted global supply and distribution
capabilities. Decreases in the availability of supplies, increases in the cost of supplies and delivery issues have caused shortages and
delays for the procurement of raw materials, components and other supplies required for our performance, although we continue to
see signs of ongoing recovery in commercial air travel. While we believe that the long-term outlook for the aerospace industry
remains positive due to the fundamental drivers of air travel demand, uncertainty continues with respect to when commercial air
traffic capacity will fully return to and/or exceed pre-COVID-19 levels. The pace of the commercial aerospace recovery is tied to
general economic conditions and may be impacted by inflation, an economic downturn, or government budget deficits, among
other factors, and may also be impacted by a resurgence of the pandemic and corresponding travel restrictions and protocols. Our
expectations regarding the COVID-19 pandemic and
68
Table of Contents
ongoing recovery and their potential financial impact are based on available information and assumptions that we believe are
reasonable at this time; however, the actual financial impact is highly uncertain and subject to a wide range of factors and future
developments.
In 2020, we recorded write-downs of assets and significant unfavorable Estimate at Completion (EAC) adjustments in our Collins
and Pratt & Whitney businesses primarily related to:
•goodwill impairment charges of $3.2 billion related to two of our Collins reporting units. Refer to “Note 2: Business
Acquisitions, Dispositions, Goodwill and Intangible Assets” for additional information;
•increased estimated credit losses on both our receivables and contract assets of $387 million;
•an unfavorable EAC adjustment on a Pratt & Whitney commercial engine aftermarket contract due to lower estimated
revenues driven by a change in the estimated maintenance coverage period of $334 million;
•contract asset and inventory impairments at Collins due to the impact of lower estimated future customer activity resulting
from the expected acceleration of fleet retirements of a certain commercial aircraft type of $146 million;
•an unfavorable EAC adjustment of $129 million related to lower estimated revenues due to the restructuring of a customer
contract at Pratt & Whitney;
•an $89 million impairment of commercial aircraft program assets at Pratt & Whitney;
•the impairment of a Collins trade name of $57 million;
•net unfavorable EAC adjustments on commercial aftermarket contracts at Pratt & Whitney based on a change in estimated
future customer activity of $75 million;
•an unfavorable EAC adjustment at Pratt & Whitney related to a shift in overhead costs to military contracts of $44 million;
and
•reserves related to a commercial financing arrangement at Pratt & Whitney of $43 million.
Summary of Accounting Principles. The following represents the significant accounting principles of Raytheon Technologies
Corporation.
Consolidation and Classification. The Consolidated Financial Statements include the accounts of Raytheon Technologies
Corporation, and all wholly owned, majority-owned and otherwise controlled domestic and foreign subsidiaries. All intercompany
transactions have been eliminated. For our consolidated non-wholly owned subsidiaries, a noncontrolling interest is recognized to
reflect the portion of equity that is not attributable to us. For classification of certain current assets and liabilities, the duration of
our contracts or programs is utilized to define our operating cycle, which is generally longer than one year. Included within our
Current assets and liabilities are Contract assets and liabilities related to our aftermarket and development arrangements, which can
generally span up to fifteen years.
We reclassified certain immaterial prior period amounts within the Consolidated Statement of Cash Flows to conform to our current
period presentation.
Use of Estimates. Our Consolidated Financial Statements are based on the application of U.S. Generally Accepted Accounting
Principles (GAAP), which require us to make estimates and assumptions about future events that affect the amounts reported in our
Consolidated Financial Statements and the accompanying notes. Actual results could differ from those estimates, and any such
differences may be material to our Consolidated Financial Statements. Estimates and assumptions are reviewed periodically and the
effects of changes, if any, are reflected in our Consolidated Financial Statements in the period they are determined.
Cash and Cash Equivalents. Cash and cash equivalents includes cash on hand, demand deposits and short-term cash investments
that are highly liquid in nature and have original maturities of three months or less. The estimated fair value of Cash and cash
equivalents approximates the carrying value due to their short maturities.
Accounts Receivable. Accounts receivable are stated at the net amount expected to be collected. We are exposed to credit losses
primarily on our accounts receivable and contract assets related to our sales of products and services to commercial customers. The
allowance for expected credit losses is established to provide for the expected lifetime credit losses by evaluating factors such as
customer creditworthiness, historical payment and loss experiences, current economic conditions, including geographic and
political risk, and the age and status of outstanding receivables. In certain circumstances, we may be able to develop reasonable and
supportable forecasts over the contractual term of the financial asset. For periods beyond which we are able to make or obtain
reasonable and supportable forecasts, we revert to historical loss experience and information.
We determine credit ratings for each customer in our portfolio based upon public information and information obtained directly
from our customers. We conduct a review of customer credit ratings, published historical credit default rates for different rating
categories, and multiple third-party aircraft value publications as a basis to validate the reasonableness of the allowance for
expected credit losses on a quarterly basis, or when events and circumstances warrant. A credit limit is established for each
69
Table of Contents
customer based on the outcome of this review and consideration of the other factors discussed above. In certain cases, we may
require collateral or prepayment to mitigate credit risk.
Expected credit losses are written off in the period in which the financial asset is no longer collectible.
Unbilled receivables represent revenues that are not currently billable to the customer under the terms of the contract and include
unbilled amounts under commercial contracts where payment is solely subject to the passage of time. These items are expected to
be billed and collected in the normal course of business. Accounts receivable as of December 31, 2022 and 2021 includes unbilled
receivables of $298 million and $342 million, respectively, which primarily includes unbilled receivables with commercial
aerospace customers. Other unbilled receivables where payment is subject to factors beyond just the passage of time are included in
Contract assets in the Consolidated Balance Sheet.
Contract Assets and Liabilities. Contract assets and liabilities represent the difference in the timing of revenue recognition from
receipt of cash from our customers. Contract assets reflect revenue recognized and performance obligations satisfied or partially
satisfied in advance of customer billing.
Contract liabilities relate to payments received in advance of the satisfaction of performance under the contract. We receive
payments from customers based on the terms established in our contracts.
Contract assets and Contract liabilities are generally classified as current as our operating cycle is generally longer than one year.
See “Note 6: Contract Assets and Liabilities” for further discussion of Contract assets and liabilities.
As described in more detail above in “Accounts Receivable,” we are exposed to credit losses on our contract assets related to our
sales of products and services to commercial customers and regularly assess our allowance for expected credit losses as it relates to
our Contract assets.
Inventory. Inventory is stated at the lower of cost or estimated realizable value and is primarily based on first-in, first-out (FIFO)
or average cost methods.
Valuation reserves for excess, obsolete, and slow-moving inventory are estimated by comparing the inventory levels of individual
parts to both future sales forecasts or production requirements and historical usage rates in order to identify inventory where the
resale value or replacement value is less than inventoriable cost. Other factors that management considers in determining the
adequacy of these reserves include whether individual inventory parts meet current specifications and can be substituted for a part
currently being sold or used as a service part, overall market conditions, and other inventory management initiatives.
Manufacturing costs are allocated to current production contracts. In our commercial aerospace businesses, excess costs beyond
standard manufacturing costs are expensed when they meet certain thresholds.
Equity Investments. Investments in entities we do not control are included in Other assets on the Consolidated Balance Sheet. For
investments where we have significant influence, we apply the equity method of accounting, and as such, our share of the net
earnings or losses of the investee is recorded. For investments where we do not have significant influence, we record them at cost
under the measurement alternative and record adjustments for observable price changes. Equity investment income and losses are
included in Other income, net on the Consolidated Statement of Operations since the activities of the investee are closely aligned
with our operations. We evaluate our equity investments whenever events or changes in circumstance indicate that the carrying
amounts of such investments may be impaired. If a decline in the value of an equity method investment is determined to be other
than temporary, a loss is recorded in earnings in the current period. Our sales to and purchases from unconsolidated entities
accounted for under the equity method, which are considered related parties, are not material.
Customer Financing Assets. Customer financing assets (CFA) relate to our commercial aerospace businesses in which we provide
financing to airline customers. Our financing predominantly relates to products under lease, and to a lesser extent, notes and lease
receivables. In certain limited circumstances, we pay deposits on behalf of our airline customers to secure production slots with the
airframers, and such pre-delivery payments are included in Accounts receivable, net, if current, and Customer financing assets, if
non-current, in our Consolidated Balance Sheet. Any unfunded pre-delivery payments are included within our commercial
aerospace financing commitments as further discussed in “Note 18: Commitments and Contingencies.” Interest income from notes
and financing leases and rental income from operating lease assets is generally included in Other income, net in the Consolidated
Statement of Operations, while gains or losses on sales of operating lease assets are included in Products sales and Cost of sales.
The current portion of these financing arrangements are aggregated in Accounts receivable, net and the non-current portion of these
financing arrangements are aggregated in CFA in the Consolidated Balance Sheet. The increases and decreases in CFA from
funding, receipts and certain other activity, are generally reflected as Investing Activities in the Consolidated Statement of Cash
Flows. Leased assets are valued at cost and reviewed for impairment when circumstances indicate that the related carrying amounts
may not be recoverable. Notes and lease receivables are valued at the net amount expected to be collected. For notes and lease
receivables, we determine a specific reserve for exposure based on the difference between the carrying value of the receivable and
the estimated fair value of the related collateral in connection with
70
Table of Contents
the evaluation of credit risk and collectability. As of December 31, 2022 and 2021, the reserves related to CFA were not material. At
December 31, 2022 and 2021, we did not have any significant balances that are considered to be delinquent, on non-accrual status,
past due 90 days or more, or considered to be impaired.
Fixed Assets, Net. Fixed assets, net, are stated at cost less accumulated depreciation. Major improvements are capitalized while
expenditures for maintenance, repairs and minor improvements are expensed. For asset sales or retirements, the assets and related
accumulated depreciation and amortization are eliminated from the accounts. Gains and losses on sales of our Fixed assets, net, are
generally recorded in operating income.
Business Combinations. Once a business is acquired, the fair value of the identifiable assets acquired and liabilities assumed is
determined with the excess cost recorded to goodwill. As required, a preliminary fair value is determined once a business is
acquired, with the final determination of the fair value being completed no later than one year from the date of acquisition.
In connection with the acquisitions of Rockwell Collins in 2018 and Goodrich in 2012, and to a lesser extent the acquisition of
Raytheon Company in 2020, we recorded assumed liabilities related to customer contractual obligations on certain contracts with
economic returns that were lower than what could be realized in market transactions as of the acquisition date. We measured these
assumed liabilities based on the estimated cash flows of the programs plus a reasonable contracting profit margin required to
transfer the contracts to market participants. These liabilities are being amortized in accordance with the underlying pattern of
obligations, as reflected by the expenses incurred on the contracts. The balance of the contractual obligations was $818 million and
$929 million at December 31, 2022 and 2021, respectively. Total consumption of the contractual obligations for the years ended
December 31, 2022, 2021 and 2020 was $111 million, $314 million and $295 million, respectively, with future consumption
expected to be as follows: $104 million in 2023, $80 million in 2024, $68 million in 2025, $67 million in 2026, $65 million in 2027
and $434 million thereafter.
Goodwill and Intangible Assets. Goodwill represents costs in excess of fair values assigned to the underlying net assets of
acquired businesses. Goodwill and intangible assets deemed to have indefinite lives are not amortized, but are subject to
impairment testing annually, or more frequently if events or changes in circumstances indicate the asset might be impaired. The
goodwill impairment test compares carrying values of the reporting units to their estimated fair values. If the carrying value
exceeds the fair value then the carrying value is reduced to fair value. In developing our estimates for the fair value of our reporting
units and indefinite-lived intangible assets, significant judgment is required in the determination of the appropriateness of using a
qualitative assessment or quantitative assessment. For the quantitative assessments that are performed, fair value is primarily based
on market-based valuation methods, income-based methods using a discounted cash flow model, relief from royalty methods, or a
combination of such. These assessments utilize significant assumptions including sales growth rates, projected operating profit,
terminal growth rates, discount rates, royalty rates, and comparable multiples from publicly traded companies in our industry. Such
assumptions are subject to variability from year to year and are directly impacted by, among other things, global market conditions.
Finite-lived intangible assets are tested for impairment when events occur that indicate that the net book value will not be recovered
over future cash flows.
Intangible assets consist of patents, trademarks/tradenames, customer relationships, exclusivity assets, developed technology and
other intangible assets including collaboration assets. Acquired intangible assets are recognized at fair value in purchase
accounting. Finite-lived intangible assets are amortized to Cost of sales and Selling, general and administrative expenses over the
applicable useful lives. Exclusivity assets are commercial aerospace payments made to secure certain contractual rights to provide
product on new aircraft platforms. We classify amortization of such payments as a reduction of sales. Such payments are capitalized
when there are distinct rights obtained and there are sufficient incremental cash flows to support the recoverability of the assets
established. Otherwise, the applicable portion of the payments are expensed. In addition, in connection with our 2012 agreement to
acquire Rolls-Royce’s ownership and collaboration interests in International Aero Engines AG (IAE), additional payments are due
to Rolls-Royce contingent upon each hour flown through June 2027 by the V2500-powered aircraft in service as of the acquisition
date. These flight hour payments are being capitalized as collaboration assets and amortized to cost of sales.
Useful lives of finite-lived intangible assets are estimated based upon the nature of the intangible asset and the industry in which
the intangible asset is used. These intangible assets are amortized based on the pattern in which the economic benefits of the
intangible assets are consumed, as represented by the underlying cash flows, which may result in an amortization method other than
straight-line. For both our commercial aerospace collaboration assets and exclusivity arrangements, the pattern of economic benefit
generally results in no amortization during the development period with amortization beginning as programs enter full rate
production and aftermarket cycles. If a pattern of economic benefit cannot be reliably determined or if straight-
71
Table of Contents
line amortization approximates the pattern of economic benefit, a straight-line amortization method may be used. The range of
estimated useful lives is as follows:
Years
Collaboration assets 30
Customer relationships and related programs 3 to 30
Developed technology 3 to 25
Patents and trademarks 5 to 30
Exclusivity assets 5 to 25
Leases. As a lessee, we record a right-of-use asset and a lease liability on the Consolidated Balance Sheet for leases with terms
longer than 12 months. Leases are classified as either finance or operating, with classification affecting the pattern of expense
recognition in the Consolidated Statement of Operations.
We enter into lease agreements for the use of real estate space, vehicles, information technology equipment, and certain other
equipment under both operating and finance leases. We determine if an arrangement contains a lease at inception. Operating leases
are included in Operating lease right-of-use assets and Operating lease liabilities, non-current on our Consolidated Balance Sheet.
The current portion of our operating lease liabilities is included in Accrued liabilities on our Consolidated Balance Sheet. Finance
leases are not considered significant to our Consolidated Balance Sheet or Consolidated Statement of Operations.
Right-of-use assets represent our right to use an underlying asset for the lease term and lease liabilities represent our obligation to
make lease payments arising from the lease. Lease right-of-use assets and liabilities are recognized at commencement date based on
the present value of lease payments over the lease term. As most of our leases do not provide an implicit rate, we use our
incremental borrowing rate based on the information available at commencement date in determining the present value of lease
payments, and use the implicit rate when readily determinable. We determine our incremental borrowing rate through market
sources including relevant industry rates. Our lease right-of-use assets also include any initial direct costs and lease pre-payments
made at or before the commencement date and are reduced for any lease incentives received at or before the commencement date.
Certain of our leases include variable payments, which may vary based upon changes in facts or circumstances after the start of the
lease. We exclude variable payments from lease right-of-use assets and lease liabilities, to the extent such payments are not
considered fixed, and instead, expense variable payments as incurred. Variable lease expense and lease expense for short duration
contracts are not a material component of lease expense. Some of our leases include the option to extend or terminate the lease. We
include these options in the recognition of our right-of-use assets and lease liabilities when it is reasonably certain that we will
exercise the option. Lease expense is generally recognized on a straight-line basis over the lease term.
In limited instances we act as a lessor, primarily for commercial aerospace engines, the majority of which are classified as
operating leases. These leases are not significant to our Consolidated Balance Sheet or Consolidated Statement of Operations.
Other Long-Lived Assets. We evaluate the potential impairment of other long-lived assets whenever events or changes in
circumstances indicate that the related carrying amounts may not be recoverable. If the carrying value of other long-lived assets
held and used exceeds the sum of the undiscounted expected future cash flows, the carrying value is written down to fair value. In
order for long-lived assets to be considered held for disposal, we must have committed to a plan to dispose of the assets. Once
deemed held for disposal, the assets are stated at the lower of the carrying amount or fair value.
Income Taxes. Future income taxes represent the tax effects of transactions which are reported in different periods for tax and
financial reporting purposes. These amounts consist of the tax effects of temporary differences between the tax and financial
reporting balance sheets and tax carryforwards. Future income tax benefits and payables within the same tax paying component of a
particular jurisdiction are offset for presentation in the Consolidated Balance Sheet. In the ordinary course of business there is
inherent uncertainty in quantifying our income tax positions. We assess our income tax positions and record tax benefits for all
years subject to examination based upon management’s evaluation of the facts, circumstances, and information available at the
reporting date. For those tax positions where it is more-likely-than-not that a tax benefit will be sustained, we have recorded the
largest amount of tax benefit with a greater than 50% likelihood of being realized upon ultimate settlement with a taxing authority
that has full knowledge of all relevant information. For those income tax positions where it is not more-likely-than-not that a tax
benefit will be sustained, no tax benefit has been recognized in the financial statements. Where applicable, associated interest
expense has also been recognized. We recognize accrued interest related to unrecognized tax benefits in interest expense. Penalties,
if incurred, would be recognized as a component of income tax expense. State income tax amounts are generally included in
income tax expense; however state income tax payments related to our Raytheon Intelligence & Space (RIS) and Raytheon Missiles
& Defense (RMD) segments are generally recoverable through the pricing of products and
72
Table of Contents
services to the U.S. government, and, accordingly, we have recorded the future recovery of these costs from the U.S. government
within Other assets, current in the Consolidated Balance Sheet. Accordingly, these state income taxes are generally allocated to
contracts and then classified as Selling, general and administrative expenses when paid (recovered) or otherwise agreed as allocable
with the U.S. government.
We have elected to account for tax on Global Intangible Low-Taxed Income (GILTI) as a period cost, as incurred.
Revenue Recognition. The vast majority of our revenues are from long-term contracts associated with the design, development,
manufacture or modification of complex aerospace or defense equipment or related services. Collins and Pratt & Whitney primarily
serve commercial and government customers in both the original equipment manufacturer (OEM) and aftermarket parts and
services markets of the aerospace industry, while RIS and RMD primarily provide products and services to government customers
in the defense industry.
We account for a contract when it has approval and commitment from both parties, the rights of the parties are identified, payment
terms are identified, the contract has commercial substance and collectability of consideration is probable. For certain contracts that
meet the foregoing requirements, primarily contracts that are directly with a foreign government, we are required to obtain certain
regulatory approvals. In these cases, we recognize revenue based on the likelihood of obtaining regulatory approvals based upon all
known facts and circumstances. A performance obligation is a promise in a contract with a customer to transfer a distinct good or
service to the customer. Some of our contracts with customers contain a single performance obligation, while others contain
multiple performance obligations most commonly when a contract contains multiple distinct units (such as engines or certain
aerospace components) or spans multiple phases of the product life-cycle such as production, maintenance and support. A contract’s
transaction price is allocated to each distinct performance obligation and recognized as revenue when, or as the performance
obligation is satisfied. When there are multiple performance obligations within a contract, we allocate the transaction price to each
performance obligation based on its standalone selling price when available. If standalone selling price is not available, we estimate
the standalone selling price of each performance obligation, which is generally based on an expected cost plus a margin approach.
We consider the contractual consideration payable by the customer and assess variable consideration that may affect the total
transaction price, including contractual discounts, contract incentive payments, estimates of award fees, flight hours, aircraft
landings or other customer usage activities on long term maintenance contracts, and other sources of variable consideration, when
determining the transaction price of each contract. When reasonably able to estimate, we include variable consideration in the
transaction price at the most likely amount to which we expect to be entitled. We include estimated amounts in the transaction price
to the extent it is probable that a significant reversal of cumulative revenue recognized will not occur when the uncertainty
associated with the variable consideration is resolved. These estimates are based on historical experience, anticipated performance
and our best judgment at the time. We also consider whether our contracts contain a significant financing component, which they
generally do not.
Timing of the satisfaction of performance obligations varies across our businesses due to our diverse product and service mix,
customer base, and contractual terms.
Performance obligations are satisfied as of a point in time for certain aerospace components, engines, and spare parts. Revenue is
recognized when control of the product transfers to the customer, generally upon product shipment. Since billing also typically
occurs upon product shipment, we generally do not have Contract assets or Contract liabilities balances related to point in time
sales.
Performance obligations are satisfied over-time if the customer receives the benefits as we perform work, if the customer controls
the asset as it is being produced (continuous transfer of control), or if the product being produced for the customer has no
alternative use and we have a contractual right to payment for performance to date. We recognize revenue on an over-time basis for
substantially all defense contracts and certain long-term aerospace OEM and aftermarket contracts.
Substantially all of our defense business revenue, which primarily relates to our RIS and RMD segments, and to a lesser extent
Pratt & Whitney and Collins, is recognized over time because of the continuous transfer of control to our customers. For
performance obligations satisfied over time, revenue is recognized on a percentage of completion basis generally using costs
incurred to date relative to total estimated costs at completion to measure progress. Incurred costs represent work performed, which
correspond with and best depict transfer of control to the customer. Contract costs can include labor, materials, subcontractors’
costs, or other direct costs and indirect costs. Our contracts with the U.S. government are typically subject to the Federal
Acquisition Regulation (FAR) and are priced based on estimated or actual costs of producing goods or providing services. The FAR
provides guidance on the types of costs that are allowable in establishing prices for goods and services provided under U.S.
government contracts. The pricing for non-U.S. government contracts is based on the specific negotiations with each customer.
Under the typical payment terms of our U.S. government fixed-price contracts, the customer pays us either performance-based
payments (PBPs) or progress payments. PBPs are interim payments equal to a negotiated percentage of the
73
Table of Contents
contract price based on quantifiable measures of performance or on the achievement of specified events or milestones. Progress
payments are interim payments up to 80-90% of costs incurred as the work progresses. Because the customer retains a portion of
the contract price until completion of the contract, our U.S. government fixed-price contracts generally result in revenue recognized
in excess of billings which we present as Contract assets on the Consolidated Balance Sheet. For our U.S. government cost-type
contracts, the customer generally pays us for our costs incurred within a short period of time. For non-U.S. government contracts,
we typically receive interim payments as work progresses, although for some contracts, we may be entitled to receive an advance
payment. Such advances are not considered a significant financing component because they are used to meet working capital
demands that can be higher in the early stages of a contract and to protect us from the other party failing to adequately complete
some or all of its obligations under the contract. We recognize a liability for advance payments in excess of revenue recognized and
present it as Contract liabilities on the Consolidated Balance Sheet.
For certain of our long-term aftermarket contracts, revenue is recognized over the contract period. We generally account for such
contracts as a series of daily performance obligations to stand ready to provide spare parts, product maintenance and aftermarket
services. These arrangements include the sale of spare parts with integral services to our customers, and are generally classified as
Services sales, with the corresponding costs classified in Cost of sales - services, within the Consolidated Statement of Operations.
Revenue is primarily recognized on a percentage of completion basis using costs incurred to date relative to total estimated costs at
completion to measure progress, as sufficient historical evidence indicates that the cost of performing services under the contract is
incurred on an other-than-straight-line basis. For some of our long-term aftermarket contracts, we receive payment prior to delivery
of products and services, resulting in a contract liability balance, while for others, we deliver products or services in advance of
payment, resulting in a contract asset balance.
Contracts are often modified to account for changes in contract specifications or requirements. We consider contract modifications
to exist when the modification either creates new or changes existing enforceable rights and obligations. Contract modifications for
goods or services that are not distinct are accounted for as part of the existing contract either on a cumulative catch-up basis or
prospective basis depending on the nature of the modification.
Loss provisions on contracts are recognized to the extent that estimated contract costs exceed the estimated consideration from the
products or services contemplated under the contractual arrangement. For new commitments, we generally record loss provisions at
contract signing except for certain contracts under which losses are recorded upon receipt of the purchase order that obligates us to
perform. For existing commitments, anticipated losses on contractual arrangements are recognized in the period in which losses
become evident. In estimating losses, products contemplated under contractual arrangements include firm quantities of product sold
under contract and, in the commercial engine and wheels and brakes businesses, future highly probable sales of replacement parts
required by regulation that are expected to be sold subsequently for incorporation into the original equipment. In our commercial
engine and wheels and brakes businesses, when the OEM product is sold for a loss, but the combined OEM and aftermarket
arrangement for each individual sales campaign is profitable, we record OEM product losses at the time of product delivery.
We review our Estimates at Completion (EACs) at least annually or when a change in circumstances warrants a modification to a
previous estimate. For significant contracts, we review our EACs more frequently. Due to the nature of the work required to be
performed on many of the Company’s performance obligations, the estimation of total revenue and cost at completion is complex,
subject to many variables and requires significant judgment by management on a contract by contract basis. As part of this process,
management reviews information including, but not limited to, any outstanding key contract matters, progress towards completion
and the related program schedule, identified risks and opportunities and the related changes in estimates of revenues and costs. The
risks and opportunities relate to management’s judgment about the ability and cost to achieve the schedule, consideration of
customer-directed delays or reductions in scheduled deliveries, technical requirements, customer activity levels, such as flight hours
or aircraft landings, and related variable consideration. Management must make assumptions and estimates regarding contract
revenue and costs, including estimates of labor productivity and availability, the complexity and scope of the work to be performed,
the availability and cost of materials, including any impact from rising costs or inflation, the length of time to complete the
performance obligation, execution by our subcontractors, the availability and timing of funding from our customer, overhead cost
rates, and current and past maintenance cost and frequency driven by estimated aircraft and engine utilization and estimated useful
lives of components, among others. In particular, fixed-price development programs involve significant management judgment, as
development contracts by nature have elements that have not been done before and thus, are highly subject to future unexpected
cost changes. Cost estimates may also include the estimated cost of satisfying our industrial cooperation agreements, sometimes in
the form of either offset obligations or in-country industrial participation (ICIP) agreements, required under certain contracts. These
obligations may or may not be distinct depending on their nature. If cash is paid to a customer to satisfy our offset obligations it is
recorded as a reduction in the transaction price.
Changes in estimates of net sales, cost of sales and the related impact to operating profit on contracts recognized over time are
recognized on a cumulative catch-up basis, which recognizes the cumulative effect of the profit changes on current and prior
periods based on a performance obligation’s percentage of completion in the current period. A significant change in one or
74
Table of Contents
more of these estimates could affect the profitability of one or more of our performance obligations. Our EAC adjustments also
include the establishment of and changes to loss provisions for our contracts accounted for on a percentage of completion basis.
Net EAC adjustments had the following impact on our operating results:
(dollars in millions, except per share amounts) 2022 2021 2020
Total net sales $ 152 $ 296 $ (407)
Operating profit (loss) (37) 110 (643)
Income (loss) from continuing operations attributable to common
shareowners (29) 87 (508)
Diluted earnings (loss) per share from continuing operations attributable to
common shareowners $ (0.02)$ 0.06 $ (0.37)
(1)    Amounts reflect a U.S. statutory tax rate of 21%, which approximates our tax rate on our EAC adjustments.
For additional discussion on significant unfavorable EAC adjustments in 2020, see the COVID-19 Pandemic discussion above.
As a result of the Raytheon merger, Raytheon Company’s contracts accounted for on a percentage of completion basis were reset to
zero percent complete as of the merger date, because only the unperformed portion of the contract at the merger date represented
the obligation of the Company. This had the impact of reducing EAC adjustments for these segments in the short term period
following the merger, most notably in 2020. For additional information related to the Raytheon merger, see “Note 2: Business
Acquisitions, Dispositions, Goodwill and Intangible Assets.”
In our Collins and Pratt & Whitney businesses, we may offer customers incentives to purchase our products, which may result in
payments made to those customers, which are treated as a reduction in sales.
In our Collins and Pratt & Whitney businesses, we incur contract fulfillment costs for engineering and development of aerospace
products directly related to existing or anticipated contracts with customers. Such costs generate or enhance our ability to satisfy
our performance obligations under these contracts. We capitalize these costs as contract fulfillment costs to the extent the costs are
recoverable from the associated contract margin and customer funding, and subsequently amortize the costs as the related
performance obligations are satisfied. In instances where intellectual property does not transfer to the customer, we generally defer
the customer funding of product engineering and development and recognize revenue when the related performance obligations are
satisfied. Capitalized contract fulfillment costs were $2.3 billion and $2.0 billion as of December 31, 2022 and 2021, respectively,
and are classified in Other assets, current in our Consolidated Balance Sheet and are included in Other current assets in our
Consolidated Statement of Cash Flows. We regularly assess capitalized contract fulfillment costs for impairment and recognized
$111 million of impairment for contract fulfillment costs in 2020 in conjunction with the related impacts of the COVID-19
pandemic. Costs to obtain contracts are not material.
In view of the risks and costs associated with developing new engines and the large up-front investments required that often require
returns generated over the full estimated life of the engine, Pratt & Whitney has entered into certain collaboration arrangements in
which sales, costs and risks are shared. Sales generated from engine programs, spare parts sales, and aftermarket business under
these collaboration arrangements are recorded consistent with our revenue recognition policies in our Consolidated Financial
Statements. Amounts attributable to our collaborators for their share of sales are recorded as cost of sales in our Consolidated
Financial Statements based upon the terms and nature of the arrangement. Costs associated with engine programs under
collaborative arrangements are expensed as incurred. Under these arrangements, collaborators contribute their program share of
engine parts, incur their own production costs and make certain payments for shared or joint program costs. The reimbursement
from collaborators of their share of program costs is recorded as a reduction of the related expense item at that time. As of
December 31, 2022, the collaborators’ interests in all commercial engine programs ranged from 13% to 49%, inclusive of a portion
of Pratt & Whitney’s interests held by other participants. Pratt & Whitney is the principal participant in all existing collaborative
arrangements, with the exception of the Engine Alliance (EA), a joint venture with GE Aviation, which provides aftermarket
support, spare parts, and service for the GP7000 engine for the Airbus A380 aircraft. There are no individually significant
collaborative arrangements, and none of the collaborators individually have more than a(1)
(1)
75
Table of Contents
25% share in an individual program. The following table illustrates the Consolidated Statement of Operations classification and
amounts attributable to transactions arising from the collaborative arrangements between participants for each period presented.
(dollars in millions) 2022 2021 2020
Collaborator share of sales:
Cost of sales - products $ 2,058 $ 1,534 $ 1,183 
Cost of sales - services 1,808 1,428 1,374 
Collaborator share of program costs (reimbursement of expenses incurred):
Cost of sales - products (154) (160) (147)
Research and development (182) (135) (177)
Selling, general and administrative (105) (85) (99)
Remaining Performance Obligations (RPO). RPO represents the aggregate amount of total contract transaction price that is
unsatisfied or partially unsatisfied. Total RPO was $175 billion as of December 31, 2022. In the quarter ended March 31, 2022, we
reversed approximately $1.3 billion of RPO related to our sales contracts in Russia due to global sanctions on and export controls
with respect to Russia, as further discussed above. Of the total RPO as of December 31, 2022, we expect approximately 25% will
be recognized as sales over the next 12 months. Approximately 45% of our RPO relates to long-term commercial aerospace
maintenance contracts at Pratt & Whitney, which are generally expected to be realized over a span of up to 15 years.
Research and Development. Company-sponsored research and development costs, including those costs related to the Company’s
portion in connection with cost-sharing arrangements, are charged to expense as incurred and recovery on these cost-sharing
arrangements is recorded as a reduction to research and development expense as earned. Customer-sponsored research and
development projects performed under contracts with customers are accounted for as contract costs and reported as cost of sales on
the related revenue generating contracts.
Foreign Exchange. We conduct business in many different currencies and, accordingly, are subject to the inherent risks associated
with foreign exchange rate movements. The financial position and results of operations of many of our foreign subsidiaries are
often measured using the local currency as the functional currency. Foreign currency denominated assets and liabilities are
translated into U.S. Dollars at the exchange rates existing at the respective balance sheet dates, and income and expense items are
translated at the average exchange rates during the respective periods. The aggregate effects of translating the balance sheets of
these subsidiaries are deferred as a separate component of Accumulated other comprehensive loss (AOCL) in Shareowners’ equity
on our Consolidated Balance Sheet. Foreign exchange transaction gains and losses are recorded in Other income, net on our
Consolidated Statement of Operations.
Derivatives and Hedging Activity. We use derivative instruments, including swaps, forward contracts and options, to help manage
certain foreign currency, and from time to time to help manage interest rate and commodity price exposures. Derivative instruments
are viewed as risk management tools by us and are not used for trading or speculative purposes. By their nature, all financial
instruments involve market and credit risks. We enter into derivative and other financial instruments with major investment grade
financial institutions and have policies to monitor the credit risk of those counterparties. We limit counterparty exposure and
concentration of risk by diversifying counterparties. While there can be no assurance, we do not anticipate any material non-
performance by any of these counterparties. We enter into transactions that are subject to enforceable master netting arrangements
or similar agreements with various counterparties. However, we have not elected to offset multiple contracts with a single
counterparty and, as a result, the fair value of the derivative instruments in a loss position is not offset against the fair value of
derivative instruments in a gain position.
Derivatives used for hedging purposes may be designated and effective as a hedge of the identified risk exposure at the inception of
the contract. All derivative instruments are recorded on the balance sheet at fair value. Derivatives used to hedge foreign currency
denominated balance sheet items are reported directly in earnings along with offsetting transaction gains and losses on the items
being hedged. Derivatives used to hedge forecasted cash flows associated with foreign currency commitments or forecasted
commodity purchases may be accounted for as cash flow hedges, as deemed appropriate. Gains and losses on derivatives
designated as cash flow hedges are recorded in other comprehensive income (loss) and reclassified to earnings as a component of
products sales or expenses, as applicable, when the hedged transaction occurs. Cash payments or receipts on derivatives designated
as cash flow hedges are recorded in Other operating activities, net within the Consolidated Statement of Cash Flows. To the extent
that a previously designated hedging transaction is no longer an effective hedge, any ineffectiveness measured in the hedging
relationship is recorded currently in earnings in the period it occurs.
To the extent the hedge accounting criteria are not met, the foreign currency forward contracts are utilized as economic hedges and
changes in the fair value of these contracts are recorded currently in earnings in the period in which they occur. Cash
76
Table of Contents
receipts or payments related to the settlement of derivatives not designated as hedging instruments are recorded as investing cash
flows within the Consolidated Statement of Cash Flows. Additional information pertaining to foreign currency forward contracts
and net investment hedging is included in “Note 14: Financial Instruments.”
Environmental. Environmental investigatory, remediation, operating and maintenance costs are accrued when it is probable that a
liability has been incurred and the amount can be reasonably estimated. The most likely cost to be incurred is accrued based on an
evaluation of currently available facts with respect to each individual site, including existing technology, current laws and
regulations and prior remediation experience. Where no amount within a range of estimates is more likely, the minimum is accrued.
For sites with multiple responsible parties, we consider our likely proportionate share of the anticipated remediation costs and the
ability of the other parties to fulfill their obligations in establishing a provision for those costs. Liabilities with fixed or reliably
determinable future cash payments are discounted. A portion of these costs is eligible for future recovery through the pricing of our
products and services to the U.S. government. We regularly assess the probability of recovery of these costs, which requires us to
make assumptions about the extent of cost recovery under our contracts and the amount of future contract activity with the U.S.
government. We consider such recovery probable based on government contracting regulations and our history of receiving
reimbursement for such costs, and accordingly have recorded the future recovery of these costs from the U.S. government within
Other assets, current in the Consolidated Balance Sheet. Accrued environmental liabilities are not reduced by potential insurance
reimbursements or potential recoveries from pursuing other parties. We also lease certain government-owned properties and
generally are not liable for remediation of preexisting environmental contamination at these sites. As a result, we generally do not
provide for these costs in our Consolidated Financial Statements. See “Note 18: Commitments and Contingencies” for additional
details on the environmental remediation activities.
Pension and Postretirement Obligations. U.S. GAAP requires balance sheet recognition of the overfunded or underfunded status
of pension and postretirement benefit (PRB) plans. Funded status is measured at least annually in the fourth quarter and represents
the difference between the plans’ projected benefit obligation (PBO) and the fair market value of the plans’ assets.
Changes to our pension and PRB plans’ funded status can result from company actions, such as contributions or changes in plan
provisions, or by gains and losses. Gains and losses are primarily a result of changes in assumptions and actual experience that
differs from these assumptions. Major assumptions include the discount rate and expected return on plan assets (EROA). These
gains or losses are recorded in other comprehensive income, net of tax effects, until they are amortized as a component of net
periodic benefit (income) expense.
A calculated “market-related value” of our plan assets is used to develop the amount of deferred asset gains or losses to be
amortized. The market-related value of assets is equal to the fair value of assets adjusted to reflect the recognition, and subsequent
amortization, of the difference between actual and expected asset returns over a five-year period. The market-related value of assets
is used to calculate the expected return on assets included in the net periodic benefit (income) expense.
The Company has elected to use the “corridor” approach in the amortization of gains and losses, which limits the expense
recognition to the net outstanding gains and losses in excess of the greater of 10% of the PBO or 10% of the market-related value of
assets. Gains and losses exceeding the corridor are amortized in net periodic benefit (income) expense over either the projected
average remaining employee service period or the projected average remaining lifetime of inactive participants depending on the
plan.
Net periodic benefit (income) expense is classified between operating and non-operating, whereby only the service cost component
is included in operating profit and the remaining components are included in Non-service pension (income) expense.
Product Performance Obligations. We extend performance and operating cost guarantees beyond our normal service and
warranty policies for extended periods on some of our products, particularly commercial aircraft engines. Liability under such
guarantees is based upon future product performance and durability. We accrue for such costs that are probable and can be
reasonably estimated. In addition, we incur discretionary costs to service our products in connection with product performance
issues. The costs associated with these product performance and operating cost guarantees require estimates over the full terms of
the agreements, and require management to consider factors such as the extent of future maintenance requirements, interval
between flight and repair time and the future cost of material and labor to perform the services. These cost estimates are largely
based upon historical experience. See “Note 17: Guarantees” for further discussion.
Government Grants. We may receive grants from various federal, state, local, and foreign governments in exchange for
compliance with certain conditions relating to our activities in a specific jurisdiction. Grants are often structured to encourage
investment, job creation, job retention, employee training, and other related activities. We recognize government grants when there
is reasonable assurance that the Company will comply with the conditions of the grant and the grant is received or is probable of
receipt and the amount is determinable. Government grants are recorded as a reduction to the related expense or
77
Table of Contents
asset to which the grant relates or recorded in Other income, net in our Consolidated Statement of Operations. Government grant
transactions are not material to our financial position, results of operations or liquidity.
Accounting Pronouncements. In September 2022, the Financial Accounting Standards Board (FASB) issued Accounting
Standards Update (ASU) 2022-04, Liabilities – Supplier Finance Programs (Subtopic 405-50): Disclosure of Supplier Finance
Program Obligations, which requires that a buyer in a supplier finance program disclose the key terms of supplier finance
programs, the amount of obligations outstanding at the end of the reporting period that the entity has confirmed as valid to the
finance provider, where these obligations are recorded in the balance sheet, and a roll forward of the obligations. The new standard
is effective for fiscal years beginning after December 15, 2022, on a retrospective basis, including interim periods within those
fiscal years. We are currently evaluating the impact of adopting this new pronouncement.
In November 2021, the FASB issued ASU 2021-10, Government Assistance (Topic 832): Disclosures by Business Entities about
Government Assistance, which requires business entities to make specific annual disclosures about transactions with a government.
The new standard is effective for fiscal years beginning after December 15, 2021. The adoption of this standard did not have an
impact on our disclosures.
In October 2021, the FASB issued ASU 2021-08, Business Combinations (Topic 805): Accounting for Contract Assets and Contract
Liabilities from Contracts with Customers, which requires an acquirer to apply the guidance in ASC 606, Revenue from Contracts
with Customers, to recognize and measure contract assets and contract liabilities in a business combination, rather than using fair
value. The new standard is effective for fiscal years, and interim periods within those fiscal years, beginning after December 15,
2022, with early adoption permitted. Effective January 1, 2022, we elected to early adopt the requirements of the new standard on a
prospective basis. The adoption of the standard did not have an impact on our financial position, results of operations or liquidity.
Other new pronouncements issued but not effective until after December 31, 2022 are not expected to have a material impact on
our results of operations, financial condition or liquidity.
NOTE 2: BUSINESS ACQUISITIONS, DISPOSITIONS, GOODWILL AND INTANGIBLE ASSETS
Business Acquisitions. Our investments in businesses, net of cash acquired, in 2022, 2021 and 2020 totaled $66 million,
$1.1 billion and $35.1 billion, respectively. Our investments in business in 2022 consisted of immaterial acquisitions. Our
investments in business in 2021 and 2020 primarily consisted of the acquisitions discussed below.
In November 2021, we completed the acquisitions of FlightAware and SEAKR Engineering Inc., for a total of approximately
$1.1 billion, net of cash received. FlightAware is a leading digital aviation company providing global flight tracking solutions,
predictive technology, analytics and decision-making tools, and is reported in the Collins segment. SEAKR Engineering Inc. is a
leading supplier of advanced space electronics and is reported in the RIS segment. In connection with these acquisitions, we
recorded $0.8 billion of goodwill and $0.3 billion of intangible assets.
In December 2020, we completed the acquisition of Blue Canyon Technologies, a leading provider of small satellites and spacecraft
systems components for $425 million, net of cash received. Blue Canyon Technologies is reported in the RIS segment. In
connection with this acquisition, we recorded $281 million of goodwill and $149 million of intangible assets.
Pro forma financial information and revenue from the date of acquisition have not been provided for these acquisitions as they are
not material either individually or in the aggregate.
Raytheon Merger. As discussed in “Note 1: Basis of Presentation and Summary of Accounting Principles”, on April 3, 2020, UTC
and Raytheon Company completed an all-stock merger of equals, following the completion by UTC of the Separation Transactions
and Distributions. Raytheon Company (previously New York Stock Exchange (NYSE): RTN) shares ceased trading prior to the
market open on April 3, 2020, and each share of Raytheon common stock was converted in the merger into the right to receive
2.3348 shares of UTC common stock, previously traded on the NYSE under the ticker symbol “UTX.” Upon closing of the
Raytheon merger, UTC’s name was changed to “Raytheon Technologies Corporation,” and its shares of common stock began
trading as of April 3, 2020 on the NYSE under the ticker symbol “RTX.”
Total consideration is calculated as follows:
(dollars in millions) Amount
Fair value of RTC common stock issued for Raytheon Company outstanding common stock and vested equity
awards $ 33,067 
Fair value attributable to pre-merger service for replacement equity awards 99 
Total merger consideration $ 33,166 
78
Table of Contents
The fair value of RTC common stock issued for Raytheon Company outstanding common stock and vested equity awards is
calculated as follows:
(dollars and shares in millions, except per share amounts and exchange ratio) Amount
Number of Raytheon Company common shares outstanding as of April 3, 2020 277.3
Number of Raytheon Company stock awards vested as a result of the Raytheon merger 0.4
Total outstanding shares of Raytheon Company common stock and equity awards entitled to merger consideration 277.7
Exchange ratio 2.3348
Shares of RTC common stock issued for Raytheon Company outstanding common stock and vested equity awards 648.4
Price per share of RTC common stock $ 51.00 
Fair value of RTC common stock issued for Raytheon Company outstanding common stock and vested equity
awards $ 33,067 
(1)    Represents Raytheon Company stock awards that vested as a result of the Raytheon merger, which is considered a “change in control” for purposes of the
Raytheon 2010 Stock Plan. Certain Raytheon Company restricted stock awards and Raytheon Company restricted stock unit (RSU) awards, issued under the
Raytheon 2010 Stock Plan vested on an accelerated basis as a result of the Raytheon merger. Such vested awards were converted into the right to receive RTC
common stock determined as the product of (1) the number of vested awards, and (2) the exchange ratio.
(2)    The exchange ratio is equal to 2.3348 shares of UTC common stock for each share of Raytheon Company common stock in accordance with the Raytheon
merger agreement.
(3)    The price per share of RTC common stock is based on the RTC opening stock price as of April 3, 2020.
Allocation of Consideration Transferred to Net Assets Acquired. We accounted for the Raytheon merger under the acquisition
method and are required to measure identifiable assets acquired and liabilities assumed of the acquiree (Raytheon Company) at the
fair values on the closing date. During the first quarter of 2021, based on the finalization of our valuation and internal reviews, we
completed the purchase price allocation which resulted in a net increase to goodwill of $61 million.
The final purchase price allocation, net of cash acquired, for the acquisition was as follows:
(dollars in millions)
Cash and cash equivalents $ 3,208 
Accounts receivable 1,997 
Contract assets 6,023 
Inventory 705 
Other assets, current 940 
Fixed assets 4,745 
Operating lease right-of-use assets 950 
Intangible assets 19,130 
Other assets 1,218 
Total identifiable assets acquired 38,916 
Accounts payable 1,477 
Accrued employee compensation 1,492 
Other accrued liabilities 1,921 
Contract liabilities 3,002 
Long-term debt, including current portion 4,700 
Operating lease liabilities, non-current 738 
Future pension and postretirement benefit obligations 11,607 
Other long-term liabilities 2,368 
Total liabilities acquired 27,305 
Total identifiable net assets 11,611 
Goodwill 21,589 
Redeemable noncontrolling interest (34)
Total consideration transferred $ 33,166 
Fair value adjustments to Raytheon Company’s identified assets and liabilities included an increase in fixed assets of(1)
(2)
(3)
79
Table of Contents
$1.1 billion and an increase to future pension and postretirement benefit obligations of $3.6 billion, primarily related to
remeasurement of the liability based on market conditions on the Raytheon merger closing date. In determining the fair value of
identifiable assets acquired and liabilities assumed, a review was conducted for any significant contingent assets or liabilities
existing as of the closing date. The assessment did not note any material contingencies related to existing legal or government
action.
The Separation Transactions included the transfer of certain defined benefit plans from UTC to Carrier and Otis. The plans
transferred were primarily international plans with the majority of the UTC defined benefit liability remaining with Raytheon
Technologies. Upon separation, the pension participants within Carrier and Otis were effectively terminated from Raytheon
Technologies. The terminations triggered a mid-year remeasurement of the UTC domestic plans. The remeasurement, which was
calculated using discount rates and asset values as of April 3, 2020 (using March 31, 2020 as a practical expedient), resulted in a
$2.4 billion increase to our pension liability, primarily due to a decrease in the fair market value of the plans’ assets since December
31, 2019. All service cost previously associated with Carrier and Otis was reclassified to discontinued operations. For non-service
pension (income) expense and pension liabilities, generally only the portions related to the defined benefit plans transferred to
Carrier and Otis as part of the Separation Transactions were reclassified to discontinued operations.
The fair values of the customer relationship intangible assets were determined by using a discounted cash flow valuation method,
which is a form of the income approach. Under this approach, the estimated future cash flows attributable to the asset are adjusted
to exclude the future cash flows that can be attributed to supporting assets, such as tradenames or fixed assets. Both the amount and
the duration of the cash flows are considered from a market participant perspective. Our estimates of market participant future cash
flows, which required significant management judgment, included forecasted revenue growth rates, remaining developmental
effort, operational performance including company specific synergies, program life cycles, material and labor pricing, and other
relevant customer, contractual and market factors. Where appropriate, the net cash flows were probability-adjusted to reflect the
uncertainties associated with the underlying assumptions, including cancellation rates related to backlog, government demand for
sole-source and recompete contracts and win rates for recompete contracts, as well as the risk profile of the net cash flows utilized
in the valuation. The probability-adjusted future cash flows were then discounted to present value, using an appropriate discount
rate that required significant judgment by management. The customer relationship intangible assets are being amortized based on
the pattern of economic benefits we expect to realize over the estimated economic life of the underlying programs. The fair value of
the tradename intangible assets were determined utilizing the relief from royalty method, which is a form of the income approach.
Under this method, a royalty rate based on observed market royalties is applied to projected revenue supporting the tradename and
discounted to present value, using forecasted revenue growth rate projections and a discount rate, respectively, that required
significant judgment by management. The tradename intangible assets were determined to have an indefinite life. The developed
technology intangible assets are being amortized based on the pattern of economic benefits.
The intangible assets included above consist of the following:
(dollars in millions) Fair Value Useful Life
Acquired customer relationships $ 12,900 25 years
Acquired tradenames 5,430 Indefinite
Acquired developed technology 800 5 to 7 years
Total identifiable intangible assets $ 19,130 
We also identified customer contractual obligations on loss making programs and recorded liabilities of $222 million related to
these programs based on the difference between the actual expected operating loss and a normalized operating profit. These
liabilities are being liquidated based on the expected pattern of expenses incurred on these contracts.
We recorded $21.6 billion of goodwill as a result of the Raytheon merger which primarily relates to expected synergies from
combining operations and the value of the existing workforce. The goodwill generated as a result of the Raytheon merger is
nondeductible for tax purposes.
Merger-Related Costs. Merger-related costs have been expensed as incurred. In 2021 and 2020, we recorded $17 million and
$142 million, respectively, of Raytheon merger transaction and integration costs. These costs were recorded in Selling, general and
administrative expenses within the Consolidated Statement of Operations.
Supplemental Pro-Forma Data. Raytheon Company’s results of operations have been included in RTC’s financial statements for
the period subsequent to the completion of the Raytheon merger on April 3, 2020. The following unaudited supplemental pro-forma
data presents consolidated information as if the Raytheon merger had been completed on January 1, 2019. The pro-forma results
were calculated by combining the results of Raytheon Technologies with the stand-alone results of Raytheon Company for the pre-
acquisition periods, which were adjusted to account for certain costs that would have been incurred during
80
Table of Contents
this pre-acquisition period. The results below reflect Raytheon Technologies on a continuing operations basis, in order to more
accurately represent the structure of Raytheon Technologies after completion of the Separation Transactions, the Distributions and
the Raytheon merger.
(dollars in millions, except per share amounts) 2020
Net sales $ 64,087 
Loss from continuing operations attributable to common shareowners (2,167)
Basic loss per share of common stock from continuing operations $ (1.43)
Diluted loss per share of common stock from continuing operations (1.43)
The unaudited supplemental pro-forma data above includes the following significant adjustments made to account for certain costs
which would have been incurred if the acquisition had been completed on January 1, 2019, as adjusted for the applicable tax
impact. As the merger was completed on April 3, 2020, the pro-forma adjustments in the table below only include the required
adjustments through April 3, 2020.
(dollars in millions) 2020
Amortization of acquired Raytheon Company intangible assets, net $ (270)
Amortization of fixed asset fair value adjustment (9)
Utilization of contractual customer obligation 8 
Deferred revenue fair value adjustment (4)
Adjustment to non-service pension (income) expense 239 
RTC/Raytheon fees for advisory, legal, accounting services 134 
Adjustment to interest expense related to the Raytheon merger, net 9 
Elimination of deferred commission amortization 5 
$ 112 
(1)    Reflects the additional amortization of the acquired Raytheon Company’s intangible assets recognized at fair value in purchase accounting and eliminates the
historical Raytheon Company intangible asset amortization expense.
(2)    Reflects the amortization of the fixed asset fair value adjustment as of the acquisition date.
(3)    Reflects the additional amortization of liabilities recognized for certain acquired loss making contracts as of the acquisition date.
(4)    Reflects the difference between prepayments related to extended arrangements and the fair value of the assumed performance obligations as they are satisfied.
(5)    Represents the elimination of unamortized prior service costs and actuarial losses, as a result of fair value purchase accounting.
(6)    Reflects the elimination of transaction-related fees incurred by RTC and Raytheon Company in connection with the Raytheon merger and assumes all of the
fees were incurred during the first quarter of 2019.
(7)    Reflects the amortization of the fair market value adjustment related to Raytheon Company.
(8)    Reflects the elimination of amortization recognized on deferred commissions that are eliminated in purchase accounting.
The unaudited supplemental pro-forma financial information does not reflect the potential realization of cost savings related to the
integration of the two companies. Further, the pro-forma data should not be considered indicative of the results that would have
occurred if the acquisition had been consummated on January 1, 2019, nor are they indicative of future results.
Dispositions. In 2022, 2021 and 2020 cash inflows related to dispositions were $94 million, $1.9 billion and $2.6 billion,
respectively. Our dispositions of businesses in 2022 were immaterial. Our dispositions of businesses in 2021 and 2020 consisted of
the dispositions discussed below and other immaterial dispositions.
In December 2021, we divested our global training and services business within our RIS segment for approximately $0.9 billion in
cash and other consideration, resulting in an aggregate pre-tax gain, net of transaction costs, of $251 million ($135 million after
tax), which includes a $12 million pre-tax gain recognized in Non-service pension income within the Consolidated Statement of
Operations.
In January 2021, we sold our Forcepoint business for proceeds of $1.1 billion, net of cash transferred. We did not recognize a pre-
tax gain or loss within the Consolidated Statement of Operations related to the sale of Forcepoint. The results of Forcepoint were
included in Eliminations and other in our segment results.
In the third quarter of 2020, in accordance with conditions imposed for regulatory approval of the Raytheon merger, we completed
the sale of our Collins military Global Positioning System (GPS) and space-based precision optics businesses for $2.3 billion in
cash, resulting in an aggregate pre-tax gain, net of transaction costs, of $580 million ($253 million after tax), of which $608 million
was included in Other income, net partially offset by $20 million of aggregate transaction costs included in(1)
(2)
(3)
(4)
 (5)
 (6)
 (7)
(8)
81
Table of Contents
Selling, general and administrative costs and an $8 million expense included in Non-service pension income within our
Consolidated Statement of Operations.
In May 2020, in order to meet the requirements for regulatory approval of the Raytheon merger, we completed the sale of our
airborne tactical radios business within our RIS segment for $231 million in cash, net of transaction-related costs. As the
transaction occurred subsequent to the Raytheon merger, the gain of $199 million was not recorded in the Consolidated Statement
of Operations, but rather was recorded as an adjustment to the fair value of net assets acquired in the allocation of consideration
transferred to net assets acquired in the Raytheon merger.
Goodwill. Changes in our goodwill balances for the year ended in 2022 were as follows:
(dollars in millions)Balance as of
January 1, 2022Acquisitions and
DivestituresForeign currency
translation and otherBalance as of
December 31, 2022
Collins Aerospace $ 31,384 $ (36)$ (629)$ 30,719 
Pratt & Whitney 1,563 — — 1,563 
Raytheon Intelligence & Space 9,813 26 2 9,841 
Raytheon Missiles & Defense 11,659 41 — 11,700 
Total Segment 54,419 31 (627) 53,823 
Eliminations and other 17 — — 17 
Total $ 54,436 $ 31 $ (627)$ 53,840 
The Company reviews goodwill for impairment annually or more frequently if events or changes in circumstances indicate the asset
might be impaired.
We completed our annual goodwill impairment testing as of October 1, 2022 and determined that no adjustments to the carrying
value of goodwill were necessary. For those reporting units where we performed a quantitative test, we estimated the fair value of
our reporting units using a combination of discounted cash flows and market-based valuation methodologies. As noted above, these
methodologies involve significant assumptions that are subject to variability. The key assumptions used in our quantitative analysis
include our business projections, including revenue growth rates and operating profit margins, the long-term growth rate used to
calculate the terminal value of the reporting unit, the discount rate, and comparable multiples from publicly traded companies in
our industry. We consider both internal and external factors and refresh key assumptions annually or as considered necessary.
Material changes in these estimates could occur and result in impairments in future periods.
Based on our annual impairment analysis as of October 1, 2022, the reporting units that were closest to impairment were two
previously combined Collins reporting units with fair values in excess of book values, including goodwill, of 15% and 17%. The
combined value of goodwill allocated to these two reporting units is approximately $9.5 billion as of the date testing was
performed. All other reporting units had a fair value substantially in excess of book value.
We considered the deterioration in general economic and market conditions primarily due to the COVID-19 pandemic to be a
triggering event in the first and second quarters of 2020, requiring an impairment evaluation of goodwill, intangible assets, net and
other assets in our commercial aerospace businesses, Collins and Pratt & Whitney. Beginning in the second quarter of 2020, we
observed several airline customer bankruptcies, delays and cancellations of aircraft purchases by airlines, fleet retirements and
repositioning of OEM production schedules and we experienced significant unfavorable EAC adjustments at our Collins and Pratt
& Whitney businesses due to a decline in flight hours, aircraft fleet utilization, shop visits and commercial OEM deliveries. These
factors contributed to a deterioration of our expectations regarding the timing of a return to pre-COVID-19 commercial flight
activity, which further reduced our future sales and cash flows expectations. In the second quarter of 2020, we evaluated the Collins
and Pratt & Whitney reporting units for goodwill impairment and determined that the carrying values of two of the six Collins
reporting units exceeded the sum of discounted future cash flows, resulting in goodwill impairments of $3.2 billion. Goodwill
impairment was not indicated for any of the other reporting units evaluated for impairment in any of these scenarios.
The Company continuously monitors and evaluates relevant events and circumstances that could unfavorably impact the significant
assumptions noted above, including changes to U.S. treasury rates and equity risk premiums, tax rates, recent market valuations
from transactions by comparable companies, volatility in the Company’s market capitalization, and general industry, market and
macro-economic conditions. It is possible that future changes in such circumstances or in the inputs and assumptions used in
estimating the fair value of our reporting units, could require the Company to record a non-cash impairment charge.
82
Table of Contents
Intangible Assets. Identifiable intangible assets are comprised of the following:
 2022 2021
(dollars in millions)Gross
AmountAccumulated
AmortizationGross
AmountAccumulated
Amortization
Amortized:
Collaboration assets $ 5,536 $ (1,408)$ 5,319 $ (1,173)
Exclusivity assets 2,911 (323) 2,673 (318)
Developed technology and other 1,202 (544) 1,214 (466)
Customer relationships 29,775 (8,967) 29,982 (7,411)
 39,424 (11,242) 39,188 (9,368)
Indefinite-lived:
Trademarks and other 8,641 — 8,696 — 
Total $ 48,065 $ (11,242)$ 47,884 $ (9,368)
We also completed our annual indefinite-lived intangible assets impairment testing as of October 1, 2022 and determined that no
adjustments to the carrying value of these assets were necessary. In 2020, given the deterioration in general economic and market
conditions primarily due to the COVID-19 pandemic, we performed an assessment of our indefinite-lived intangible assets and
recorded charges of $57 million related to the impairment of an indefinite-lived tradename intangible assets at Collins.
Amortization of intangible assets was $1,957 million, $2,439 million and $2,125 million in 2022, 2021 and 2020, respectively. The
following is the expected amortization of total intangible assets for 2023 through 2027:
(dollars in millions) 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027
Amortization expense $2,082 $2,203 $2,086 $2,002 $1,882
NOTE 3: DISCONTINUED OPERATIONS
As discussed above, on April 3, 2020, UTC separated into three independent, publicly traded companies – UTC, Carrier and Otis
and distributed all of the outstanding common stock of Carrier and Otis to UTC shareowners who held shares of UTC common
stock as of the close of business on March 19, 2020.
Carrier and Otis are presented as discontinued operations and, as such, have been excluded from both continuing operations and
segment results for all periods presented. Loss from discontinued operations is as follows:
(dollars in millions) 2022 2021 2020
Otis $ — $ — $ 187 
Carrier — — 196 
Separation related and other discontinued operations transactions (19) (33) (793)
Loss from discontinued operations attributable to common shareowners $ (19)$ (33)$ (410)
The following summarized financial information related to discontinued operations has been reclassified from Income from
continuing operations and included in Income (loss) from discontinued operations:
(dollars in millions) 2022 2021 2020
Otis
Products sales $ — $ — $ 1,123 
Services sales — — 1,843 
Cost of sales - products — — 913 
Cost of sales - services — — 1,157 
Research and development — — 38 
Selling, general and administrative expense — — 450 
Other income (expense), net — — (65)
83
Table of Contents
Non-operating expense (income), net — — 3 
Income from discontinued operations, before income taxes — — 340 
Income tax expense — — 116 
Income from discontinued operations — — 224 
Less: Noncontrolling interest in subsidiaries earnings from discontinued operations — — 37 
Income from discontinued operations attributable to common shareowners $ — $ — $ 187 
Carrier
Products sales $ — $ — $ 3,143 
Services sales — — 741 
Cost of sales - products — — 2,239 
Cost of sales - services — — 527 
Research and development — — 98 
Selling, general and administrative expense — — 669 
Other income (expense), net — — (30)
Non-operating expense (income), net — — 17 
Income from discontinued operations, before income taxes — — 304 
Income tax expense — — 102 
Income from discontinued operations — — 202 
Less: Noncontrolling interest in subsidiaries earnings from discontinued operations — — 6 
Income from discontinued operations attributable to common shareowners $ — $ — $ 196 
Separation related and other discontinued operations transactions
Selling, general and administrative expense $ — $ 10 $ 151 
Other income (expense), net (30) — (709)
Loss from discontinued operations, before income taxes (30) (10) (860)
Income tax (benefit) expense (11) 23 (67)
Loss from discontinued operations, net of tax (19) (33) (793)
Total loss from discontinued operations attributable to common shareowners $ (19)$ (33)$ (410)
(1)    Primarily reflects unallocable transaction costs incurred by the Company primarily related to professional services costs pertaining to the Separation
Transactions and the establishment of Carrier and Otis as stand-alone public companies, facility relocation costs, costs to separate information systems, costs
of retention bonuses and tax charges and benefits related to separation activities. In addition, 2020 includes debt extinguishment costs related to the Company’s
paydown of debt to not exceed the maximum applicable net indebtedness under the Raytheon merger agreement.
Selected financial information related to cash flows from discontinued operations is as follows:
(dollars in millions) 2022 2021 2020
Net cash flows used in operating activities from discontinued operations $ — $ (71)$ (728)
Net cash flows used in investing activities from discontinued operations — — (241)
Net cash flows provided by (used in) financing activities from discontinued
operations — 71 (1,414)
Net cash flows used in operating activities from discontinued operations includes the net operating cash flows of Carrier and Otis
prior to the Separation Transactions, as well as costs incurred by the Company primarily related to professional services pertaining
to the Separation Transactions and the establishment of Carrier and Otis as stand-alone public companies, facility relocation costs,
costs to separate information systems, costs of retention bonuses and tax charges related to separation activities. Net cash flows
provided by (used in) financing activities from discontinued operations primarily consists of net cash transfers from Carrier and
Otis to the Company, as well as debt extinguishment costs related to the early repayment of debt in 2020.
The Separation of Carrier was treated as a return on capital and recorded as a reduction to retained earnings, as it was in a net asset
position, while the Separation of Otis was treated as a return of capital and recorded as an adjustment to Common stock, as it was in
a net liability position.(1)
84
Table of Contents
NOTE 4: EARNINGS PER SHARE
(dollars in millions, except per share amounts; shares in millions) 2022 2021 2020
Net income (loss) attributable to common shareowners:
Income (loss) from continuing operations $ 5,216 $ 3,897 $ (3,109)
Loss from discontinued operations (19) (33) (410)
Net income (loss) attributable to common shareowners $ 5,197 $ 3,864 $ (3,519)
Basic weighted average number of shares outstanding 1,475.5 1,501.6 1,357.8 
Stock awards and equity units (share equivalent) 10.4 6.9 — 
Diluted weighted average number of shares outstanding 1,485.9 1,508.5 1,357.8 
Earnings (Loss) per share attributable to common shareowners - basic
Income (loss) from continuing operations $ 3.54 $ 2.60 $ (2.29)
Loss from discontinued operations (0.02) (0.03) (0.30)
Net income (loss) attributable to common shareowners $ 3.52 $ 2.57 $ (2.59)
Earnings (Loss) per share attributable to common shareowners - diluted
Income (loss) from continuing operations $ 3.51 $ 2.58 $ (2.29)
Loss from discontinued operations (0.01) (0.02) (0.30)
Net income (loss) attributable to common shareowners $ 3.50 $ 2.56 $ (2.59)
The computation of diluted EPS excludes the effect of the potential exercise of stock awards, including stock appreciation rights
and stock options, when the average market price of the common stock is lower than the exercise price of the related stock awards
during the period because the effect would be anti-dilutive. In addition, the computation of diluted EPS excludes the effect of the
potential exercise of stock awards when the awards’ assumed proceeds exceed the average market price of the common shares
during the period. For 2022 and 2021, there were 6.2 million and 13.4 million stock awards excluded from the computation,
respectively. For 2020, all stock awards were excluded from the computation of diluted EPS because their effect was antidilutive
due to the loss from continuing operations, and amounted to 32.5 million stock awards.
NOTE 5: ACCOUNTS RECEIVABLE, NET
Accounts receivable, net consisted of the following:
(dollars in millions) 2022 2021
U.S. government contracts (including foreign military sales) $ 1,371 $ 1,204 
Other customers 8,189 8,932 
Allowance for expected credit losses (452) (475)
Total accounts receivable, net $ 9,108 $ 9,661 
The changes in the allowance for expected credit losses related to Accounts receivable were as follows:
(dollars in millions) 2022 2021
Balance as of January 1 $ 475 $ 546 
Current period provision for expected credit losses, net of recoveries 26 (47)
Write-offs charged against the allowance for expected credit losses (42) (18)
Other, net (7) (6)
Balance as of December 31 $ 452 $ 475 
NOTE 6: CONTRACT ASSETS AND LIABILITIES
Contract assets reflect revenue recognized and performance obligations satisfied in advance of customer billing. Contract liabilities
relate to payments received in advance of the satisfaction of performance under the contract. We receive payments
85
Table of Contents
from customers based on the terms established in our contracts. Total contract assets and contract liabilities as of December 31,
2022 and 2021 are as follows:
(dollars in millions) 2022 2021
Contract assets $ 11,534 $ 11,361 
Contract liabilities (14,598) (13,720)
Net contract liabilities $ (3,064)$ (2,359)
Contract assets increased $173 million during 2022 primarily due to sales in excess of billings at Pratt & Whitney, partially offset
by contractual billing terms on U.S. government and foreign military sales contracts at RMD. Contract liabilities increased $878
million during 2022 primarily due to billings in excess of sales at Pratt & Whitney and RMD.
In 2022, 2021 and 2020, we recognized revenue of $4.8 billion, $4.3 billion and $2.8 billion related to our Contract liabilities at
January 1, 2022, January 1, 2021 and January 1, 2020, respectively.
As of December 31, 2022, our Contract liabilities include approximately $385 million of advance payments received from a Middle
East customer on contracts for which we no longer believe we will be able to execute on or obtain required regulatory approvals.
These advance payments may become refundable to the customer if the contracts are ultimately terminated. In addition, as of
December 31, 2022, our Contract liabilities include advance payments, in immaterial amounts, received from Russian customers on
contracts we are currently unable to perform on due to global sanctions on Russia and export controls. Depending on the
contractual terms and as allowed by sanctions, certain of these advance payments may become refundable.
Contract assets consisted of the following at December 31:
(dollars in millions) 2022 2021
Unbilled $ 23,909 $ 23,652 
Progress payments (12,375) (12,291)
Total contract assets $ 11,534 $ 11,361 
The U.S. government has title to the assets related to unbilled amounts on U.S. government contracts that provide progress
payments.
Contract assets are net of an allowance for expected credit losses of $318 million and $251 million as of December 31, 2022 and
2021, respectively. The allowance for expected credit losses activity was not material in 2022 or 2021.
NOTE 7: INVENTORY, NET
(dollars in millions) 2022 2021
Raw materials $ 3,477 $ 3,024 
Work-in-process 3,839 3,085 
Finished goods 3,301 3,069 
Total inventory, net $ 10,617 $ 9,178 
Raw materials, work-in-process and finished goods are net of total valuation reserves of $2.2 billion and $2.0 billion as of
December 31, 2022 and 2021, respectively.
NOTE 8: COMMERCIAL AEROSPACE INDUSTRY ASSETS AND COMMITMENTS
The COVID-19 pandemic continues to negatively affect the global economy, our business and operations, and the industries in
which we operate. The pandemic and government, business and individual actions in response, including lockdowns, quarantines,
border closings and other travel restrictions and requirements, remote working, facilities closures and reduced business and leisure
travel, led to significant declines in demand for commercial air travel. The decrease in commercial air travel decreased demand for
our commercial aerospace products and services of our Collins and Pratt & Whitney businesses. Refer to “Note 1: Basis of
Presentation and Summary of Accounting Principles” for further details. While we have seen indications that commercial air travel
is recovering, we continue to closely monitor our commercial aerospace assets for
86
Table of Contents
recoverability and our off-balance sheet exposures. The following summarizes certain significant assets and off-balance sheet
exposures specifically related to our commercial aerospace customers as of December 31:
(dollars in millions) 2022 2021
Assets related to commercial aerospace industry customers:
Accounts receivable, net (Note 5) $ 6,653 $ 7,235 
Contract assets (Note 6) 4,274 3,264 
Customer financing assets (Note 1) 2,700 2,945 
Contract fulfillment costs (Note 1) 1,962 1,711 
Guarantees and commitments related to commercial aerospace industry customers:
Commercial aerospace guarantees (net of reserves and collaboration partners’ share) (Note 17) 164 165 
Commercial aerospace commitments (net of collaboration partners’ share) (Note 18) 9,364 9,659 
(1)     Customer financing assets is inclusive of both the current and long term balances.
We also have goodwill and intangible assets, including exclusivity assets and collaboration assets, associated with our commercial
aerospace business. Refer to “Note 2: Business Acquisitions, Dispositions, Goodwill and Intangible Assets” for further discussion.
NOTE 9: FIXED ASSETS, NET
Fixed assets, net, consisted of the following:
(dollars in millions)Estimated
Useful Lives 2022 2021
Land $ 744 $ 765 
Buildings and improvements 10-45 years 7,519 7,271 
Machinery, tools and equipment 3-20 years 17,479 16,729 
Other, including assets under construction  3,374 2,872 
Fixed assets, gross 29,116 27,637 
Accumulated depreciation  (13,946) (12,665)
Fixed assets, net $ 15,170 $ 14,972 
Leasehold improvements are amortized over the lesser of the remaining lease term or the estimated useful life of the improvement.
Depreciation expense related to Fixed assets, net is recorded predominantly utilizing the straight-line method and was $1,843
million in 2022, $1,828 million in 2021 and $1,767 million in 2020.
NOTE 10: BORROWINGS AND LINES OF CREDIT
As of December 31, 2022, we had revolving credit agreements with various banks permitting aggregate borrowings of up to $7.0
billion, consisting of a $5.0 billion revolving credit agreement, which expires in April 2025, and a $2.0 billion revolving credit
agreement, which was renewed in September 2022 and expires in September 2023. As of December 31, 2022, there were no
borrowings outstanding under these agreements. In addition, at December 31, 2022, approximately $0.8 billion was available under
short-term lines of credit with local banks at our various domestic and international subsidiaries.
From time to time, we use commercial paper borrowings for general corporate purposes, including the funding of potential
acquisitions, pension contributions, debt refinancing, dividend payments and repurchases of our common stock. The commercial
paper notes have original maturities of not more than 364 days from the date of issuance. As of December 31, 2022, our maximum
commercial paper borrowing limit was $5.0 billion as the commercial paper is backed by our $5.0 billion revolving credit
agreement. We had $524 million of commercial paper outstanding at December 31, 2022, which is reflected in Short-term
borrowings in our Consolidated Balance Sheet. At December 31, 2022, short-term commercial paper borrowings outstanding had a
weighted-average interest rate of 4.4%. There was no commercial paper outstanding at December 31, 2021.
Proceeds from issuance of commercial paper with maturities greater than 90 days were $1.4 billion during 2022. There were $1.2
billion repayments of commercial paper with maturities greater than 90 days during 2022. During 2021, we had no commercial
paper borrowings with original maturities more than 90 days from the date of issuance.(1) 
87
Table of Contents
On November 17, 2021, we completed a cash tender offer for the notes included in the repayments table below (the Tender Offer
Notes), resulting in a partial repayment of approximately $1.5 billion of aggregate principal on these notes. In connection with this
transaction, we recorded debt extinguishment costs of $617 million, primarily related to premiums.
We had de minimis issuances and repayments of long-term debt during 2022. We had the following issuances of long-term debt
during 2021:
Issuance Date Description of NotesAggregate Principal
Balance (in millions)
November 16, 2021 2.375% notes due 2032 $ 1,000 
3.030% notes due 2052 1,100 
August 10, 2021 1.900% notes due 2031 1,000 
2.820% notes due 2051 1,000 
(1)    The net proceeds received from these debt issuances were used to fund the purchase of the Tender Offer Notes.
(2)    The net proceeds received from these debt issuances, along with cash on hand, were used to fund the repayment of our 2.800% and 2.500% notes due in 2022.
We made the following repayments of long-term debt during 2021:
Repayment Date Description of NotesAggregate Principal
Balance (in millions)
November 17, 2021 5.700% notes due 2040 $ 447 
6.125% notes due 2038 425 
6.050% notes due 2036 190 
5.400% notes due 2035 154 
7.500% notes due 2029 136 
6.700% notes due 2028 115 
6.800% notes due 2036 17 
7.000% notes due 2038 11 
7.100% notes due 2027 6 
November 15, 2021 3.100% notes due 2021 250 
August 26, 2021 2.800% notes due 2022 1,100 
2.500% notes due 2022 1,100 
March 1, 2021 8.750% notes due 2021 250 
(1)    In connection with the early repayment of outstanding principal, we recorded debt extinguishment costs of $649 million in 2021.(1)
(1)
(2)
(2)
(1)
(1)
(1)
(1)
(1)
(1)
(1)
(1)
(1)
(1)
(1)
88
Table of Contents
Long-term debt consisted of the following as of December 31:
(dollars in millions) 2022 2021
3.650% notes due 2023 $ 171 $ 171 
3.700% notes due 2023 400 400 
3.200% notes due 2024 950 950 
3.150% notes due 2024 300 300 
3.950% notes due 2025 1,500 1,500 
2.650% notes due 2026 719 719 
3.125% notes due 2027 1,100 1,100 
3.500% notes due 2027 1,300 1,300 
7.200% notes due 2027 382 382 
7.100% notes due 2027 135 135 
6.700% notes due 2028 285 285 
7.000% notes due 2028 185 185 
4.125% notes due 2028 3,000 3,000 
7.500% notes due 2029 414 414 
2.150% notes due 2030 (€500 million principal value) 531 565 
2.250% notes due 2030 1,000 1,000 
1.900% notes due 2031 1,000 1,000 
2.375% notes due 2032 1,000 1,000 
5.400% notes due 2035 446 446 
6.050% notes due 2036 410 410 
6.800% notes due 2036 117 117 
7.000% notes due 2038 148 148 
6.125% notes due 2038 575 575 
4.450% notes due 2038 750 750 
5.700% notes due 2040 553 553 
4.875% notes due 2040 600 600 
4.700% notes due 2041 425 425 
4.500% notes due 2042 3,500 3,500 
4.800% notes due 2043 400 400 
4.200% notes due 2044 300 300 
4.150% notes due 2045 850 850 
3.750% notes due 2046 1,100 1,100 
4.050% notes due 2047 600 600 
4.350% notes due 2047 1,000 1,000 
4.625% notes due 2048 1,750 1,750 
3.125% notes due 2050 1,000 1,000 
2.820% notes due 2051 1,000 1,000 
3.030% notes due 2052 1,100 1,100 
Other (including finance leases) 253 270 
Total principal long-term debt 31,249 31,300 
Other (fair market value adjustments, (discounts)/premiums and debt issuance costs) 40 51 
Total long-term debt 31,289 31,351 
Less: current portion 595 24 
Long-term debt, net of current portion $ 30,694 $ 31,327 
(1)    We may redeem these notes, in whole or in part, at our option pursuant to their terms prior to the applicable maturity date.(1)
(1)
(1)
(1)
(1)
(1)
(1)
(1)
(1)
(1)
(1)
(1)
(1)
(1)
(1)
(1)
(1)
(1)
(1)
(1)
(1)
(1)
(1)
(1)
(1)
(1)
(1)
(1)
(1)
(1)
(1)
(1)
(1)
(1)
(1)
89
Table of Contents
The weighted-average interest rate related to total debt was 4.0% at both December 31, 2022 and 2021.
The average maturity of our long-term debt at December 31, 2022 is approximately 14 years. The schedule of principal payments
required on long-term debt for the next five years and thereafter is:
(in millions)
2023 $ 588 
2024 1,270 
2025 1,590 
2026 751 
2027 2,935 
Thereafter 24,115 
Total $ 31,249 
NOTE 11: EMPLOYEE BENEFIT PLANS
We sponsor various domestic and foreign employee benefit plans, which are discussed below.
Employee Savings Plans. We sponsor various employee savings plans. Our contributions to employer sponsored defined
contribution plans were $1,037 million, $962 million and $875 million for 2022, 2021 and 2020, respectively.
Our non-union domestic employee savings plan for legacy UTC employees uses an Employee Stock Ownership Plan (ESOP) for
employer matching contributions. External borrowings were used by the ESOP to fund a portion of its purchase of ESOP stock
from us. The external borrowings have been extinguished and only re-amortized loans remain between RTC and the ESOP Trust.
As ESOP debt service payments are made, common stock is released from an unreleased shares account. ESOP debt may be
prepaid or re-amortized to either increase or decrease the number of shares released so that the value of released shares equals the
value of plan benefit. We may also, at our option, contribute additional common stock or cash to the ESOP.
Shares of common stock are allocated to employees’ ESOP accounts at fair value on the date earned. Cash dividends on common
stock held by the ESOP are used for debt service payments. Participants may choose to have their ESOP dividends reinvested or
distributed in cash. Common stock allocated to ESOP participants is included in the average number of common shares outstanding
for both basic and diluted EPS. At December 31, 2022, 24.7 million common shares had been allocated to employees, leaving 5.1
million unallocated common shares in the ESOP Trust, with a fair value of $512 million.
Pension and Postretirement Plans. We sponsor both funded and unfunded domestic and foreign defined benefit pension plans that
cover a large number of our employees. Our largest plans are generally closed to new participants. We also sponsor both funded and
unfunded PRB plans that provide health care and life insurance benefits to eligible retirees. Our plans use a December 31
measurement date consistent with our fiscal year.
Raytheon Company has both funded and unfunded domestic and foreign defined benefit pension and PRB plans. As of the merger
date, the Raytheon Company plans were remeasured at fair value using accounting policies consistent with the UTC plans. Refer to
“Note 2: Business Acquisitions, Dispositions, Goodwill and Intangible Assets” for additional information. The deferred pension and
PRB plan losses included in Raytheon Company’s accumulated other comprehensive income (loss) as of the merger date were
eliminated and are no longer subject to amortization in net periodic benefit (income) expense. Amounts prior to the merger date of
April 3, 2020 do not include the Raytheon Company pension plan results.
In December 2020, we approved a change to the Raytheon Company domestic benefit pension plans for non-union participants to
cease future benefit accruals based on an employee’s years of service and compensation under the historical formula effective
December 31, 2022. The plan change does not impact participants’ historical benefit accruals. Benefits for service after
December 31, 2022 will be based on a cash balance formula. We utilized a practical expedient and measured the plan assets and
pension benefit obligations for the effected pension plans as of the nearest month end, December 31, 2020, resulting in a prior
service credit of $2.1 billion.
For non-union employees in the UTC domestic pension plans, benefits for service up to December 31, 2014 are generally based
on the employee’s years of service and compensation. Benefits for service after December 31, 2014 and through December 31,
2019 are based on the existing cash balance formula that was adopted in 2003 for newly hired non-union employees and for non-
union employees who made a one-time voluntary election to have future benefit accruals determined under this formula. In
September 2019, we amended the UTC domestic defined benefit pension plans to cease accrual of additional benefits for future
service and compensation for non-union participants effective December 31, 2019. Beginning January 1, 2020, these participants
began receiving additional contributions under the UTC domestic defined contribution
90
Table of Contents
plan. Benefits for union employees in the UTC domestic pension plans are generally based on a stated amount for each year of
service.
We made the following contributions to our pension and PRB plans’ trusts during the years ended December 31:
(dollars in millions) 2022 2021 2020
U.S. qualified defined benefit plans $ — $ — $ 885 
International defined benefit plans 69 42 125 
PRB plans 25 17 15 
The contributions to our U.S. qualified defined benefit plans in 2020 include a $750 million discretionary contribution to the
Raytheon Company U.S. qualified pension plans’ trust. The contributions to our International defined benefit plans in 2020 include
discretionary contributions of $51 million.
Pension PRB
(dollars in millions) 2022 2021 2022 2021
Change in Benefit Obligation:
Beginning balance $ 67,214 $ 71,257 $ 1,370 $ 1,535 
Service cost attributable to continuing operations 470 523 6 7 
Interest cost 1,520 1,249 29 24 
Actuarial gain (15,466) (1,643) (294) (73)
Total benefits paid (4,328) (4,098) (166) (165)
Net settlement, curtailment and special termination benefits 3 (89) (8) (11)
Plan amendments 131 59 — — 
Business combinations and divestitures — 48 — — 
Other (516) (92) 47 53 
Ending balance $ 49,028 $ 67,214 $ 984 $ 1,370 
Change in Plan Assets:
Beginning balance $ 63,323 $ 62,318 $ 389 $ 381 
Actual return on plan assets (10,841) 4,983 (63) 36 
Employer contributions 306 289 98 95 
Total benefits paid (4,328) (4,098) (166) (165)
Settlements (4) (85) (8) (11)
Other (496) (84) 52 53 
Ending balance $ 47,960 $ 63,323 $ 302 $ 389 
Funded Status:
Fair value of plan assets $ 47,960 $ 63,323 $ 302 $ 389 
Benefit obligations (49,028) (67,214) (984) (1,370)
Funded status of plan $ (1,068)$ (3,891)$ (682)$ (981)
Amounts Recognized in the Consolidated Balance Sheet Consist of:
Noncurrent assets $ 3,301 $ 3,214 $ — $ — 
Current liability (236) (232) (71) (78)
Noncurrent liability (4,133) (6,873) (611) (903)
Net amount recognized $ (1,068)$ (3,891)$ (682)$ (981)
Amounts Recognized in Accumulated Other Comprehensive Loss Consist of:
Net actuarial (gain) loss $ 2,950 $ 4,402 $ (394)$ (199)
Prior service credit (1,424) (1,715) (4) (6)
Net amount recognized $ 1,526 $ 2,687 $ (398)$ (205)
(1)    Includes benefit payments paid directly by the company.
(2)    The amount included in Other primarily reflects the impact of foreign exchange translation, primarily for plans in the United Kingdom (U.K.) and Canada, and
participant contributions.(1)
(2)
(1)
(1)
(2)
91
Table of Contents
The majority of our pension obligations relate to our U.S. Internal Revenue Service (IRS) qualified pension plans, which comprise
87% and 86% of our pension PBO as of December 31, 2022 and 2021, respectively. 3% of our pension PBO as of both
December 31, 2022 and 2021 is attributable to our nonqualified domestic pension plans, which provide supplementary retirement
benefits to certain employees in excess of the IRS qualified plan limits. International plans comprise 10% and 11% of the pension
PBO as of December 31, 2022 and 2021, respectively, and are considered defined benefit pension plans for accounting purposes.
In addition to the pension and PRB noncurrent liabilities shown above, Future pension and postretirement benefit obligations on the
Consolidated Balance Sheet includes other immaterial pension and PRB-related liabilities.
Information for pension plans with accumulated benefit obligations in excess of plan assets: 
(dollars in millions) 2022 2021
Projected benefit obligation $ 22,116 $ 28,960 
Accumulated benefit obligation 22,080 28,494 
Fair value of plan assets 17,747 22,002 
The accumulated benefit obligation for all defined benefit pension plans was $48.8 billion and $66.5 billion at December 31, 2022
and 2021, respectively.
Information for pension plans with projected benefit obligations in excess of plan assets: 
(dollars in millions) 2022 2021
Projected benefit obligation $ 22,116 $ 31,471 
Accumulated benefit obligation 22,080 30,745 
Fair value of plan assets 17,747 24,366 
The components of the net periodic pension (income) expense are as follows: 
(dollars in millions) 2022 2021 2020
Operating expense
Service cost $ 470 $ 523 $ 483 
Non-operating expense
Interest cost 1,520 1,249 1,650 
Expected return on plan assets (3,544) (3,476) (2,995)
Amortization of prior service cost (credit) (163) (168) 51 
Recognized actuarial net loss 305 435 337 
Net settlement, curtailment and special termination benefits loss 2 22 45 
Non-service pension income (1,880) (1,938) (912)
Total net periodic pension benefit (income) expense $ (1,410)$ (1,415)$ (429)
The components of the net periodic PRB (income) expense are as follows:
(dollars in millions) 2022 2021 2020
Operating expense
Service cost $ 6 $ 7 $ 6 
Non-operating expense
Interest cost 29 24 37 
Expected return on plan assets (22) (21) (13)
Amortization of prior service credit (2) (3) (3)
Recognized actuarial net gain (11) (6) (12)
Net settlement, curtailment and special termination benefits (gain) loss (3) — 1 
Non-service pension (income) expense (9) (6) 10 
Total net periodic PRB benefit (income) expense $ (3)$ 1 $ 16 
92
Table of Contents
Other changes in pension plan assets and benefit obligations recognized in other comprehensive loss in 2022 and 2021 are as
follows:
(dollars in millions) 2022 2021
Net actuarial gain arising during the period $ (1,082)$ (3,158)
Amortization of actuarial loss (305) (435)
Current year prior service cost 131 59 
Amortization of prior service credit 163 168 
Net settlement and curtailment 1 (17)
Other (69) (6)
Total recognized in other comprehensive (income) loss (1,161) (3,389)
Net recognized in net periodic benefit (income) cost and other comprehensive (income) loss $ (2,571)$ (4,804)
(1)    The amount included in Other primarily reflects the impact of foreign exchange translation, primarily for plans in the U.K. and Canada.
The Actuarial gain arising in 2022 was primarily due to an increase in discount rates during 2022, partially offset by actual asset
returns less than our expected return on assets.
The Actuarial gain arising in 2021 was primarily due to an increase in discount rates during 2021 and asset returns exceeding our
expected return on assets, partially offset by demographic losses.
Other changes in PRB assets and benefit obligations recognized in other comprehensive loss in 2022 and 2021 are as follows:
(dollars in millions) 2022 2021
Net actuarial gain arising during the period $ (209)$ (88)
Amortization of actuarial gain 11 6 
Amortization of prior service credit 2 3 
Net settlement and curtailment 3 — 
Total recognized in other comprehensive (income) loss (193) (79)
Net recognized in net periodic benefit (income) cost and other comprehensive loss $ (196)$ (78)
The Actuarial gain arising in 2022 was primarily due to an increase in discount rates during 2022, partially offset by actual asset
returns less than our expected return on assets on our funded plans.
The Actuarial gain arising in 2021 was primarily due to an increase in discount rates during 2021 and asset returns exceeding our
expected return on assets on our funded plans.
The table below reflects the total benefit payments expected to be paid from the plans or from corporate assets.
(dollars in millions) Pension PRB
2023 $ 4,418 $ 107 
2024 3,796 100 
2025 3,780 94 
2026 3,734 89 
2027 3,671 84 
2028-2032 17,654 357 (1)
93
Table of Contents
Major assumptions used in determining the pension benefit obligation and net periodic pension benefit (income) expense are
presented in the following table as weighted-averages: 
Benefit Obligation Net Periodic Benefit (Income) Expense
2022 2021 2022 2021 2020
Discount rate
PBO 5.5 % 2.8 % 2.8 % 2.5 % 3.2 %
Interest cost N/A N/A 2.3 % 1.8 % 2.8 %
Service cost N/A N/A 3.1 % 2.8 % 3.5 %
Salary scale 4.4 % 4.4 % 4.4 % 4.4 % 4.3 %
Expected return on plan assets N/A N/A 6.5 % 6.5 % 6.5 %
Interest crediting rate 4.5 % 4.0 % 4.0 % 3.8 % 3.8 %
(1)    The discount rates used to measure the service cost and interest cost applies to our significant plans. The PBO discount rate is used for the service cost and
interest cost measurements for non-significant plans.
Major assumptions used in determining the PRB benefit obligation and net periodic PRB (income) expense are presented in the
following table as weighted-averages: 
 Benefit Obligation Net Periodic Benefit (Income) Expense
2022 2021 2022 2021 2020
Discount rate 5.5 % 2.8 % 2.8 % 2.4 % 3.1 %
Expected return on assets N/A N/A 5.7 % 5.7 % 5.7 %
Assumed health care cost trend rates used in determining the PRB benefit obligation and net periodic PRB (income) expense are as
follows:
2022 2021
Health care cost trend rate assumed for next year 5.0 % 4.7 %
Ultimate health care cost trend rate 4.2 % 4.2 %
Year that the rate reaches the ultimate health care cost trend rate 2029 2026
The weighted-average discount rates used to measure pension and PRB liabilities are based on yield curves developed using high-
quality corporate bonds as well as plan specific expected cash flows. For our significant plans, we utilize a full yield curve
approach in the estimation of the service cost and interest cost components of net periodic benefit expense by applying the specific
spot rates along the yield curve used in determination of the benefit obligation to the relevant discounted projected cash flows.
In determining the EROA assumption, we consider the target asset allocation of plan assets, as well as economic and other
indicators of future performance. We consult with and consider the opinions of financial and other professionals in determining the
appropriate capital market assumptions. Return projections are validated using a simulation model that incorporates yield curves,
credit spreads and risk premiums to project long-term prospective returns. As a result of this analysis at year end 2022, our
weighted average pension EROA assumption for 2023 increased to 7.1%.
Plan Assets. The plans’ investment management objectives include providing the liquidity and asset levels needed to meet current
and future benefit payments, while maintaining a prudent degree of portfolio diversification considering interest rate risk and
market volatility. Globally, investment strategies generally target a mix of 40% to 45% of growth seeking assets and 55% to 60% of
income generating and hedging assets using a wide set of diversified asset types, fund strategies and investment managers. The
growth seeking allocation consists of global public equities in developed and emerging countries, private equity, real estate and
multi-asset class strategies. Growth assets include an enhanced alpha strategy that invests in publicly traded equity and fixed
income securities, derivatives and foreign currency. Investments in private equity are primarily via limited partnership interests in
buy-out strategies with smaller allocations to distressed debt funds. The real estate strategy is principally concentrated in directly
held U.S. core investments with some smaller investments in international, value-added and opportunistic strategies. Within the
income generating assets, the fixed income portfolio consists of mainly government and broadly diversified high quality corporate
bonds.
The plans have continued their pension risk management techniques designed to reduce their interest rate risk. Specifically, the
plans have incorporated liability hedging programs that include the adoption of a risk reduction objective as part of the long-term
investment strategy. Under this objective the interest rate hedge is intended to increase as funded status improves. The(1)
(1)
94
Table of Contents
hedging programs incorporate a range of assets and investment tools, each with varying interest rate sensitivities. The investment
portfolios are currently hedging approximately 40% to 80% of the interest rate sensitivity of the pension plan liabilities, depending
on the funded status of the plan.
The fair values of pension plan assets at December 31, 2022 and 2021 by asset category are as follows:
(dollars in millions)Quoted Prices in Active
Markets
For Identical Assets
(Level 1)Significant
Observable
Inputs
(Level 2)Significant
Unobservable
Inputs
(Level 3)Not Subject to
Leveling Total
Asset Category:
Public Equities
Global Equities $ 6,194 $ 5 $ — $ — $ 6,199 
Global Equity Commingled Funds 20 568 — — 588 
Enhanced Global Equities (53) 75 — — 22 
Other Public Equities — — — 5,771 5,771 
Private Equities — — — 4,068 4,068 
Fixed Income Securities
Governments 2,526 1,426 — — 3,952 
Corporate Bonds 1 12,638 — — 12,639 
Structured Products — 57 — — 57 
Other Fixed Income — — — 6,975 6,975 
Real Estate — — 1,650 1,761 3,411 
Other — 84 — 3,071 3,155 
Cash & Cash Equivalents — 150 — 164 314 
Subtotal $ 8,688 $ 15,003 $ 1,650 $ 21,810 $ 47,151 
Other Assets & Liabilities    809 
Total at December 31, 2022 $ 47,960 
Public Equities
Global Equities $ 9,411 $ 6 $ — $ — $ 9,417 
Global Equity Commingled Funds 3 929 — — 932 
Enhanced Global Equities 46 163 — — 209 
Other Public Equities — — — 8,495 8,495 
Private Equities — — — 4,490 4,490 
Fixed Income Securities
Governments 1,933 1,172 — — 3,105 
Corporate Bonds 1 18,681 — — 18,682 
Structured Products — 25 — — 25 
Other Fixed Income — — — 7,367 7,367 
Real Estate — — 1,885 1,743 3,628 
Other — 91 — 5,351 5,442 
Cash & Cash Equivalents — 111 — 220 331 
Subtotal $ 11,394 $ 21,178 $ 1,885 $ 27,666 $ 62,123 
Other Assets & Liabilities    1,200 
Total at December 31, 2021 $ 63,323 
(1)    Represents commingled funds that invest primarily in common stocks.
(2)    Represents enhanced equity separate account and commingled fund portfolios. A portion of the portfolio may include long-short market neutral and relative
value strategies that invest in publicly traded, equity and fixed income securities, as well as derivatives of equity and fixed income securities and foreign
currency.(8)
(1)
 (2)
 (3)
 (4)
 (5)
 (6)
(7)
(1)
 (2)
 (3)
 (4)
 (5)
 (6)
(7)
95
Table of Contents
(3)    Represents limited partnership investments with general partners that primarily invest in equity and debt.
(4)    Represents investments in real estate including commingled funds and directly held properties.
(5)    Represents global balanced risk commingled funds that invest in multiple asset classes including equity, fixed income and some commodities. “Other” also
includes insurance contracts.
(6)    Represents short-term commercial paper, bonds and other cash or cash-like instruments.
(7)    Represents receivables, payables and certain individually immaterial international plan assets that are not leveled.
(8)    In accordance with ASU 2015-07, Fair Value Measurement (Topic 820), certain investments that are measured at fair value using the net asset value per share
(or its equivalent) practical expedient have not been classified in the fair value hierarchy. The fair value amounts presented in this table are intended to permit
reconciliation of the fair value hierarchy to the amounts presented for the total pension benefits plan assets.
Derivatives in the plan are primarily used to manage risk and gain asset class exposure while still maintaining liquidity. Derivative
instruments mainly consist of equity futures, interest rate futures, interest rate swaps and currency forward contracts. The fair
market value of the plans’ derivatives through direct or separate account investments was approximately $(79) million and $98
million as of December 31, 2022 and 2021, respectively.
We review our assets at least quarterly to ensure we are within the targeted asset allocation ranges and, if necessary, asset balances
are adjusted back within target allocations. We employ a broadly diversified investment manager structure that includes
diversification by active and passive management, style, capitalization, country, sector, industry and number of investment
managers. No individual investment represented more than 5% of the plan assets as of December 31, 2022.
The fair value measurement of plan assets using significant unobservable inputs (Level 3) changed due to the following:
(dollars in millions) Corporate Bonds Real Estate Total
Balance, December 31, 2020 $ 2 $ 1,647 $ 1,649 
Realized gains — 212 212 
Unrealized gains relating to instruments still held in the reporting period — 50 50 
Purchases, sales, and settlements, net — (24) (24)
Transfers in/out, net (2) — (2)
Balance, December 31, 2021 — 1,885 1,885 
Realized gains — 76 76 
Unrealized gains relating to instruments still held in the reporting period — 64 64 
Purchases, sales, and settlements, net — (211) (211)
Transfers in/out, net — (164) (164)
Balance, December 31, 2022 $ — $ 1,650 $ 1,650 
Quoted market prices are used to value investments when available. Investments in securities traded on exchanges, including listed
futures and options, are valued at the last reported sale prices on the last business day of the year or, if not available, the last
reported bid prices. Fixed income securities are primarily measured using a market approach pricing methodology, where
observable prices are obtained by market transactions involving identical or comparable securities of issuers with similar credit
ratings. Mortgages have been valued on the basis of their future principal and interest payments discounted at prevailing interest
rates for similar investments. Investment contracts are valued at fair value by discounting the related cash flows based on current
yields of similar instruments with comparable durations. Real estate investments are valued on a quarterly basis using discounted
cash flow models which consider long-term lease estimates, future rental receipts and estimated residual values. Valuation estimates
are supplemented by third-party appraisals on an annual basis.
The fair market value of assets related to our PRB benefits was $302 million and $389 million as of December 31, 2022 and 2021,
respectively. These assets include $105 million and $147 million of which are invested in our domestic qualified pension plan trust
at December 31, 2022 and 2021, respectively. The remaining PRB investments are held within Voluntary Employees’ Beneficiary
Association (VEBA) trusts. The VEBA assets are generally invested in mutual funds and are valued primarily using quoted prices
in active markets (Level 1). There were no Level 3 investments in the VEBA trusts as of December 31, 2022 or 2021.
We have set aside assets in separate trusts, which we expect to be used to pay for certain nonqualified defined benefit and defined
contribution plan obligations in excess of qualified plan limits. These assets are included in Other assets in our Consolidated
Balance Sheet. The fair value of marketable securities held in trusts as of December 31 was as follows:
(dollars in millions) 2022 2021
Marketable securities held in trusts $ 774 $ 965 
96
Table of Contents
NOTE 12: LEASES
Operating lease expense was $475 million, $525 million, and $497 million for 2022, 2021, and 2020, respectively. Finance leases
and leases where we are the lessor are not considered significant to our Consolidated Balance Sheet, Consolidated Statement of
Operations or Consolidated Statement of Cash Flows.
In 2021 and 2020, we entered into sale and leaseback transactions for the sale of equipment and related maintenance. We
subsequently leased back the equipment sold for a limited timeframe, which is accounted for as an operating lease. The proceeds
received as a result of the equipment sales are classified in Receipts from customer financing assets within the Investing Activities
in our Consolidated Statement of Cash Flows, and the portion related to future maintenance services are classified within Operating
Activities. The net gains as a result of these transactions were not material.
Supplemental cash flow information related to operating leases were as follows:
(dollars in millions) 2022 2021 2020
Operating cash flows used in the measurement of operating lease liabilities $ 399 $ 490 $ 420 
Operating lease right-of-use assets obtained in exchange for operating lease
obligations 359 535 299 
Future lease payments related to our operating lease liabilities as of December 31, 2022 are as follows:
(dollars in millions)
2023 $ 340 
2024 301 
2025 265 
2026 236 
2027 195 
Thereafter 735 
Total undiscounted lease payments 2,072 
Less imputed interest (130)
Total discounted lease payments $ 1,942 
Our lease liabilities recognized in our Consolidated Balance Sheet were as follows as of December 31:
(dollars in millions) 2022 2021
Operating lease liabilities, current (included in Other accrued liabilities) $ 356 $ 411 
Operating lease liabilities, noncurrent 1,586 1,657 
Total operating lease liabilities $ 1,942 $ 2,068 
The weighted-average remaining lease term related to our operating leases was 9 years as of December 31, 2022 and 2021. The
weighted-average discount rate related to our operating leases was 3.3% and 2.8% as of December 31, 2022 and 2021, respectively.
NOTE 13: INCOME TAXES
Income Before Income Taxes. The sources of income (loss) from continuing operations before income taxes are:
(dollars in millions) 2022 2021 2020
United States $ 4,061 $ 3,498 $ (2,762)
Foreign 1,966 1,433 409 
Income (loss) from continuing operations before income taxes $ 6,027 $ 4,931 $ (2,353)
The Company no longer intends to reinvest certain undistributed earnings of its international subsidiaries that have been previously
taxed in the U.S. As such, we recorded the taxes associated with the future remittance of these earnings. For the remainder of the
Company’s undistributed international earnings, unless tax effective to repatriate, the Company will continue to permanently
reinvest these earnings. As of December 31, 2022, such undistributed earnings were approximately $18 billion, excluding other
comprehensive income amounts. It is not practicable to estimate the amount of tax that might be payable on the remaining amounts.
97
Table of Contents
Provision for Income Taxes. The income tax expense (benefit) for the years ended December 31 are as follows:
(dollars in millions) 2022 2021 2020
Current:
United States:
Federal $ 1,724 $ 387 $ 324 
State 126 60 45 
Foreign 513 427 305 
2,363 874 674 
Future:
United States:
Federal (1,399) (26) (264)
State (166) 41 258 
Foreign (98) (103) (93)
 (1,663) (88) (99)
Income tax expense $ 700 $ 786 $ 575 
Reconciliation of Effective Income Tax Rate. Differences between effective income tax rates and the statutory U.S. federal
income tax rate are as follows:
2022 2021 2020
(dollars in millions) Amount Rate Amount Rate Amount Rate
Statutory U.S. federal income tax rate $ 1,266 21.0 %$ 1,036 21.0 %$ (494) 21.0 %
Tax on international activities (186) (3.1) (204) (4.1) 27 (1.1)
Tax charges related to Separation Transactions and
Raytheon merger — — (39) (0.8) 416 (17.7)
Disposals of businesses — — 108 2.2 177 (7.5)
U.S. research and development credit (164) (2.7) (172) (3.5) (142) 6.1 
Goodwill impairment — — — — 668 (28.4)
State income tax, net (12) (0.2) 33 0.7 (56) 2.4 
Foreign Derived Intangible Income (214) (3.5) (121) (2.5) (83) 3.5 
U.K. corporate tax rate enactment — — 73 1.5 8 (0.4)
Other 10 0.1 72 1.4 54 (2.3)
Effective income tax rate $ 700 11.6 %$ 786 15.9 %$ 575 (24.4)%
The 2022 effective tax rate includes a benefit of $214 million related to the Foreign Derived Intangible Income (FDII) benefit,
$207 million associated with legal entity and operational reorganizations implemented in 2022, and $164 million associated with
U.S. research and development credits. The increase in the FDII benefit from 2021 is primarily attributable to the capitalization of
research or experimental expenditures for tax-purposes, enacted as part of the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act of 2017 effective beginning
January 1, 2022.
The 2021 effective tax rate includes tax benefits of $244 million included in international activities associated with legal entity and
operational reorganizations implemented in 2021, $172 million associated with U.S. research and development credits and
$121 million associated with FDII, and tax charges of $73 million associated with the revaluation of deferred taxes resulting from
the increase in the U.K. corporate tax rate to 25% enacted in 2021. In the first quarter of 2021, we recorded $148 million of tax
charges associated with the sale of the Forcepoint business, and subsequently recognized a $104 million tax benefit due to the
revaluation of that tax benefit as a result of completing the divestiture of RIS’s global training and services business for a gain in
the fourth quarter of 2021.
98
Table of Contents
The 2020 negative effective tax rate is a result of having tax expense of $575 million on a loss from continuing operations before
income taxes of $2.4 billion. The loss from continuing operations before income taxes in 2020 includes the $3.2 billion goodwill
impairment as described in “Note 2: Business Acquisitions, Dispositions, Goodwill and Intangible Assets,” most of which was non-
deductible for tax purposes. Tax expense includes net deferred tax charges of $416 million resulting from the Separation
Transactions and the Raytheon merger primarily related to the impairment of deferred tax assets and the revaluation of certain
international tax incentives, and incremental tax expense of $177 million related to the disposal of businesses, including the sales of
businesses at Collins, the airborne tactical radios business at RIS and the entry into a definitive agreement to sell Forcepoint, as
described in “Note 2: Business Acquisitions, Dispositions, Goodwill and Intangible Assets.” Also included in the 2020 effective tax
rate are tax benefits of $142 million associated with U.S. research and development credits and $83 million associated with FDII.
Deferred Tax Assets and Liabilities. The tax effects of temporary differences and tax carryforwards which gave rise to future
income tax benefits and payables at December 31, 2022 and 2021 are as follows:
(dollars in millions) 2022 2021
Future income tax benefits:
Insurance and employee benefits $ 1,126 $ 1,831 
Inventory and contract balances 639 756 
Warranty provisions 242 248 
Capitalization of research and experimental expenditures 1,712 — 
Other basis differences 828 878 
Tax loss carryforwards 305 251 
Tax credit carryforwards 970 1,088 
Valuation allowances (842) (825)
Total future income tax benefits $ 4,980 $ 4,227 
Future income taxes payable:
Goodwill and intangible assets $ 6,588 $ 7,168 
Fixed assets 1,751 1,746 
Other basis differences 220 323 
Total future income tax payable $ 8,559 $ 9,237 
Valuation allowances have been established primarily for tax credit carryforwards, tax loss carryforwards, and certain temporary
differences to reduce the future income tax benefits to expected realizable amounts.
Tax Credit and Loss Carryforwards. At December 31, 2022, tax credit carryforwards, principally state and foreign, and tax loss
carryforwards, principally state and foreign, were as follows:
(dollars in millions)Tax Credit
CarryforwardsTax Loss
Carryforwards
Expiration period:
2023-2027 $ 54 $ 292 
2028-2032 73 174 
2033-2042 337 318 
Indefinite 506 1,357 
Total $ 970 $ 2,141 
99
Table of Contents
Unrecognized Tax Benefits. At December 31, 2022, we had gross tax-effected unrecognized tax benefits of $1,515 million, of
which $1,378 million, if recognized, would impact the effective tax rate. A reconciliation of the beginning and ending amounts of
unrecognized tax benefits and interest expense related to unrecognized tax benefits for the years ended December 31, 2022, 2021
and 2020 is as follows: 
(dollars in millions) 2022 2021 2020
Balance at January 1 $ 1,458 $ 1,225 $ 1,347 
Additions for tax positions related to the current year 106 110 125 
Additions for tax positions of prior years 23 282 323 
Reductions for tax positions of prior years (56) (49) (83)
Settlements (16) (110) (48)
Separation of Carrier and Otis — — (439)
Balance at December 31 $ 1,515 $ 1,458 $ 1,225 
Gross interest expense related to unrecognized tax benefits $ 34 $ 39 $ 50 
Total accrued interest balance at December 31 190 165 141 
The unrecognized tax benefit table includes discontinued operations activity in 2020.
As a result of the Separation Transactions and the Distributions in April 2020, we transferred unrecognized tax benefits to Carrier
and Otis of $439 million and associated interest of approximately $165 million. Pursuant to the terms of the separation agreements,
certain other unrecognized tax benefits retained by the Company are subject to indemnification.
The 2020 additions for tax positions of prior years in the table above include amounts related to the Raytheon merger.
We conduct business globally and, as a result, Raytheon Technologies or one or more of our subsidiaries files income tax returns in
the U.S. federal jurisdiction and various state and foreign jurisdictions. In the normal course of business we are subject to
examination by taxing authorities throughout the world, including such major jurisdictions as Canada, China, France, Germany,
India, Poland, Saudi Arabia, Singapore, Switzerland, the United Kingdom and the United States. With few exceptions, we are no
longer subject to U.S. federal, state and local, or non-U.S. income tax examinations for years before 2012.
The Examination Division of the IRS is currently auditing Raytheon Technologies tax years 2017 and 2018 and pre-merger
Raytheon Company tax years 2017, 2018 and 2019 as well as certain refund claims of Raytheon Company for tax years 2014, 2015
and 2016 filed prior to the Raytheon merger. The examination phase of the audits for each of these tax years is expected to close in
2023.
The Examination Division of the IRS is also auditing pre-acquisition Rockwell Collins fiscal tax years 2016, 2017 and 2018. The
examination phase of the audit for each of these tax years is expected to close during 2023.
It is reasonably possible that a net reduction within the range of $25 million to $375 million of unrecognized tax benefits may occur
over the next 12 months as a result of the revaluation of uncertain tax positions arising from developments in examinations, in
appeals, or in the courts, or the closure of tax statutes.
NOTE 14: FINANCIAL INSTRUMENTS
We enter into derivative instruments primarily for risk management purposes, including derivatives designated as hedging
instruments and those utilized as economic hedges. We operate internationally and in the normal course of business, are exposed to
fluctuations in interest rates, foreign exchange rates and commodity prices. These fluctuations can increase the costs of financing,
investing and operating the business. We have used derivative instruments, including swaps, forward contracts and options, to
manage certain foreign currency, interest rate and commodity price exposures.
The present value of aggregate notional principal of our outstanding foreign currency hedges was $11.2 billion and $8.5 billion at
December 31, 2022 and 2021, respectively. At December 31, 2022, all derivative contracts accounted for as cash flow hedges will
mature by February 2030. Additional information pertaining to foreign exchange and hedging activities is included in “Note 1:
Basis of Presentation and Summary of Accounting Principles.”
100
Table of Contents
The following table summarizes the fair value and presentation in the Consolidated Balance Sheet for derivative instruments as of
December 31:
(dollars in millions) Balance Sheet Location 2022 2021
Derivatives designated as hedging instruments:
Foreign exchange contracts Other assets, current $ 67 $ 59 
Other accrued liabilities 347 202 
Derivatives not designated as hedging instruments:
Foreign exchange contracts Other assets, current $ 17 $ 11 
Other accrued liabilities 39 11 
The effect of cash flow hedging relationships on Accumulated other comprehensive income (loss) and on the Consolidated
Statement of Operations in 2022 and 2021 are presented in “Note 19: Accumulated Other Comprehensive Loss”. The amounts of
gain or (loss) are attributable to foreign exchange contract activity and are primarily recorded as a component of Products sales
when reclassified from Accumulated other comprehensive loss.
The Company utilizes the critical terms match method in assessing derivatives for hedge effectiveness. Accordingly, the hedged
items and derivatives designated as hedging instruments are highly effective.
As of December 31, 2022, we have €500 million of euro-denominated long-term debt outstanding, which qualifies as a net
investment hedge against our investments in European businesses, which is deemed to be effective.
The effect of derivatives not designated as hedging instruments is included within Other income, net, on the Consolidated
Statement of Operations and is not material.
NOTE 15: FAIR VALUE MEASUREMENTS
The following tables provide the valuation hierarchy classification of assets and liabilities that are carried at fair value and
measured on a recurring basis in our Consolidated Balance Sheet:
December 31, 2022
 (dollars in millions) Total Level 1 Level 2 Level 3
Recurring fair value measurements:
Marketable securities held in trusts $ 774 $ 713 $ 61 $ — 
Derivative assets 84 — 84 — 
Derivative liabilities 386 — 386 — 
December 31, 2021
 (dollars in millions) Total Level 1 Level 2 Level 3
Recurring fair value measurements:
Marketable securities held in trusts $ 965 $ 890 $ 75 $ — 
Derivative assets 70 — 70 — 
Derivative liabilities 213 — 213 — 
Valuation Techniques. Our derivative assets and liabilities include foreign exchange contracts that are measured at fair value using
internal models based on observable market inputs such as forward rates, interest rates, our own credit risk and our counterparties’
credit risks.
As of December 31, 2022, there has not been any significant impact to the fair value of our derivative liabilities due to our own
credit risk. Similarly, there has not been any significant adverse impact to our derivative assets based on our evaluation of our
counterparties’ credit risks.
101
Table of Contents
The following table provides carrying amounts and fair values of financial instruments that are not carried at fair value in our
Consolidated Balance Sheet at December 31:
 2022 2021
(dollars in millions)Carrying
Amount Fair ValueCarrying Amount Fair Value
Customer financing notes receivables $ 169 $ 161 $ 195 $ 192 
Long-term debt (excluding finance leases) 31,201 28,049 31,250 35,828 
The following table provides the valuation hierarchy classification of assets and liabilities that are not carried at fair value in our
Consolidated Balance Sheet at December 31:
December 31, 2022
(dollars in millions) Total Level 1 Level 2 Level 3
Customer financing notes receivables $ 161 $ — $ 161 $ — 
Long-term debt (excluding finance leases) 28,049 — 28,003 46 
December 31, 2021
(dollars in millions) Total Level 1 Level 2 Level 3
Customer financing notes receivables $ 192 $ — $ 192 $ — 
Long-term debt (excluding finance leases) 35,828 — 35,778 50 
The fair value of our Short-term borrowings approximates the carrying value due to their short-term nature, with commercial paper
classified as level 2 and other short-term borrowings classified as level 3 within the fair value hierarchy.
NOTE 16: VARIABLE INTEREST ENTITIES
Pratt & Whitney holds a 61% program share interest in the International Aero Engines AG (IAE) collaboration with MTU Aero
Engines AG (MTU) and Japanese Aero Engines Corporation (JAEC) and a 49.5% ownership interest in IAE. IAE’s business
purpose is to coordinate the design, development, manufacturing and product support of the V2500 engine program through
involvement with the collaborators. Additionally, Pratt & Whitney, JAEC and MTU are participants in the International Aero
Engines, LLC (IAE LLC) collaboration, whose business purpose is to coordinate the design, development, manufacturing and
product support for the PW1100G-JM engine for the Airbus A320neo family of aircraft. Pratt & Whitney holds a 59% program
share interest and a 59% ownership interest in IAE LLC. IAE and IAE LLC retain limited equity with the primary economics of the
programs passed to the participants. As such, we have determined that IAE and IAE LLC are variable interest entities with Pratt &
Whitney as the primary beneficiary. IAE and IAE LLC have, therefore, been consolidated. The carrying amounts and classification
of assets and liabilities for variable interest entities in our Consolidated Balance Sheet as of December 31, 2022 and 2021 are as
follows:
(dollars in millions) 2022 2021
Current assets $ 7,609 $ 7,081 
Noncurrent assets 779 825 
Total assets $ 8,388 $ 7,906 
Current liabilities $ 9,154 $ 7,965 
Noncurrent liabilities 19 54 
Total liabilities $ 9,173 $ 8,019 
NOTE 17: GUARANTEES
We extend a variety of financial, market value and product performance guarantees to third parties. These instruments expire on
various dates through 2028. Additional guarantees of project performance for which there is no stated value also remain
102
Table of Contents
outstanding. A portion of our third party guarantees are subject to indemnification for our benefit for any liabilities that could arise.
As of December 31, 2022 and 2021, the following financial guarantees were outstanding:
December 31, 2022 December 31, 2021
(dollars in millions)Maximum
Potential
PaymentCarrying
Amount of
LiabilityMaximum
Potential
PaymentCarrying
Amount of
Liability
Commercial aerospace financing arrangements $ 304 $ — $ 309 $ 3 
Third party guarantees 335 1 511 5 
We have made residual value and other guarantees related to various commercial aerospace customer financing arrangements. The
estimated fair market values of the guaranteed assets equal or exceed the value of the related guarantees, net of existing reserves.
Collaboration partners’ share of these financing guarantees is $140 million and $141 million at December 31, 2022 and 2021,
respectively.
We also have obligations arising from sales of certain businesses and assets, including those from representations and warranties
and related indemnities for environmental, health and safety, tax and employment matters. The maximum potential payment related
to these obligations is not a specified amount as a number of the obligations do not contain financial caps. The carrying amount of
liabilities related to these obligations was $97 million and $120 million at December 31, 2022 and 2021, respectively. These
primarily relate to environmental liabilities, which are included in our total environmental liabilities as further discussed in
“Note 18: Commitments and Contingencies.”
We accrue for costs associated with guarantees when it is probable that a liability has been incurred and the amount can be
reasonably estimated. The most likely cost to be incurred is accrued based on an evaluation of currently available facts, and where
no amount within a range of estimates is more likely, the minimum is accrued.
We also provide service and warranty policies on our products and extend performance and operating cost guarantees beyond our
normal service and warranty policies on some of our products, particularly commercial aircraft engines. In addition, we incur
discretionary costs to service our products in connection with specific product performance issues. Liabilities for performance and
operating cost guarantees are based upon future product performance and durability, and are largely estimated based upon historical
experience. Adjustments are made to accruals as claims data and historical experience warrant. The changes in the carrying amount
of service and product warranties and product performance guarantees for the years ended December 31 were as follows:
(dollars in millions) 2022 2021 2020
Balance as of January 1 $ 1,157 $ 1,057 $ 1,033 
Warranties and performance guarantees issued 264 380 311 
Settlements (284) (272) (292)
Other (28) (8) 5 
Balance as of December 31 $ 1,109 $ 1,157 $ 1,057 
NOTE 18: COMMITMENTS AND CONTINGENCIES
Except as otherwise noted, while we are unable to predict the final outcome, based on information currently available, we do not
believe that resolution of any of the following matters will have a material adverse effect upon our competitive position, results of
operations, financial condition or liquidity.
Environmental. Our operations are subject to environmental regulation by federal, state and local authorities in the United States
and regulatory authorities with jurisdiction over our foreign operations. We have accrued for the costs of environmental
remediation activities, including but not limited to investigatory, remediation, operating and maintenance costs and performance
guarantees, and periodically reassess these amounts. We do not expect any additional liability to have a material adverse effect on
our results of operations, financial condition or liquidity. As of December 31, 2022 and 2021, we had $798 million and
$834 million, respectively, reserved for environmental remediation. Additional information pertaining to environmental matters is
included in “Note 1: Basis of Presentation and Summary of Accounting Principles.”
Commercial Aerospace Financing and Other Commitments. We had commercial aerospace financing commitments and other
contractual commitments of approximately $15.3 billion and $15.6 billion as of December 31, 2022 and 2021, respectively, on a
gross basis before reduction for our collaboration partners’ share. Aircraft financing commitments, in the form of debt or lease
financing, are provided to certain commercial aerospace customers. The extent to which the financing commitments will be utilized
is not currently known, since customers may be able to obtain more favorable terms from other
103
Table of Contents
financing sources. We may also arrange for third-party investors to assume a portion of these commitments. The majority of
financing commitments are collateralized arrangements. We may also lease aircraft and subsequently sublease the aircraft to
customers under long-term non-cancelable operating leases, or pay deposits on behalf of our customers to secure production slots
with the airframers (pre-delivery payments). Our financing commitments with customers are contingent upon maintenance of
certain levels of financial condition by the customers. Associated risks on these commitments are mitigated due to the fact that
interest rates are variable during the commitment term and are set at the date of funding based on current market conditions, the fair
value of the underlying collateral and the credit worthiness of the customers. As a result, the fair value of these financing
commitments is expected to equal the amounts funded.
We also have other contractual commitments to make payments to secure certain contractual rights to provide product on new
aircraft platforms. The estimated amount and timing of these payments, which are generally based on future sales or engine flight
hours, are reflected in “Other commercial aerospace commitments” in the table below. Payments made on these contractual
commitments are included within intangible assets as exclusivity assets and are amortized over the term of underlying economic
benefit. We have entered into certain collaboration arrangements, which may include participation by our collaboration partners in
these commitments. In addition, in connection with our 2012 agreement to acquire Rolls-Royce’s ownership and collaboration
interests in IAE, additional payments are due to Rolls-Royce contingent upon each hour flown through June 2027 by the V2500-
powered aircraft in service as of the acquisition date. These flight hour payments, which are considered in “Other commercial
aerospace commitments” below, will be capitalized as collaboration intangible assets as payments are made.
The following is the expected maturity of our commercial aerospace industry commitments as of December 31, 2022:
(dollars in millions) Committed 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 Thereafter
Commercial aerospace financing
commitments $ 4,559 $ 1,559 $1,405 $ 980 $ 556 $ 59 $ — 
Other commercial aerospace
commitments 10,710 1,147 883 794 695 717 6,474 
Collaboration partners’ share (5,905) (915) (863) (714) (535) (331) (2,547)
Total commercial aerospace
commitments $ 9,364 $ 1,791 $1,425 $ 1,060 $ 716 $ 445 $ 3,927 
Other Financing Arrangements. We have entered into standby letters of credit and surety bonds with financial institutions to meet
various bid, performance, warranty, retention and advance payment obligations for us or our affiliates. We enter into these
agreements to assist certain affiliates in obtaining financing on more favorable terms, making bids on contracts and performing
their contractual obligations. The stated values of these letters of credit agreements and surety bonds totaled $3.3 billion as of
December 31, 2022.
Offset Obligations. We have entered into industrial cooperation agreements, sometimes in the form of either offset agreements or
ICIP agreements, as a condition to obtaining orders for our products and services from certain customers in foreign countries. At
December 31, 2022, the aggregate amount of our offset agreements, both agreed to and anticipated to be agreed to, had an
outstanding notional value of approximately $11.3 billion. These agreements are designed to return economic value to the foreign
country by requiring us to engage in activities supporting local defense or commercial industries, promoting a balance of trade,
developing in-country technology capabilities or addressing other local development priorities. Offset agreements may be satisfied
through activities that do not require a direct cash payment, including transferring technology, providing manufacturing, training
and other consulting support to in-country projects, and the purchase by third parties (e.g., our vendors) of supplies from in-country
vendors. These agreements may also be satisfied through our use of cash for activities such as subcontracting with local partners,
purchasing supplies from in-country vendors, providing financial support for in-country projects and making investments in local
ventures. Such activities may also vary by country depending upon requirements as dictated by their governments. We typically do
not commit to offset agreements until orders for our products or services are definitive. The amounts ultimately applied against our
offset agreements are based on negotiations with the customers and typically require cash outlays that represent only a fraction of
the notional value in the offset agreements. Offset programs usually extend over several or more years and may provide for
penalties in the event we fail to perform in accordance with offset requirements. Historically, we have not been required to pay any
penalties of significance.
Government Oversight. In the ordinary course of business, the Company and its subsidiaries and our properties are subject to
regulatory and governmental examinations, information gathering requests, inquiries, investigations and threatened legal actions
and proceedings. For example, we are now, and believe that, in light of the current U.S. government contracting environment, we
will continue to be the subject of one or more U.S. government investigations. Our contracts with the U.S. government are also
subject to audits. Agencies that oversee contract performance include: the Defense Contract Audit Agency (DCAA), the Defense
Contract Management Agency (DCMA), the Inspectors General of the U.S. Department of Defense (DoD) and other
104
Table of Contents
departments and agencies, the Government Accountability Office (GAO), the Department of Justice (DOJ), and Congressional
Committees. Other areas of our business operations may also be subject to audit and investigation by these and other agencies.
From time to time, agencies investigate or conduct audits to determine whether our operations are being conducted in accordance
with applicable requirements. Such investigations and audits may be initiated due to a number of reasons, including as a result of a
whistleblower complaint. Such investigations and audits could result in administrative, civil or criminal liabilities, including
repayments, fines, treble or other damages, forfeitures, restitution, or penalties being imposed upon us, the suspension of
government export licenses or the suspension or debarment from future U.S. government contracting. U.S. government
investigations often take years to complete. The U.S. government also reserves the right to debar a contractor from receiving new
government contracts for fraudulent, criminal or other seriously improper conduct. The U.S. government could void any contracts
found to be tainted by fraud. Like many defense contractors, we have received audit reports recommending the reduction of certain
contract prices because, for example, cost or pricing data or cost accounting practices used to price and negotiate those contracts
may not have conformed to government regulations. Some of these audit reports recommend that certain payments be repaid,
delayed, or withheld, and may involve substantial amounts. We have made voluntary refunds in those cases we believe appropriate,
have settled some allegations and, in some cases, continue to negotiate and/or litigate. The Company may be, and in some cases has
been, required to make payments into escrow of disputed liabilities while the related litigation is pending. If the litigation is
resolved in the Company’s favor, any such payments will be returned to the Company with interest. Our final allowable incurred
costs for each year are also subject to audit and have, from time to time, resulted in disputes between us and the U.S. government,
with litigation resulting at the Court of Federal Claims (COFC) or the Armed Services Board of Contract Appeals (ASBCA) or
their related courts of appeals. In addition, the DOJ has, from time to time, convened grand juries to investigate possible
irregularities by us. We also provide products and services to customers outside of the U.S., and those sales are subject to local
government laws, regulations and procurement policies and practices. Our compliance with such local government regulations or
any applicable U.S. government regulations (e.g., the Foreign Corrupt Practices Act (FCPA) and International Traffic in Arms
Regulations (ITAR)) may also be investigated or audited. In addition, we accrue for liabilities associated with those matters that are
probable and can be reasonably estimated. The most likely liability amount to be incurred is accrued based upon a range of
estimates. Where no amount within a range of estimates is more likely, then we accrue the minimum amount. Other than as
specifically disclosed in this Form 10-K, we do not expect these audits, investigations or disputes to have a material effect on our
results of operations, financial condition or liquidity, either individually or in the aggregate.
Tax Treatment of Carrier and Otis Dispositions. Management has determined that the distributions of Carrier and Otis on April
3, 2020, and certain related internal business separation transactions, qualified as tax-free under applicable law. In making these
determinations, we applied the tax law in the relevant jurisdictions to our facts and circumstances and obtained tax rulings from the
relevant taxing authorities, tax opinions, and/or other external tax advice related to the concluded tax treatment. If the completed
distributions of Carrier or Otis or certain internal business separation transactions, were to fail to qualify for tax-free treatment, the
Company could be subject to significant liabilities, and there could be material adverse impacts on the Company’s business, results
of operations, financial condition or liquidity in future reporting periods.
Legal Proceedings. The Company and its subsidiaries are subject to various contract pricing disputes, government investigations
and litigation matters across jurisdictions, updates to certain of which are set forth below.
Cost Accounting Standards Claims
As previously disclosed, in April 2019, a Divisional Administrative Contracting Officer (DACO) of the United States DCMA
asserted a claim against Pratt & Whitney to recover alleged overpayments of approximately $1.73 billion plus interest ($843
million at December 31, 2022). The claim is based on Pratt & Whitney’s alleged noncompliance with Cost Accounting Standards
(CAS) from January 1, 2007 to March 31, 2019, due to its method of allocating independent research and development costs to
government contracts. Pratt & Whitney believes that the claim is without merit and filed an appeal to the ASBCA on June 7, 2019.
As previously disclosed, in December 2013, a DCMA DACO asserted a claim against Pratt & Whitney to recover alleged
overpayments of approximately $177 million plus interest ($132 million at December 31, 2022). The claim is based on Pratt &
Whitney’s alleged noncompliance with CAS from January 1, 2005 to December 31, 2012, due to its method of determining the cost
of collaborator parts used in the calculation of material overhead costs for government contracts. In 2014, Pratt & Whitney filed an
appeal to the ASBCA. An evidentiary hearing was held and completed in June 2019. On November 22, 2021, the ASBCA issued its
written decision sustaining in part and denying in part Pratt & Whitney’s appeal. The ASBCA rejected the DCMA’s asserted
measure of the cost of collaborator parts, and ruled substantially in Pratt & Whitney’s favor on other liability issues. The ASBCA
remanded the appeal to the parties for resolution of damages issues, which could require further proceedings at the ASBCA. On
December 23, 2021, the DCMA filed a motion with the ASBCA seeking partial reconsideration of the November 22, 2021 decision.
The motion for reconsideration was denied on August 29, 2022. On December 23, 2022, the DCMA filed an appeal to the United
States Court of Appeals for the Federal Circuit. We continue to believe that the
105
Table of Contents
ASBCA’s rejection of the DCMA’s asserted measure of the cost of collaborator parts is well supported in fact and law and likely
will be sustained. In December 2018, a DCMA DACO issued a second claim against Pratt & Whitney that similarly alleges that its
method of determining the cost of collaborator parts does not comply with the CAS for calendar years 2013 through 2017. This
second claim, which asserts the same measure of the cost of collaborator parts rejected by the ASBCA’s recent decision, demands
payment of $269 million plus interest ($96 million at December 31, 2022). Pratt & Whitney appealed this second claim to the
ASBCA in January 2019. Although subject to further litigation at the ASBCA and potentially further litigation at the ASBCA and
potentially further appellate proceedings, we continue to believe that the November 22, 2021 decision in the first claim will apply
with equal legal effect to the second claim. Accordingly, we believe that the amounts demanded by the DCMA as set forth in the
two claims are without legal basis and that any damages owed to the U.S. government for the two claims will not have a material
adverse effect on our results of operations, financial condition or liquidity.
Thales-Raytheon Systems and Related Matters
As previously disclosed, in 2019, Raytheon Company received a subpoena from the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC)
seeking information in connection with an investigation into whether there were improper payments made by Raytheon Company,
our joint venture known as Thales-Raytheon Systems (TRS) or anyone acting on their behalf in connection with TRS or Raytheon
Company contracts in certain Middle East countries since 2014. In the first quarter of 2020, the DOJ advised Raytheon Company it
had opened a parallel criminal investigation. In the third quarter of 2020, Raytheon Company received an additional subpoena from
the SEC, seeking information and documents as part of its ongoing investigation. The Company maintains a rigorous anti-
corruption compliance program, and continues to cooperate fully with the SEC’s and DOJ’s inquiries and to examine through our
own investigation whether there were any improper payments or any such conduct that was in violation of Raytheon Company
policy. At this time, the Company is unable to predict the outcome of the SEC’s or DOJ’s inquiries. Based on the information
available to date, however, we cannot reasonably estimate the range of any potential loss or impact to the business that may result,
but do not believe that the results of these inquiries will have a material adverse effect on our results of operations, financial
condition or liquidity.
DOJ Investigation, Contract Pricing Disputes and Related Civil Litigation
As previously disclosed, on October 8, 2020, the Company received a criminal subpoena from the DOJ seeking information and
documents in connection with an investigation relating to financial accounting, internal controls over financial reporting, and cost
reporting regarding Raytheon Company’s Missiles & Defense (RMD) business since 2009. The investigation involves multi-year
contracts subject to governmental regulation, including potential civil defective pricing claims for three RMD contracts entered into
between 2011 and 2013. As part of the same investigation, on March 24, 2021, the Company received a second criminal subpoena
from the DOJ seeking documents relating to a different RMD contract entered into in 2017. We are cooperating fully with, and will
continue to review the issues raised by the DOJ’s ongoing investigation. We continue to make substantial progress in our internal
review of the issues raised by the DOJ investigation. Although we believe we have defenses to the potential claims, the Company
has determined that there is a probable risk of liability for damages, interest and potential penalties and has accrued approximately
$290 million for this matter. We are currently unable to estimate an incremental loss, if any, which may result when the DOJ
investigation is complete. Based on the information available to date, we do not believe the results of the DOJ investigation or of
any pending or potential civil litigation will have a material adverse effect on our results of operations, financial condition or
liquidity.
Four shareholder lawsuits were filed against the Company after the DOJ investigation was first disclosed. A putative securities class
action lawsuit was filed in the United States District Court for the District of Arizona against the Company and certain of its
executives alleging that the defendants violated federal securities laws by making material misstatements in regulatory filings
regarding internal controls over financial reporting in RMD. Three shareholder derivative lawsuits were also filed in the United
States District Court for the District of Delaware against the former Raytheon Company Board of Directors, the Company and
certain of its executives, each alleging that defendants violated federal securities laws and breached their fiduciary duties by
engaging in improper accounting practices, failing to implement sufficient internal financial and compliance controls, and making a
series of false and misleading statements in regulatory filings. We believe that each of these lawsuits lacks merit.
Darnis, et al. and Related Matter
As previously disclosed, on August 12, 2020, several former employees of UTC or its subsidiaries filed a putative class action
complaint in the United States District Court for the District of Connecticut against the Company, Otis, Carrier, the former
members of the UTC Board of Directors, and the members of the Carrier and Otis Boards of Directors (Geraud Darnis, et al. v.
Raytheon Technologies Corporation, et al.). The complaint challenged the method by which UTC equity awards were converted to
Company, Otis, and Carrier equity awards following the separation of UTC into three independent, publicly-traded companies on
April 3, 2020. The complaint also claimed that the defendants are liable for breach of certain equity
106
Table of Contents
compensation plans and also asserted claims under certain provisions of the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974
(ERISA). On September 13, 2021, Plaintiffs filed an amended complaint which supersedes the initial complaint and continues to
assert claims for breach of the equity compensation plans against the Company, Otis and Carrier, but no longer asserts ERISA
claims. Further, no claim is made in the amended complaint against any current or former director of any of the three companies.
Plaintiffs seek money damages, attorneys’ fees and other relief. On September 30, 2022, in response to motions to dismiss filed by
the Company, Otis and Carrier, the Court dismissed the class action in its entirety with prejudice. On October 26, 2022, Plaintiffs
filed an appeal to the United States Court of Appeals for the Second Circuit. We continue to believe that this matter will not have a
material adverse effect on our results of operations, financial condition or liquidity. On December 6, 2022, a shareholder derivative
lawsuit was filed in the Delaware Court of Chancery against the Company and certain current and former members of its Board of
Directors, alleging that defendants breached their fiduciary duties in May 2020 by amending the method by which UTC equity
awards were converted to certain Company equity awards following the separation of UTC into three independent, publicly-traded
companies. We believe that the lawsuit lacks merit.
DOJ Grand Jury Investigation and Related Civil Litigation
The Company received a grand jury subpoena in late 2019, as part of a DOJ criminal investigation into purported agreements not to
solicit or hire employees in violation of the federal antitrust laws. While the investigation has focused on alleged hiring restrictions
between and among Pratt & Whitney and certain of its suppliers of outsourced engineering services, the subpoena also included
requests regarding Collins. Since receipt of the subpoena, the Company has been cooperating with the DOJ investigation. On
December 15, 2021, a criminal indictment was filed in the United States District Court for the District of Connecticut, against a
former Pratt & Whitney employee and other employees of certain outsourced engineering suppliers charging each of them with one
count of violating the federal antitrust laws. No current or former Collins employees were named in the indictment. We have been
advised that the Company is a target of the DOJ investigation, and we continue to cooperate with the investigation. No criminal
charge has been filed against the Company or its affiliates.
After the criminal charges against the individuals were filed, numerous civil class action antitrust lawsuits have been filed against
Pratt & Whitney and other corporate and individual defendants in the United States District Court for the District of Connecticut.
The allegations in each of the civil lawsuits track the factual assertions in the criminal indictment and generally allege that Pratt &
Whitney and the other defendants agreed to restrict the hiring and recruiting of certain engineers and skilled laborers in a manner
that violated federal antitrust laws. Plaintiffs in each of the civil lawsuits seek to represent different purported classes of engineers
and skilled laborers employed by Pratt & Whitney and other supplier-defendants since 2011. Plaintiffs in each of the lawsuits seek
treble damages in an undetermined amount, plus attorneys’ fees and costs of suit. All of the lawsuits have been consolidated and a
single amended class action complaint was filed. We believe that the claims asserted lack merit. Based on the information available
to date, we do not believe that this matter will have a material adverse effect on our results of operations, financial condition or
liquidity.
Where appropriate, we have recorded loss contingency accruals for the above-referenced matters, and the amounts individually, or
in the aggregate, are not material.
Other. As described in “Note 17: Guarantees,” we extend performance and operating cost guarantees beyond our normal warranty
and service policies for extended periods on some of our products. We have accrued our estimate of the liability that may result
under these guarantees and for service costs that are probable and can be reasonably estimated.
We also have other commitments and contingent liabilities related to legal proceedings, self-insurance programs and matters arising
out of the normal course of business. We accrue contingencies based upon a range of possible outcomes. If no amount within this
range is a better estimate than any other, then we accrue the minimum amount.
In the ordinary course of business, the Company and its subsidiaries are also routinely defendants in, parties to or otherwise subject
to many pending and threatened legal actions, claims, disputes and proceedings. These matters are often based on alleged violations
of contract, product liability, warranty, regulatory, environmental, health and safety, employment, intellectual property, tax and
other laws. In some instances, claims for substantial monetary damages are asserted against the Company and its subsidiaries and
could result in fines, penalties, compensatory or treble damages or non-monetary relief. We do not believe that these matters will
have a material adverse effect upon our results of operations, financial condition or liquidity.
107
Table of Contents
NOTE 19: ACCUMULATED OTHER COMPREHENSIVE LOSS
A summary of the changes in each component of Accumulated other comprehensive (loss) income, net of tax is provided below:
(dollars in millions)Foreign
Currency
TranslationDefined Benefit
Pension and
Postretirement
PlansUnrealized
Hedging
(Losses) GainsAccumulated
Other
Comprehensive
(Loss) Income
Balance at December 31, 2019 $ (3,211)$ (6,772)$ (166)$ (10,149)
Other comprehensive income (loss) before reclassifications, net 609 1,842 181 2,632 
Amounts reclassified, pre-tax — 373 82 455 
Tax benefit (expense) 25 (510) (62) (547)
Separation of Carrier and Otis, net of tax 3,287 584 4 3,875 
Balance at December 31, 2020 $ 710 $ (4,483)$ 39 $ (3,734)
Other comprehensive income before reclassifications, net (647) 3,210 (226) 2,337 
Amounts reclassified, pre-tax — 258 (28) 230 
Tax benefit (expense) (14) (813) 79 (748)
Balance at December 31, 2021 $ 49 $ (1,828)$ (136)$ (1,915)
Other comprehensive income (loss) before reclassifications, net (1,050) 1,225 (246) (71)
Amounts reclassified, pre-tax 2 129 103 234 
Tax benefit (expense) (6) (308) 48 (266)
Balance at December 31, 2022 $ (1,005)$ (782)$ (231)$ (2,018)
Amounts reclassified that relate to our defined benefit pension and postretirement plans include the amortization of prior service
costs and actuarial net gains or losses recognized during each period presented. These costs are recorded as components of net
periodic pension income for each period presented. See “Note 11: Employee Benefit Plans” for additional details.
All noncontrolling interests with redemption features, such as put options, that are not solely within our control (redeemable
noncontrolling interests) are reported in the mezzanine section of the Consolidated Balance Sheet, between liabilities and equity, at
the greater of redemption value or initial carrying value.
NOTE 20: STOCK-BASED COMPENSATION
RTC’s long-term incentive plans authorize various types of market and performance based incentive awards that may be granted to
officers and key employees. Certain historic awards remain outstanding under predecessor plans. The Raytheon Technologies
Corporation 2018 Long-Term Incentive Plan, as amended and restated (2018 LTIP) was approved by shareowners on April 26,
2021. A total of 134.8 million shares have been authorized for issuance pursuant to awards under the 2018 LTIP including shares
assumed from predecessor plans. There is also an additional 21.5 million shares for future issuance due to adjustments related to the
Separation Transactions. As of December 31, 2022, approximately 81.2 million shares remain available for awards under the 2018
LTIP. The 2018 LTIP does not contain aggregate annual award limits, however, it sets an annual award limit per participant. The
2018 LTIP will expire after all authorized shares have been awarded or April 26, 2031, whichever is sooner.
Under the 2018 LTIP, the exercise price of awards is set on the grant date and may not be less than the fair market value per share
on that date. Generally, stock appreciation rights and stock options have a term of ten years and a three-year vesting period, subject
to limited exceptions. In the event of retirement, annual stock appreciation rights, stock options, and RSUs held for more than one
year may become vested and exercisable, subject to certain terms and conditions. LTIP awards with performance-based vesting
generally have a minimum three-year vesting period and vest based on actual performance against pre-established metrics. In the
event of retirement, performance-based awards held for more than one year, remain eligible to vest based on actual performance
relative to performance goals. We have historically repurchased shares of our common stock in an amount at least equal to the
number of shares issued under our equity compensation arrangements and will continue to evaluate this policy in conjunction with
our overall share repurchase program.
108
Table of Contents
We measure the cost of all share-based payments, including stock options and stock appreciation rights, at fair value on the grant
date and recognize this cost in the Consolidated Statement of Operations, net of expected forfeitures, as follows:
(dollars in millions) 2022 2021 2020
Total compensation cost recognized $ 420 $ 442 $ 330 
The associated future income tax benefit recognized was $91 million, $83 million and $63 million for the years ended December
31, 2022, 2021 and 2020, respectively.
For the years ended December 31, 2022, 2021 and 2020, the amount of cash received from the exercise of stock options was $20
million, $7 million and $15 million, respectively, with an associated tax benefit realized of $32 million, $42 million and $48
million, respectively. In addition, for the years ended December 31, 2022, 2021 and 2020, the associated tax benefit realized from
the vesting of performance share units (PSUs), restricted stock awards and RSUs was $80 million, $44 million and $58 million,
respectively.
At December 31, 2022, there was $329 million of total unrecognized compensation cost related to non-vested equity awards
granted under long-term incentive plans. This cost is expected to be recognized ratably over a weighted-average period of 2.1 years.
A summary of the transactions under our long-term incentive plans for the year ended December 31, 2022 follows.
 Stock Options Stock Appreciation Rights Performance Share Units Restricted Stock and RSUs
(shares and units in thousands) SharesAverage PriceSharesAverage PriceUnitsAverage PriceUnitsAverage Price
Outstanding at:
December 31, 2021 1,849 $ 78.36 33,061 $ 78.62 1,265 $ 73.75 11,443 $ 66.18 
Granted 102 94.04 3,225 94.06 990 96.15 3,441 97.76 
Exercised / earned (283) 70.20 (3,827) 70.53 (1) 80.53 (4,476) 62.03 
Cancelled (11) 94.04 (427) 86.34 (104) 85.06 (651) 78.38 
December 31, 2022 1,657 $ 80.67 32,032 $ 81.04 2,150 $ 83.52 9,757 $ 78.40 
(1)    Weighted-average exercise price.
(2)    Weighted-average grant date fair value.
The weighted-average grant date fair value of stock options and stock appreciation rights granted during 2022, 2021 and 2020 was
$21.80, $15.60 and $23.37, respectively. The weighted-average grant date fair value of performance share units, which vest upon
achieving certain performance metrics, granted during 2022 and 2021 was $96.15 and $73.75, respectively. There were no
performance share units granted in 2020. The total fair value of awards vested during the years ended December 31, 2022, 2021
and 2020 was $346 million, $287 million and $284 million, respectively. The total intrinsic value (which is the amount by which
the stock price exceeded the exercise price on the date of exercise) of stock options and stock appreciation rights exercised during
the years ended December 31, 2022, 2021 and 2020 was $110 million, $54 million and $206 million, respectively. The total
intrinsic value (which is the stock price at vesting multiplied by the number of underlying shares) of performance share units and
other restricted awards vested was $427 million, $256 million and $295 million during the years ended December 31, 2022, 2021
and 2020, respectively.
The following table summarizes information about equity awards outstanding that are vested and expected to vest as well as equity
awards outstanding that are exercisable at December 31, 2022:
 Equity Awards Vested and Expected to Vest Equity Awards That Are Exercisable
(shares in thousands; aggregate intrinsic
value in millions) AwardsAverage
Price Aggregate
Intrinsic
ValueRemaining
Term AwardsAverage
Price Aggregate
Intrinsic
ValueRemaining
Term 
Stock Options 1,654 $80.61 $ 34 5.36 1,182 $77.13 $ 28 4.47
Stock Appreciation Rights 31,896 81.01 635 5.56 22,118 77.68 514 4.52
Performance Share Units 2,105 83.41 212 1.48
Restricted Stock and RSUs 9,417 78.02 950 1.54
(1)    Weighted-average exercise price per share.
(2)    Weighted-average contractual remaining term in years.(1) (1) (2) (1)
(1) (2) (1) (2)
109
Table of Contents
The fair value of each option award is estimated on the date of grant using a binomial lattice model. The following table indicates
the assumptions used in estimating fair value for awards granted during 2022, 2021 and 2020. Lattice-based option models
incorporate ranges of assumptions for inputs; those ranges are as follows:
2022 2021 2020
Expected volatility 27.9% 29.9% 18.8%
Weighted-average volatility 28 % 30 % 19 %
Expected term (in years) 6.5 6.5 6.5
Expected dividend yield 2.2 % 2.6 % 1.9 %
Risk-free rate 0.02% - 2.1% 0.04% - 1.2% 1.4% - 1.6%
Expected volatilities are based on the returns of our stock, including implied volatilities from traded options on our stock for the
binomial lattice model. We use historical data to estimate equity award exercise and employee termination behavior within the
valuation model. The expected term represents an estimate of the period of time equity awards are expected to remain outstanding.
The risk-free rate is based on the term structure of interest rates at the time of equity award grant.
NOTE 21: SEGMENT FINANCIAL DATA
Our operations, for the periods presented herein, are classified into four principal segments: Collins, Pratt & Whitney, RIS and
RMD. The segments are generally based on the management structure of the businesses and the grouping of similar operating
companies, where each management organization has general operating autonomy over diversified products and services. The
results of RIS and RMD reflect the period subsequent to the completion of the Raytheon merger on April 3, 2020. The Company
recently announced its intention to streamline the structure of its core businesses into three principal business segments: Collins
Aerospace, Pratt & Whitney and Raytheon. The Company plans to determine the exact composition of each segment and
implement the reorganization in the second half of 2023, at which time management will begin to manage its operations under its
new segment structure. The changes will require the Company to revise its segment reporting. All segment information included in
this Form 10-K is reflective of the existing four segments of Collins, Pratt & Whitney, RIS and RMD in accordance with the
management structure in place as of December 31, 2022.
Collins Aerospace is a leading global provider of technologically advanced aerospace and defense products and aftermarket
service solutions for aircraft manufacturers, airlines, and regional, business and general aviation, as well as for defense and
commercial space operations. Collins’ product lines include integrated avionics systems, aviation systems, communications
systems, navigation systems, electric power generation, management and distribution systems, environmental control systems,
flight control systems, air data and aircraft sensing systems, engine control systems, engine components, engine nacelle systems,
including thrust reversers and mounting pylons, interior and exterior aircraft lighting, aircraft seating and cargo systems, evacuation
systems, landing systems, including landing gear, wheels and braking systems, hoists and winches, fire and ice detection and
protection systems, actuation systems, and propeller systems. Collins also designs, manufactures, and supports cabin interior,
oxygen systems, food and beverage preparation, storage and galley systems, lavatory and wastewater management systems.
Collins’ solutions support human space exploration with environmental control and power systems and extravehicular activity suits
and support government and defense customer missions by providing airborne intelligence, surveillance and reconnaissance
systems, test and training range systems, crew escape systems, and simulation and training solutions. Collins also provides
connected aviation solutions and services through worldwide voice and data communication networks and solutions. Aftermarket
services include spare parts, overhaul and repair, engineering and technical support, training and fleet management solutions, asset
management services and information management services.
Pratt & Whitney is among the world’s leading suppliers of aircraft engines for commercial, military, business jet and general
aviation customers. Pratt & Whitney’s Commercial Engines and Military Engines businesses design, develop, produce and maintain
families of large engines for wide- and narrow-body and large regional aircraft for commercial customers and for fighter, bomber,
tanker and transport aircraft for military customers. Pratt & Whitney’s small engine business, Pratt & Whitney Canada (P&WC), is
among the world’s leading suppliers of engines powering regional airlines, general and business aviation, as well as helicopters.
Pratt & Whitney also produces, sells and services military and commercial auxiliary power units. Pratt & Whitney provides fleet
management services and aftermarket maintenance, repair and overhaul services in all of these segments.
Raytheon Intelligence & Space is a leading provider of integrated space, communication and sensor systems, and cyber and
software solutions to intelligence, defense, federal and commercial customers. RIS’s Sensing and Effects business provides
intelligence, surveillance and reconnaissance, precision targeting radars, and electronic warfare solutions across all domains, as
well as end-to-end space solutions, including missile warning and intelligence, weather, and navigation. RIS Sensing and Effects
products include the Multi-Spectral Targeting System (MTS) product family of sensors, Electro Optical Distributed
110
Table of Contents
Aperture System (EODAS), AN/APG-79 AESA Radar, AN/APG-82(V)1 AESA Radar, Next Generation Jammer Mid-Band (NGJ-
MB), Global Positioning System (GPS) Next-Generation Operational Control System (GPS-OCX), Next Generation Overhead
Persistent Infrared (OPIR), and Future Operationally Resilient Ground Evolution (FORGE). RIS’s Command, Control and
Communications business provides automated battle management and secure, resilient communications systems, including
terminals providing satellite communications connecting submarines, ships, aircraft and ground stations for the U.S. Department of
Defense (DoD), identification friend or foe interrogators and transponders, and automation, surveillance, navigation, and landing
solutions including the Joint Precision Approach Landing System (JPALS). RIS’s Cyber, Training and Services provides full-
spectrum cyber and service solutions in every domain, including offensive and defensive cyber services for certain classified and
department of defense customers, cyber protection solutions which secure and monitor information technology (IT) systems and
networks across the federal and commercial domains, and high consequence missions which provide classified special mission
support and IT intelligence services to certain classified customers.
Raytheon Missiles & Defense is a leading provider of end-to-end solutions for U.S. and foreign government customers designed
to detect, track and engage threats. RMD’s systems span air, land, sea and space, and are designed to defend against the most
sophisticated threats. RMD’s Air Power business provides air-to-air and air-to-ground weapons that deliver power and precision to
fourth- and fifth-generation fighters including the Advanced Medium Range Air-to-Air Missile (AMRAAM) and StormBreaker
smart weapon, and ground-based sensors for persistent wide-area defense and space surveillance including Early Warning Radar.
RMD’s Land Warfare and Air Defense business provides capabilities ranging from precision weapons including Excalibur, Javelin,
Stinger and TOW to integrated air and missile defense, including the proven Patriot air and missile defense system, the Guidance
Enhanced Missile (GEM-T), the National Advanced Surface-to-Air Missile System (NASAMS) and the GhostEye family of radars,
including the Lower Tier Air and Missile Defense Sensor (LTAMDS). RMD’s Naval Power business provides advanced sensors,
command and control and weapons to protect ships and sailors around the world, including AIM-9X Sidewinder, Tomahawk,
Standard Missile 2 (SM-2) and Standard Missile 6 (SM-6) missiles, and the SPY-6 family of radars. RMD’s Strategic Missile
Defense business provides technologically advanced sensors, satellites and interceptors including the AN/TPY-2 radar, Standard
Missile 3 (SM-3) Block IA/IB/IIA missiles and development of future integrated missile defense solutions. RMD’s Advanced
Technology business focuses on the development and early introduction of next-generation technologies and systems, including
hypersonics, counter-hypersonics, directed energy, advanced weapons and next-generation radars.
Segment Information. Total sales and operating profit by segment include inter-segment sales which are generally recorded at
cost-plus a specified fee or at a negotiated fixed price. These pricing arrangements may result in margins different than what the
purchasing segment realizes on the ultimate third-party sales.
We present a FAS/CAS operating adjustment outside of segment results, which represents the difference between the service cost
component of our pension and PRB expense under the Financial Accounting Standards (FAS) requirements of U.S. GAAP and our
pension and PRB expense under U.S. government Cost Accounting Standards (CAS) primarily related to our RIS and RMD
segments. While the ultimate liability for pension and PRB costs under FAS and CAS is similar, the pattern of cost recognition is
different. Over time, we generally expect to recover the related RIS and RMD pension and PRB liabilities through the pricing of
our products and services to the U.S. government. Collins and Pratt & Whitney generally record pension and PRB expense on a
FAS basis.
Acquisition accounting adjustments include the amortization of acquired intangible assets related to acquisitions, the amortization
of the property, plant and equipment fair value adjustment acquired through acquisitions, the amortization of customer contractual
obligations related to loss making or below market contracts acquired, and goodwill impairment. These adjustments are not
considered part of management’s evaluation of segment results.
111
Table of Contents
Segment information for the years ended December 31 are as follows:
 Net Sales Operating Profit (Loss) Operating Profit (Loss) Margins
(dollars in millions) 2022 2021 2020 2022 2021 2020 2022 2021 2020
Collins Aerospace $20,597 $18,449 $19,288 $2,343 $1,759 $1,466 11.4 % 9.5 % 7.6 %
Pratt & Whitney 20,530 18,150 16,799 1,075 454 (564) 5.2 % 2.5 % (3.4)%
Raytheon Intelligence &
Space 14,312 15,180 11,069 1,342 1,833 1,020 9.4 % 12.1 % 9.2 %
Raytheon Missiles &
Defense 14,863 15,539 11,396 1,519 2,004 880 10.2 % 12.9 % 7.7 %
Total segment 70,302 67,318 58,552 6,279 6,050 2,802 8.9 % 9.0 % 4.8 %
Eliminations and other (3,228) (2,930) (1,965) (174) (133) (107)
Corporate expenses and
other unallocated items — — — (318) (552) (590)
FAS/CAS operating
adjustment — — — 1,520 1,796 1,106 
Acquisition accounting
adjustments — — — (1,893)(2,203) (5,100)
Consolidated $67,074 $64,388 $56,587 $5,414 $4,958 $(1,889) 8.1 % 7.7 % (3.3)%
(1)    Includes the operating results of certain smaller non-reportable business segments. 2020 amounts include Forcepoint, LLC, which was acquired as part of the
Raytheon merger, and subsequently disposed of on January 8, 2021.
(2)    Includes the net expenses related to the U.S. Army’s LTAMDS project.
(3)    Operating profit (loss) in 2020 includes the $3.2 billion goodwill impairment charge in the second quarter of 2020 related to two Collins reporting units. Refer
to “Note 2: Business Acquisitions, Dispositions, Goodwill and Intangible Assets” for additional information.
 Total Assets Capital Expenditures Depreciation & Amortization
(dollars in millions) 2022 2021 2022 2021 2020 2022 2021 2020
Collins Aerospace $67,030 $67,564 $ 655 $ 665 $ 638 $ 742 $ 728 $ 736 
Pratt & Whitney 36,205 33,414 949 700 565 724 642 729 
Raytheon Intelligence & Space 21,174 21,545 320 305 218 209 187 154 
Raytheon Missiles & Defense 27,852 28,766 260 287 280 333 333 228 
Total segment 152,261 151,289 2,184 1,957 1,701 2,008 1,890 1,847 
Corporate, eliminations and other 6,603 10,115 104 177 94 99 152 155 
Acquisition accounting adjustments 2,001 2,515 2,154 
Consolidated $158,864 $161,404 $2,288 $2,134 $1,795 $4,108 $4,557 $4,156 
(1)    Total assets include acquired intangible assets and the property, plant and equipment fair value adjustment. Related amortization expense is included in
Acquisition accounting adjustments.
Geographic External Sales by Origin and Long-Lived Assets. Geographic external sales are attributed to the geographic regions
based on their location of origin. U.S. external sales include export sales to commercial customers outside the U.S. and sales to the
U.S. government, commercial and affiliated customers, which are known to be for resale to customers outside the U.S. Long-lived
assets are Fixed assets, net attributed to the specific geographic regions.
 External Net Sales Long-Lived Assets
(dollars in millions) 2022 2021 2020 2022 2021
United States $57,869 $55,837 $48,560 $12,162 $11,731 
International
Europe 3,874 3,630 3,696 1,132 1,255 
Asia Pacific 1,778 1,748 1,574 801 854 
Middle East and North Africa 173 136 103 113 129 
Other 3,380 3,037 2,654 962 1,003 
Consolidated $67,074 $64,388 $56,587 $15,170 $14,972 
Disaggregation of Revenue. We also disaggregate our contracts from customers by geographic region based on customer location,
by customer and by sales type. Our geographic region based on customer location uses end user customer location where known or
practical to determine, or in instances where the end user customer is not known or not practical to determine, we utilize “ship to”
location as the customer location. In addition, for our RIS and RMD segments, we disaggregate our(1)
(2)
(3)
(1)
(1)
(1)
(1)
112
Table of Contents
contracts from customers by contract type. We believe these categories best depict how the nature, amount, timing and uncertainty
of our revenue and cash flows are affected by economic factors.
Segment sales disaggregated by geographic region for the years ended December 31 are as follows:
2022
(dollars in millions)Collins
Aerospace Pratt & WhitneyRaytheon
Intelligence &
SpaceRaytheon
Missiles &
Defense Other Total
United States $ 9,847 $ 10,433 $ 11,418 $ 9,482 $ 10 $ 41,190 
Europe 5,374 4,211 418 1,108 — 11,111 
Asia Pacific 2,021 3,775 747 1,514 — 8,057 
Middle East and North Africa 474 450 231 2,444 — 3,599 
Other 1,240 1,658 141 78 — 3,117 
Consolidated net sales 18,956 20,527 12,955 14,626 10 67,074 
Inter-segment sales 1,641 3 1,357 237 (3,238) — 
Business segment sales $ 20,597 $ 20,530 $ 14,312 $ 14,863 $ (3,228)$ 67,074 
2021
(dollars in millions)Collins
Aerospace Pratt & WhitneyRaytheon
Intelligence &
SpaceRaytheon
Missiles &
Defense Other Total
United States $ 9,341 $ 9,034 $ 12,126 $ 9,495 $ 15 $ 40,011 
Europe 4,421 3,488 434 1,255 — 9,598 
Asia Pacific 1,851 3,885 771 1,462 — 7,969 
Middle East and North Africa 462 441 469 3,007 — 4,379 
Other 915 1,302 144 70 — 2,431 
Consolidated net sales 16,990 18,150 13,944 15,289 15 64,388 
Inter-segment sales 1,459 — 1,236 250 (2,945) — 
Business segment sales $ 18,449 $ 18,150 $ 15,180 $ 15,539 $ (2,930)$ 64,388 
2020
(dollars in millions)Collins
Aerospace Pratt & WhitneyRaytheon
Intelligence &
SpaceRaytheon
Missiles &
Defense Other Total
United States $ 10,132 $ 8,534 $ 8,704 $ 6,906 $ 284 $ 34,560 
Europe 4,643 2,726 307 1,031 149 8,856 
Asia Pacific 1,810 4,024 637 1,132 41 7,644 
Middle East and North Africa 421 505 410 2,077 30 3,443 
Other 904 1,001 83 73 23 2,084 
Consolidated net sales 17,910 16,790 10,141 11,219 527 56,587 
Inter-segment sales 1,378 9 928 177 (2,492) — 
Business segment sales $ 19,288 $ 16,799 $ 11,069 $ 11,396 $ (1,965)$ 56,587 
113
Table of Contents
Segment sales disaggregated by type of customer for the years ended December 31 are as follows:
2022
(dollars in millions)Collins
Aerospace Pratt & WhitneyRaytheon
Intelligence &
SpaceRaytheon
Missiles &
Defense Other Total
U.S. government $ 4,337 $ 5,272 $ 11,221 $ 9,477 $ 10 $ 30,317 
Foreign military sales through the
U.S. government 238 1,115 604 3,085 — 5,042 
Foreign government direct
commercial sales 978 474 827 2,048 — 4,327 
Commercial aerospace and other
commercial 13,403 13,666 303 16 — 27,388 
Consolidated net sales 18,956 20,527 12,955 14,626 10 67,074 
Inter-segment sales 1,641 3 1,357 237 (3,238) — 
Business segment sales $ 20,597 $ 20,530 $ 14,312 $ 14,863 $ (3,228)$ 67,074 
(1)    Excludes foreign military sales through the U.S. government.
2021
(dollars in millions)Collins
Aerospace Pratt & WhitneyRaytheon
Intelligence &
SpaceRaytheon
Missiles &
Defense Other Total
U.S. government $ 4,685 $ 5,140 $ 11,844 $ 9,493 $ 15 $ 31,177 
Foreign military sales through the
U.S. government 168 1,273 825 3,280 — 5,546 
Foreign government direct
commercial sales 1,095 541 844 2,513 — 4,993 
Commercial aerospace and other
commercial 11,042 11,196 431 3 — 22,672 
Consolidated net sales 16,990 18,150 13,944 15,289 15 64,388 
Inter-segment sales 1,459 — 1,236 250 (2,945) — 
Business segment sales $ 18,449 $ 18,150 $ 15,180 $ 15,539 $ (2,930)$ 64,388 
(1)    Excludes foreign military sales through the U.S. government.
2020
(dollars in millions)Collins
Aerospace Pratt & WhitneyRaytheon
Intelligence &
SpaceRaytheon
Missiles &
Defense Other Total
U.S. government $ 5,159 $ 5,193 $ 8,512 $ 6,896 $ 202 $ 25,962 
Foreign military sales through the
U.S. government 218 1,229 640 2,498 — 4,585 
Foreign government direct
commercial sales 923 583 740 1,725 3 3,974 
Commercial aerospace and other
commercial 11,610 9,785 249 100 322 22,066 
Consolidated net sales 17,910 16,790 10,141 11,219 527 56,587 
Inter-segment sales 1,378 9 928 177 (2,492) — 
Business segment sales $ 19,288 $ 16,799 $ 11,069 $ 11,396 $ (1,965)$ 56,587 
(1)    Excludes foreign military sales through the U.S. government.
Sales to Airbus primarily relate to Pratt & Whitney and Collins products, and prior to discounts and incentives were approximately
14%, 12% and 13% of total net sales in 2022, 2021 and 2020, respectively.(1)
(1)
(1)
114
Table of Contents
Segment sales disaggregated by sales type for the years ended December 31 are as follows:
2022
(dollars in millions)Collins
Aerospace Pratt & WhitneyRaytheon
Intelligence &
SpaceRaytheon
Missiles &
Defense Other Total
Products $ 14,857 $ 12,411 $ 10,261 $ 13,234 $ 10 $ 50,773 
Services 4,099 8,116 2,694 1,392 — 16,301 
Consolidated net sales 18,956 20,527 12,955 14,626 10 67,074 
Inter-segment sales 1,641 3 1,357 237 (3,238) — 
Business segment sales $ 20,597 $ 20,530 $ 14,312 $ 14,863 $ (3,228)$ 67,074 
2021
(dollars in millions)Collins
Aerospace Pratt & WhitneyRaytheon
Intelligence &
SpaceRaytheon
Missiles &
Defense Other Total
Products $ 13,404 $ 11,189 $ 10,735 $ 13,927 $ 15 $ 49,270 
Services 3,586 6,961 3,209 1,362 — 15,118 
Consolidated net sales 16,990 18,150 13,944 15,289 15 64,388 
Inter-segment sales 1,459 — 1,236 250 (2,945) — 
Business segment sales $ 18,449 $ 18,150 $ 15,180 $ 15,539 $ (2,930)$ 64,388 
2020
(dollars in millions)Collins
Aerospace Pratt & WhitneyRaytheon
Intelligence &
SpaceRaytheon
Missiles &
Defense Other Total
Products $ 14,664 $ 10,186 $ 7,775 $ 10,232 $ 462 $ 43,319 
Services 3,246 6,604 2,366 987 65 13,268 
Consolidated net sales 17,910 16,790 10,141 11,219 527 56,587 
Inter-segment sales 1,378 9 928 177 (2,492) — 
Business segment sales $ 19,288 $ 16,799 $ 11,069 $ 11,396 $ (1,965)$ 56,587 
RIS and RMD segment sales disaggregated by contract type for the years ended December 31 are as follows:
2022 2021 2020
(dollars in millions)Raytheon
Intelligence &
SpaceRaytheon
Missiles &
DefenseRaytheon
Intelligence &
SpaceRaytheon
Missiles &
DefenseRaytheon
Intelligence &
SpaceRaytheon
Missiles &
Defense
Fixed-price $ 5,357 $ 8,763 $ 6,338 $ 9,406 $ 4,526 $ 7,080 
Cost-type 7,598 5,863 7,606 5,883 5,615 4,139 
Consolidated net sales 12,955 14,626 13,944 15,289 10,141 11,219 
Inter-segment sales 1,357 237 1,236 250 928 177 
Business segment sales $ 14,312 $ 14,863 $ 15,180 $ 15,539 $ 11,069 $ 11,396 
115
Table of Contents
ITEM 9. CHANGES IN AND DISAGREEMENTS WITH ACCOUNTANTS ON ACCOUNTING AND FINANCIAL
DISCLOSURE
None.
ITEM 9A. CONTROLS AND PROCEDURES
As required by Rule 13a-15 under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, we carried out an evaluation under the
supervision and with the participation of our management, including the Chairman, President and Chief Executive Officer (CEO),
the Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer (CFO) and the Corporate Vice President and Controller (Controller), of
the effectiveness of the design and operation of our disclosure controls and procedures. There are inherent limitations to the
effectiveness of any system of disclosure controls and procedures, including the possibility of human error and the circumvention
or overriding of the controls and procedures. Accordingly, even effective disclosure controls and procedures can only provide
reasonable assurance of achieving their control objectives. Based upon our evaluation, our CEO, CFO and Controller concluded
that our disclosure controls and procedures were effective to provide reasonable assurance that information required to be disclosed
by us in the reports that we file or submit under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, is recorded, processed,
summarized and reported within the time periods specified in the applicable rules and forms, and that it is accumulated and
communicated to our management, including our CEO, CFO and Controller, as appropriate, to allow timely decisions regarding
required disclosure.
Our management is responsible for establishing and maintaining adequate internal control over financial reporting. Internal control
over financial reporting is a process designed to provide reasonable assurance regarding the reliability of financial reporting and the
preparation of financial statements for external reporting purposes in accordance with accounting principles generally accepted in
the U.S. Because of its inherent limitations, internal control over financial reporting may not prevent or detect misstatements. Our
management has assessed the effectiveness of our internal control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2022. In making its
assessment, management has utilized the criteria set forth by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway
Commission in its 2013 Internal Control – Integrated Framework. Our management has concluded that based on its assessment, our
internal control over financial reporting was effective as of December 31, 2022. The effectiveness of our internal control over
financial reporting as of December 31, 2022 has been audited by PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP, an independent registered public
accounting firm, as stated in its report which is set forth in Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K. There were no changes in
our internal control over financial reporting during the quarter ended December 31, 2022 that have materially affected, or are
reasonably likely to materially affect, our internal control over financial reporting.
ITEM 9B. OTHER INFORMATION
None.
ITEM 9C. DISCLOSURE REGARDING FOREIGN JURISDICTIONS THAT PREVENT INSPECTIONS
Not applicable.
116
Table of Contents
PART III
ITEM 10. DIRECTORS, EXECUTIVE OFFICERS AND CORPORATE GOVERNANCE
The information required by Item 10 with respect to directors, the Audit Committee of the Board of Directors, audit committee
financial experts, and the procedures by which our shareowners may recommend nominees to our Board of Directors is
incorporated herein by reference to the sections of our Proxy Statement for the 2023 Annual Meeting of Shareowners titled
“Election of Directors” (including under the subheadings “Nominees” and “How Candidates Are Identified”) and “Corporate
Governance” (including under the subheading “Board Committees”).
Information about our Executive Officers
The following persons are executive officers of Raytheon Technologies Corporation:
Name Title Other Business Experience Since 1/1/2018Age as of
2/6/2023
Christopher T. Calio Chief Operating Officer, (since
March 2022)President, Pratt & Whitney; President, Commercial
Engines, Pratt & Whitney; Executive Assistant to the
Chairman & CEO, United Technologies Corporation49
Kevin G. DaSilva Corporate Vice President,
Treasurer, Raytheon Technologies
Corporation (since April 2020)Vice President and Treasurer, Raytheon Company 59
Shane G. Eddy President, Pratt & Whitney (since
March 2022)Chief Operations Officer, Pratt & Whitney; Senior
Vice President, Operations, Pratt & Whitney58
Gregory J. Hayes Chairman (since June 2021)
President and Chief Executive
Officer, Raytheon Technologies
Corporation (since November
2014)President, Chief Executive Officer and Director,
Raytheon Technologies Corporation; Chairman,
President and Chief Executive Officer, United
Technologies Corporation62
Amy L. Johnson Corporate Vice President,
Controller, Raytheon Technologies
Corporation (since September
2021)Vice President, Finance, Pratt & Whitney Commercial
Engines; Vice President and Controller, Pratt &
Whitney48
Wesley D. Kremer President, Raytheon Missiles &
Defense (since April 2020)Vice President of Raytheon Company and President of
its Missile Systems business unit; President, Integrated
Defense Systems, Raytheon Company58
Ramsaran Maharajh, Jr.Executive Vice President and
General Counsel, Raytheon
Technologies Corporation (since
December 2021)Vice President, Legal, Raytheon Technologies
Corporation; Chief of Staff, Office of the Chief
Executive Officer, Raytheon Technologies
Corporation; Executive Assistant to Chairman & CEO,
United Technologies Corporation; Vice President &
General Counsel, Pratt & Whitney51
Neil G. Mitchill, Jr. Executive Vice President and Chief
Financial Officer, Raytheon
Technologies Corporation (since
April 2021)Corporate Vice President, Financial Planning &
Analysis & Investor Relations, Raytheon Technologies
Corporation; Acting Senior Vice President & Chief
Financial Officer, United Technologies Corporation;
Corporate Vice President, FP&A and Investor
Relations, United Technologies Corporation; Vice
President & Chief Financial Officer, Pratt & Whitney47
Stephen J. Timm President, Collins Aerospace (since
February 2020)President, Avionics, Collins Aerospace; Vice President
and General Manager, Avionics, Collins Aerospace;
Vice President and General Manager, Avionics,
Rockwell Collins, Inc.; Vice President & General
Manager, Air Transport Systems, Rockwell Collins,
Inc.54
117
Table of Contents
Name Title Other Business Experience Since 1/1/2018Age as of
2/6/2023
Dantaya M. Williams Executive Vice President & Chief
Human Resources Officer,
Raytheon Technologies Corporation
(since June 2020)Vice President, Human Resources, Pratt & Whitney
Commercial Engines48
All of the officers serve at the pleasure of the Board of Directors of Raytheon Technologies Corporation or the subsidiary
designated.
Information concerning Section 16(a) compliance is incorporated herein by reference to the section of our Proxy Statement for the
2023 Annual Meeting of Shareowners titled “Other Important Information” under the heading “Delinquent Section 16(a) Reports.”
We have adopted a code of conduct that applies to all our directors, officers, employees and representatives. Information regarding
our Code of Conduct is incorporated herein by reference to the section of our Proxy Statement for the 2023 Annual Meeting of
Shareowners titled “Other Important Information” under the heading “Corporate Governance Information, Code of Conduct and
How to Contact the Board.” This code is publicly available on our website at http://www.rtx.com/Our-Company/ethics-and-
compliance. Amendments to the code of conduct and any grant of a waiver from a provision of the code requiring disclosure under
applicable Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC) rules will be disclosed on our website. Our Corporate Governance
Guidelines and the charters of our Board of Directors’ Audit Committee, Finance Committee, Governance and Public Policy
Committee, Human Capital and Compensation Committee and Special Activities Committee are available on our website at
https://www.rtx.com/Our-Company/corporate-governance. These materials may also be requested in print free of charge by writing
to our Investor Relations Department at Raytheon Technologies Corporation, 1000 Wilson Blvd., Arlington, VA 22209.
ITEM 11. EXECUTIVE COMPENSATION
The information required by Item 11 is incorporated herein by reference to the sections of our Proxy Statement for the 2023 Annual
Meeting of Shareowners titled “Executive Compensation,” “Compensation of Directors” and “Report of the Human Capital &
Compensation Committee.”
ITEM 12. SECURITY OWNERSHIP OF CERTAIN BENEFICIAL OWNERS AND MANAGEMENT AND RELATED
STOCKHOLDER MATTERS
The information relating to security ownership of certain beneficial owners and management is incorporated herein by reference to
the sections of our Proxy Statement for the 2023 Annual Meeting of Shareowners titled “Share Ownership.”
Securities Authorized for Issuance Under Equity Compensation Plans
The following table provides information about our equity compensation plans that authorize the issuance of shares of our common
stock as of December 31, 2022.
Number of securities to
be issued upon exercise
of outstanding options,
warrants and rights (a)Weighted average
exercise price of
outstanding options,
warrants and right
 ($/share) (b)Number of securities
remaining available for future
issuance under equity
compensation plans
(excluding securities
reflected in column (a)) (c)
Equity compensation plans approved by shareowners 18,549,957 $ 81.00 81,186,868 
Equity compensation plans not approved by shareowners 408,884 — — 
(1)    Consists of the following issuable shares of Common Stock under the Raytheon Technologies Corporation 2018 Long-Term Incentive Plan, as amended and
restated, effective April 26, 2021 (2018 LTIP) authorized for issuance: (i) upon the exercise of outstanding non-qualified stock options; (ii) upon the exercise
of outstanding stock appreciation rights (SARs); (iii) pursuant to outstanding restricted stock unit awards (RSUs) and performance share unit awards (PSUs),
assuming performance at the target level (up to an additional 2,129,956 shares of Common Stock could be issued if performance goals are achieved above
target); and (iv) upon the settlement of outstanding deferred stock units and RSUs awarded under the Raytheon Technologies Corporation Board of Directors
Deferred Stock Unit Plan, as amended and restated effective January 1, 2020. Under the RTX LTIPs, each SAR referred to in clause (ii) is exercisable for a
number of shares of Common Stock having a value equal to the difference between the market price of RTX on the exercise date and the exercise price. For
purposes of determining the total number of shares to be issued in respect of outstanding SARs as reflected in column (a) above, we have used the NYSE
closing price for a share of Common Stock on the last trading day of 2022 of $100.92. The weighted-average exercise price of outstanding options, warrants
and rights shown in column (b) takes into account only the shares identified in clauses (i) and (ii).
(2)    Consists of shares of Common Stock issuable pursuant to outstanding RSUs awards granted under the Raytheon Company 2019 Stock Plan and the Raytheon
Company 2010 Stock Plan, as amended (RTN Stock Plans), that were assumed upon the merger of UTC and RTN.
(3)    Represents the maximum number of shares of Common Stock available to be awarded under the Plan as of December 31, 2022. RSUs and PSUs (full-value
awards) will result in a reduction in the number of shares of Common Stock available for delivery under the 2018 LTIP in an amount equal to 4.03 times the
number of shares subject to the awards. SARs and stock options are not full-value awards and will result in a reduction in the number of shares of Common
Stock available for delivery under the Plan on a one-for-one basis.(1) (3)
(2)
118
Table of Contents
ITEM 13. CERTAIN RELATIONSHIPS AND RELATED TRANSACTIONS, AND DIRECTOR INDEPENDENCE
The information required by Item 13 is incorporated herein by reference to the sections of our Proxy Statement for the 2023 Annual
Meeting of Shareowners titled “Corporate Governance” (under the subheading “Director Independence”) and “Other Important
Information” (under the subheading “Transactions with Related Persons”).
ITEM 14. PRINCIPAL ACCOUNTANT FEES AND SERVICES
The information required by Item 14 is incorporated by reference to the section of our Proxy Statement for the 2023 Annual
Meeting of Shareowners titled “Appoint PwC LLP to Serve as Independent Auditor for 2023,” including the information provided
in that section with regard to “Audit Fees,” “Audit-Related Fees,” “Tax Fees” and “All Other Fees.”
119
Table of Contents
PART IV
ITEM 15. EXHIBITS AND FINANCIAL STATEMENT SCHEDULES
(a)    Financial Statements and Schedules
(1)    The following financial statements of Raytheon Technologies Corporation, supplemental information and report of
independent registered public accounting firm are included in this Form 10-K:
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm (PCAOB ID 238)
Consolidated Statement of Operations for the Years Ended December 31, 2022, 2021 and 2020
Consolidated Statement of Comprehensive Income (Loss) for the Years Ended December 31, 2022, 2021 and
2020
Consolidated Balance Sheet at December 31, 2022 and 2021
Consolidated Statement of Cash Flows for the Years Ended December 31, 2022, 2021 and 2020
Consolidated Statement of Changes in Equity for the Years Ended December 31, 2022, 2021 and 2020
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(2)    List of financial statement schedules:
 Page Number in
Form 10-K
SCHEDULE II—Valuation and Qualifying Accounts for the three years ended
December 31, 2022 130
All schedules have been omitted because they are not required, not applicable or the information is otherwise included.
(b)    Exhibits:
The following list of exhibits includes exhibits submitted with this Form 10-K as filed with the Securities and Exchange
Commission (SEC) and those incorporated by reference to other filings.
2.1Separation and Distribution Agreement, dated as of April 2, 2020, by and among United Technologies Corporation,
Otis Worldwide Corporation and Carrier Global Corporation (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 2.1 of the
Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K (Commission file number 1-812) filed with the SEC on April 8, 2020).
3(i)Restated Certificate of Incorporation, restated as of April 26, 2022, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3.1 to the
Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K (Commission file number 1-812) filed with the SEC on April 26, 2022.
3(ii)Bylaws as amended and restated effective April 25, 2022, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3.2 to the Company’s
Current Report on Form 8-K (Commission file number 1-812) filed with the SEC on April 26, 2022.
4.1Amended and Restated Indenture, dated as of May 1, 2001, between UTC and The Bank of New York, as trustee,
incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4(a) to the Company’s Registration Statement on Form S-3 (Commission file
number 333-60276) filed with the SEC on May 4, 2001. The Company hereby agrees to furnish to the Commission
upon request a copy of each other instrument defining the rights of holders of long-term debt of the Company and its
consolidated subsidiaries and any unconsolidated subsidiaries.
4.2Description of Securities, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to the Company’s Annual Report on Form 10-K
(Commission file number 1-812) for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2020.
10.1United Technologies Corporation Annual Executive Incentive Compensation Plan, incorporated by reference to
Exhibit A to the Company’s Proxy Statement for the 1975 Annual Meeting of Shareowners, Amendment No. 1 thereto,
effective January 1, 1995, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.2 to the Company’s Annual Report on Form 10-K
(Commission file number 1-812) for the fiscal year ended December 31, 1995, and Amendment No. 2 thereto,
effective January 1, 2009, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to the Company’s Annual Report on Form 10-K
(Commission file number 1-812) for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2008.
120
Table of Contents
10.2United Technologies Corporation Pension Preservation Plan, as amended and restated, effective January 1, 2020,
incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.2 to the Company’s Annual Report on Form 10-K (Commission file number
1-812) for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2020.
10.3United Technologies Corporation Senior Executive Severance Plan, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10(vi) to the
Company’s Annual Report on Form 10-K (Commission file number 1-812) for the fiscal year ended December 31,
1992, as amended by Amendment thereto, effective December 10, 2003, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.4 of
the Company’s Annual Report on Form 10-K (Commission file number 1-812) for the fiscal year ended December 31,
2003, and Amendment thereto, effective June 11, 2008, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.4 of the Company’s
Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q (Commission file number 1-812) for the quarterly period ended June 30, 2008, and
Amendment thereto, effective February 10, 2011, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.4 to the Company’s Annual
Report on Form 10-K (Commission file number 1-812) for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2010.
10.4United Technologies Corporation Deferred Compensation Plan, as amended and restated, effective January 1, 2011,
incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 of the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q (Commission file number
1-812) for the quarterly period ended June 30, 2018.
10.5United Technologies Corporation Executive Leadership Group Program, as amended and restated, effective October
15, 2013, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.11 to the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q (Commission
file number 1-812) for the quarterly period ended September 30, 2013; United Technologies Executive Leadership
Group Program, effective April 1, 2019; and Raytheon Technologies Corporation Executive Leadership Group
Program, effective April 3, 2020, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.5 to the Company’s Annual Report on Form
10-K (Commission file number 1-812) for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2020.
10.6Schedule of Terms for Restricted Share Unit Retention Awards relating to the United Technologies Corporation
Executive Leadership Group Program (referred to above in Exhibit 10.6), incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.12
to the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q (Commission file number 1-812) for the quarterly period ended
September 30, 2013; and Schedule of Terms of Restricted Share Unit Retention Awards relating to the United
Technologies Leadership Group Program, effective April 1, 2019 (referred to above in Exhibit 10.5).
10.7Form of Award Agreement for Restricted Share Unit Retention Awards relating to the United Technologies
Corporation Executive Leadership Group Program (referred to above in Exhibit 10.6), incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.13 to the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q (Commission file number 1-812) for the quarterly
period ended September 30, 2013; and Form of Award Agreement for Restricted Share Unit Retention Awards relating
to the United Technologies Leadership Group Program, effective April 1, 2019 (referred to above in Exhibit 10.5).
10.8United Technologies Corporation Board of Directors Deferred Stock Unit Plan, as Amended and Restated, effective as
of April 29, 2019, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.8 to the Company’s Annual Report on Form 10-K
(Commission file number 1-812) for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2018.
10.9Retainer Payment Election Form for United Technologies Corporation Board of Directors Deferred Stock Unit Plan
(referred to above in Exhibit 10.8), incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.9 to the Company’s Annual Report on
Form 10-K (Commission file number 1-812) for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2018.
10.10Form of Deferred Restricted Stock Unit Award relating to the United Technologies Corporation Board of Directors
Deferred Stock Unit Plan (referred to above in Exhibit 10.8), incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.10 to the
Company’s Annual Report on Form 10-K (Commission file number 1-812) for the fiscal year ended December 31,
2018.
10.11United Technologies Corporation Long-Term Incentive Plan, as amended and restated effective April 28, 2014,
incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to the Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K (Commission file number 1-
812) filed with the SEC on May 2, 2014, as further amended by Amendment No. 1, effective as of February 5, 2016,
incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.12 to the Company’s Annual Report on Form 10-K (Commission file number
1-812) for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2015.
10.12Schedule of Terms for restricted stock awards relating to the United Technologies Corporation Long-Term Incentive
Plan (referred to above in Exhibit 10.11) (Rev. January 2016), incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.13 to the
Company’s Annual Report on Form 10-K (Commission file number 1-812) for the fiscal year ended December 31,
2015.
121
Table of Contents
10.13Schedule of Terms for non-qualified stock option awards relating to the United Technologies Corporation Long-Term
Incentive Plan (referred to above in Exhibit 10.11) (Rev. January 2016), incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.15 to
the Company’s Annual Report on Form 10-K (Commission file number 1-812) for the fiscal year ended December 31,
2015.
10.14Form of Award Agreement for non-qualified stock option awards relating to the United Technologies Corporation
Long-Term Incentive Plan (referred to above in Exhibit 10.11), incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.15 to the
Company’s Annual Report on Form 10-K (Commission file number 1-812) for the fiscal year ended December 31,
2016.
10.15Schedule of Terms for performance share unit awards relating to the United Technologies Corporation Long-Term
Incentive Plan (referred to above in Exhibit 10.11) (Rev. January 2016), incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.17 to
the Company’s Annual Report on Form 10-K (Commission file number 1-812) for the fiscal year ended December 31,
2015.
10.16Schedule of Terms for stock appreciation rights awards relating to the United Technologies Corporation 2005 Long-
Term Incentive Plan (referred to above in Exhibit 10.11) (Rev. January 2016), incorporated by reference to Exhibit
10.18 to the Company’s Annual Report on Form 10-K (Commission file number 1-812) for the fiscal year ended
December 31, 2015.
10.17Form of Award Agreement for restricted stock unit, performance share unit and stock appreciation rights awards
relating to the United Technologies Corporation Long-Term Incentive Plan (referred to above in Exhibit 10.11),
incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.18 to the Company’s Annual Report on Form 10-K (Commission file number
1-812) for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2016.
10.18United Technologies Corporation LTIP Performance Share Unit Deferral Plan, relating to the Long-Term Incentive
Plan (referred to above in Exhibit 10.11) as amended and restated, effective January 1, 2020, incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.18 to the Company’s Annual Report on Form 10-K (Commission file number 1-812) for the
fiscal year ended December 31, 2020.
10.19United Technologies Corporation International Deferred Compensation Replacement Plan, effective January 1, 2005,
incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.35 of the Company’s Annual Report on Form 10-K (Commission file number
1-812) for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2008.
10.20United Technologies Corporation Company Automatic Contribution Excess Plan, as amended and restated, effective
January 1, 2020, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.20 to the Company’s Annual Report on Form 10-K
(Commission file number 1-812) for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2020.
10.21United Technologies Corporation Savings Restoration Plan executed July 16, 2018 (amended and restated as of
January 1, 2011), incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.3 to the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q
(Commission file number 1-812) for the quarterly period ended June 30, 2018.
10.22Raytheon Technologies Corporation 2018 Long-Term Incentive Plan, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 of the
Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K (Commission file number 1-812) filed with the SEC on May 3, 2018, as
amended by Amendment No. 1, effective as of December 6, 2020, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.22 to the
Company’s Annual Report on Form 10-K (Commission file number 1-812) for the fiscal year ended December 31,
2020.
10.23Schedule of Terms for restricted stock unit awards relating to the Raytheon Technologies Corporation 2018 Long-
Term Incentive Plan, as amended (referred to above in Exhibit 10.22), incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.4 to the
Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q (Commission file number 1-812) for the quarterly period ended March
31, 2021.
10.24Schedule of Terms for stock appreciation right awards relating to the Raytheon Technologies Corporation 2018 Long-
Term Incentive Plan, as amended (referred to above in Exhibit 10.22), incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.6 to the
Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q (Commission file number 1-812) for the quarterly period ended March
31, 2021.
10.25Schedule of Terms for performance share unit awards relating to the Raytheon Technologies Corporation 2018 Long-
Term Incentive Plan, as amended (referred to above in Exhibit 10.22), incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.5 to the
Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q (Commission file number 1-812) for the quarterly period ended March
31, 2021.
122
Table of Contents
10.26Schedule of Terms for stock option awards relating to the Raytheon Technologies Corporation 2018 Long-Term
Incentive Plan, as amended (referred to above in Exhibit 10.22), incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.7 to the
Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q (Commission file number 1-812) for the quarterly period ended March
31, 2021.
10.27Rockwell Collins’ 2015 Long-Term Incentives Plan, incorporated by reference to Appendix B to Rockwell Collins’
Notice and Proxy Statement (Commission file number 0001-16445) dated December 17, 2014.
10.28Form of Performance Share Agreement under Rockwell Collins’ 2015 Long-Term Incentives Plan (referred to above
in Exhibit 10.27), incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10-a-1 to Rockwell Collins’ Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q
(Commission file number 0001-16445) for the quarterly period ended December 31, 2017.
10.29Form of Restricted Stock Unit Agreement under Rockwell Collins’ 2015 Long-Term Incentives Plan (referred to
above in Exhibit 10.27), incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10-a-2 to Rockwell Collins’ Quarterly Report on Form
10-Q (Commission file number 0001-16445) for the quarterly period ended December 31, 2017.
10.30Compensation Recovery Policy acknowledgment and agreement, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10-c-1 to
Rockwell Collins’ Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q (Commission file number 0001-16445) for the quarterly period
ended December 31, 2012.
10.31Rockwell Collins’ Deferred Compensation Plan, as amended, incorporated by referenced to Exhibit 10-f-2 to
Rockwell Collins’ Annual Report on Form 10-K (Commission file number 0001-16445) for the fiscal year ended
September 30, 2007; Amendment No. 1 to Rockwell Collins’ Deferred Compensation Plan, as amended, incorporated
by reference to Exhibit 10-f-2 to Rockwell Collins’ Annual Report on Form 10-K/A (Commission file number 0001-
16445) for the fiscal year ended September 30, 2018.
10.32Rockwell Collins’ 2005 Deferred Compensation Plan, as amended and restated as of June 27, 2017, incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10-f-1 to Rockwell Collins’ Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q (Commission file number 0001-
16445) for the quarterly period ended June 30, 2017; Amendment No. 1 to Rockwell Collins’ 2005 Deferred
Compensation Plan, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10-f-1 to Rockwell Collins’ Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q
(Commission file number 0001-16445) for the quarterly period ended December 31, 2017; Amendment No. 2 to
Rockwell Collins’ 2005 Deferred Compensation Plan, as amended, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10-f-6 to
Rockwell Collins’ Annual Report on Form 10-K/A (Commission file number 0001-16445) for the fiscal year ended
September 30, 2018.
10.33Rockwell Collins’ Non-Qualified Savings Plan, as amended, incorporated by referenced to Exhibit 10-g-2 to Rockwell
Collins’ Annual Report on Form 10-K (Commission file number 0001-16445) for the fiscal year ended September 30,
2007; Amendment No. 1 to Rockwell Collins’ Non-Qualified Savings Plan, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10-g-
2 Rockwell Collins’ Annual Report on Form 10-K/A (Commission file number 0001-16445) for the fiscal year ended
September 30, 2018.
10.34Rockwell Collins’ 2005 Non-Qualified Retirement Savings Plan, as amended and restated as of July 17, 2018,
incorporated by referenced to Exhibit 10-g-6 to Rockwell Collins’ Annual Report on Form 10-K/A (Commission file
number 0001-16445) for the fiscal year ended September 30, 2018.
10.35Rockwell Collins’ 2005 Non-Qualified Pension Plan, as amended, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10-h-1 to
Rockwell Collins’ Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q (Commission file number 0001-16445) for the quarterly period
ended June 30, 2012; Amendment No. 1 to Rockwell Collins’ Non-Qualified Pension Plan, as amended, incorporated
by reference to Exhibit 10-h-1 to Rockwell Collins’ Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q (Commission file number 0001-
16445) for the quarterly period ended December 31, 2015; Amendment No. 2 to Rockwell Collins’ 2005 Non-
Qualified Pension Plan, as amended, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10-h-3 to Rockwell Collins’ Annual Report
on Form 10-K/A (Commission file number 0001-16445) for the fiscal year ended September 30, 2018.
10.36Rockwell Collins’ Master Trust, as amended, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10-i-2 to Rockwell Collins’ Annual
Report on Form 10-K (Commission file number 0001-16445) for the fiscal year ended September 30, 2007;
Amendment No. 1 to Rockwell Collins’ Master Trust, as amended, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10-i-2 to
Rockwell Collins’ Annual Report on Form 10-K/A (Commission file number 0001-16445) for the fiscal year ended
September 30, 2018; Amendment No. 2 to Rockwell Collins’ Master Trust, as amended; and Amendment No.3 to
Rockwell Collins’ Master Trust, as amended, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.35 to the Company’s Annual
Report on Form 10-K (Commission file number 1-812) for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2018.
123
Table of Contents
10.37Rockwell Collins’ Short-term Relocation Benefit to Rockwell Collin’s CEO, CFO and two other executive officers,
incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10-e-1 to Rockwell Collins’ Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q (Commission file
number 0001-16445) for the quarterly period ended March 31, 2018; Description of the Extension to the Short-Term
Relocation Benefit for the Company’s CEO, CFO and two other executive officers, incorporated by referenced to
Exhibit 10-j-2 to Rockwell Collins’ Annual Report on Form 10-K/A (Commission file number 0001-16445) for the
fiscal year ended September 30, 2018.
10.38Compensation & Covenants Agreement between United Technologies Corporation and Robert K. Ortberg, effective as
of November 26, 2018, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.37 to the Company’s Annual Report on Form 10-K
(Commission file number 1-812) for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2018.
10.39Employment Agreement, dated as of June 9, 2019, by and between United Technologies Corporation and Gregory J.
Hayes, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 the Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K (Commission file
number 1-812) filed with the SEC on June 10, 2019.
10.40First Amendment, dated March 4, 2021, to Employment Agreement (referred to above in Exhibit 10.38) between
Gregory J. Hayes and Raytheon Technologies Corporation, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 of the
Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K (Commission file number 1-812) filed with the SEC on March 5, 2021.
10.41United Technologies Corporation Merger Severance Plan for Corporate Office Executives and Other Key Employees,
incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 of the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q (Commission file number
1-812) for the quarterly period ended June 30, 2019.
10.42Amendment dated February 3, 2020, to the terms of certain awards granted under the Company’s Long Term
Incentive Plans (referred to above in Exhibits 10.11 and 10.22), by and between United Technologies Corporation and
Judy Marks incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.40 of the Company’s Annual Report on Form 10-K (Commission
file number 1-812) for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2019.
10.43Transition Services Agreement, dated as of April 2, 2020, by and among United Technologies Corporation, Otis
Worldwide Corporation and Carrier Global Corporation (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 of the Company’s
Current Report on Form 8-K (Commission file number 1-812) filed with the SEC on April 8, 2020).
10.44Tax Matters Agreement, dated as of April 2, 2020, by and among United Technologies Corporation, Otis Worldwide
Corporation and Carrier Global Corporation (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.2 of the Company’s Current
Report on Form 8-K (Commission file number 1-812) filed with the SEC on April 8, 2020).
10.45Employee Matters Agreement, dated as of April 2, 2020, by and among United Technologies Corporation, Otis
Worldwide Corporation and Carrier Global Corporation (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.3 of the Company’s
Current Report on Form 8-K (Commission file number 1-812) filed with the SEC on April 8, 2020).
10.46First Amendment to Employee Matters Agreement (referred to above in Exhibit 10.45), dated as of May 22, 2020
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 of the Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K (Commission file number
1-812) filed with the SEC on May 29, 2020).
10.47Intellectual Property Agreement, dated as of April 2, 2020, by and among United Technologies Corporation, Otis
Worldwide Corporation and Carrier Global Corporation (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.4 of the Company’s
Current Report on Form 8-K (Commission file number 1-812) filed with the SEC on April 8, 2020).
10.48Employment Agreement, dated as of June 9, 2019, between Thomas A. Kennedy and United Technologies
Corporation, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.2 to the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q
(Commission file number 1-812) for the quarterly period ended March 31, 2021.
10.49First Amendment, dated March 4, 2021, to Employment Agreement between Thomas A. Kennedy and Raytheon
Technologies Corporation (referred to above in Exhibit 10.48), incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.3 to the
Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarterly period ended March 31, 2021.
10.50Separation Agreement, dated as of May 24, 2021, between Thomas A. Kennedy and Raytheon Technologies
Corporation, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the
quarterly period ended June 30, 2021.
10.51Raytheon Company 2010 Stock Plan, as amended as of May 24, 2017, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.2 to
Raytheon Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended July 2, 2017.
124
Table of Contents
10.52Raytheon Company Excess Savings Plan, as amended and restated effective as of January 1, 2009, as further amended
effective January 1, 2010 and November 1, 2013, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.9 to Raytheon Company’s
Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2013.
10.53Raytheon Company Excess Pension Plan, as amended and restated effective as of January 1, 2009, as further amended
effective January 1, 2009, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.10 to Raytheon Company’s Annual Report on Form
10-K for the year ended December 31, 2013.
10.54Raytheon Company Supplemental Executive Retirement Plan, as amended and restated effective as of January 1,
2009, as further amended effective January 1, 2011, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.11 to Raytheon
Company’s Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2013.
10.55Raytheon Company Deferred Compensation Plan, as amended and restated effective as of January 1, 2009, as further
amended effective January 1, 2009, January 1, 2010, May 6, 2010 and November 1, 2013, incorporated by reference
to Exhibit 10.12 to Raytheon Company’s Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2013.
10.56Raytheon 2019 Stock Plan, incorporated by reference to Appendix A to Raytheon Company’s definitive proxy
statement, filed on April 16, 2019.
10.57Form of Change in Control Severance Agreement between Raytheon Company and certain executive officers
(providing for benefits in the event of a qualified termination upon a change in control of two times base salary and
bonus), incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.22 to Raytheon Company’s Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year
ended December 31, 2009.
10.58Form of Amendment to Change in Control Severance Agreement between Raytheon Company and its executive
officers, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.60 to Raytheon Company’s Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year
ended December 31, 2009.
10.59Form of Change in Control Severance Agreement between Raytheon Company and certain executive officers
(providing for benefits in the event of a qualified termination upon a change in control of one times base salary and
bonus), incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.4 to Raytheon Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the
quarter ended April 3, 2016.
10.60Letter Agreement dated January 21, 2015 by and between Raytheon Company and Anthony F. O’Brien, incorporated
by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to Raytheon Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended April 3,
2016.
10.61Letter Agreement dated December 16, 2014 by and between Raytheon Company and Frank R. Jimenez, incorporated
by reference to Exhibit 10.2 to Raytheon Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended April 3,
2016.
10.62Amendment to Letter Agreement dated January 23, 2015 by and between Raytheon Company and Frank R. Jimenez,
incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.3 to Raytheon Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter
ended April 3, 2016.
10.63Enhanced Severance Plan for Senior Leadership Team Members, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to
Raytheon Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2019.
10.64Letter Agreement, dated July 23, 2015, by Raytheon Company and Wesley D. Kremer, incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.1 to Raytheon Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2019.
10.65Amendment to Letter Agreement, dated March 21, 2019, by Raytheon Company and Wesley D. Kremer, incorporated
by reference to Exhibit 10.2 to Raytheon Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31,
2019.
10.66Schedule of Terms for restricted stock unit awards relating to the Raytheon Technologies Corporation 2018 Long-
Term Incentive Plan, as amended and restated (referred to in Exhibit 10.22 to the Company’s Annual Report on Form
10-K (Commission file number 1-812) for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2021), incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.1 to the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q (Commission file number 1-812) for the quarterly
period ended March 31, 2022.
125
Table of Contents
10.67Schedule of Terms for performance share unit awards relating to the Raytheon Technologies Corporation 2018 Long-
Term Incentive Plan, as amended and restated (referred to in Exhibit 10.22 to the Company’s Annual Report on Form
10-K (Commission file number 1-812) for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2021), incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.2 to the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q (Commission file number 1-812) for the quarterly
period ended March 31, 2022.
10.68Schedule of Terms for stock appreciation right awards relating to the Raytheon Technologies Corporation 2018 Long-
Term Incentive Plan, as amended and restated (referred to in Exhibit 10.22 to the Company’s Annual Report on Form
10-K (Commission file number 1-812) for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2021), incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.3 to the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q (Commission file number 1-812) for the quarterly
period ended March 31, 2022.
10.69Schedule of Terms for stock option awards relating to the Raytheon Technologies Corporation 2018 Long-Term
Incentive Plan, as amended and restated (referred to in Exhibit 10.22 to the Company’s Annual Report on Form 10-K
(Commission file number 1-812) for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2021), incorporated by reference to Exhibit
10.4 to the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q (Commission file number 1-812) for the quarterly period
ended March 31, 2022.
10.70Raytheon Technologies Corporation Executive Severance Plan, effective April 4, 2022, incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.5 to the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q (Commission file number 1-812) for the quarterly
period ended March 31, 2022.
10.71Consulting Agreement, dated as of April 1, 2022, by and between Raytheon Technologies Corporation and Michael R.
Dumais, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.6 to the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q (Commission
file number 1-812) for the quarterly period ended March 31, 2022.
10.72Raytheon Technologies Corporation Compensation Deferral Plan, effective as of January 1, 2023.*
14Code of Conduct. The RTC Code of Conduct may be accessed via RTC’s website at https://www.rtx.com/our-
company/ethics-and-compliance.
21Subsidiaries of Raytheon Technologies Corporation.*
23Consent of PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP.*
24Powers of Attorney of Tracy A. Atkinson, Leanne G. Caret, Bernard A. Harris, Jr., George R. Oliver, Robert K.
Ortberg, Margaret L. O’Sullivan, Dinesh C. Paliwal, Ellen M. Pawlikowski, Denise L. Ramos, Fredric G. Reynolds,
Brian C. Rogers, James A. Winnefeld, Jr. and Robert O. Work.*
31.1Rule 13a-14(a)/15d-14(a) Certification.*
31.2Rule 13a-14(a)/15d-14(a) Certification.*
31.3Rule 13a-14(a)/15d-14(a) Certification.*
32Section 1350 Certifications.*
101.INSeXtensible Business Reporting Language (XBRL) Instance Document - the instance document does not appear in the
Interactive Data File because its XBRL tags are embedded within the Inline XBRL document.
101.SCHInline XBRL Taxonomy Extension Schema Document.*
101.CALInline XBRL Taxonomy Extension Calculation Linkbase Document.*
101.DEFInline XBRL Taxonomy Extension Definition Linkbase Document.*
101.LABInline XBRL Taxonomy Extension Label Linkbase Document.*
101.PREInline XBRL Taxonomy Extension Presentation Linkbase Document.*
126
Table of Contents
104The cover page from the Company’s Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2022, formatted
in Inline XBRL and contained in Exhibit 101.
(Exhibits marked with an asterisk (*) are filed electronically herewith.)
ITEM 16. FORM 10-K SUMMARY
Not applicable.
127
Table of Contents
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this
report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
RAYTHEON TECHNOLOGIES CORPORATION
(Registrant)
Dated:February 6, 2023 By: /s/ NEIL G. MITCHILL, JR.
Neil G. Mitchill, Jr.
Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer
(on behalf of the Registrant and as the Registrant’s Principal
Financial Officer)
Dated:February 6, 2023 By: /s/ AMY L. JOHNSON
Amy L. Johnson
 Corporate Vice President and Controller
(on behalf of the Registrant and as the Registrant’s Principal
Accounting Officer)
128
Table of Contents
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, this report has been signed below by the following persons on
behalf of the Registrant and in the capacities and on the dates indicated.
Signature Title Date
/s/ GREGORY J. HAYES Chairman, President and Chief Executive Officer
(Principal Executive Officer)February 6, 2023
(Gregory J. Hayes)
/s/ NEIL G. MITCHILL, JR. Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer
(Principal Financial Officer)February 6, 2023
(Neil G. Mitchill, Jr.)
/s/ AMY L. JOHNSON Corporate Vice President and Controller
(Principal Accounting Officer)February 6, 2023
(Amy L. Johnson)
/s/ TRACY A. ATKINSON * Director February 6, 2023
(Tracy A. Atkinson)
/s/ LEANNE G. CARET * Director February 6, 2023
(Leanne G. Caret)
/s/ BERNARD A. HARRIS, JR.* Director February 6, 2023
(Bernard A. Harris, Jr.)
/s/ GEORGE R. OLIVER * Director February 6, 2023
(George R. Oliver)
/s/ ROBERT K. ORTBERG * Director February 6, 2023
(Robert K. Ortberg)
/s/ MARGARET L. O’SULLIVAN * Director February 6, 2023
(Margaret L. O’Sullivan)
/s/ DINESH C. PALIWAL * Director February 6, 2023
(Dinesh C. Paliwal)
/s/ ELLEN M. PAWLIKOWSKI * Director February 6, 2023
(Ellen M. Pawlikowski)
/s/ DENISE L. RAMOS * Director February 6, 2023
(Denise L. Ramos)
/s/ FREDRIC G. REYNOLDS * Director February 6, 2023
(Fredric G. Reynolds)
/s/ BRIAN C. ROGERS * Director February 6, 2023
(Brian C. Rogers)
/s/ JAMES A. WINNEFELD, JR. * Director February 6, 2023
(James A. Winnefeld, Jr.)
/s/ ROBERT O. WORK * Director February 6, 2023
(Robert O. Work)
*By: /s/ RAMSARAN MAHARAJH, JR.
Ramsaran Maharajh, Jr.
Executive Vice President and General Counsel
Date: February 6, 2023
129
Table of Contents
RAYTHEON TECHNOLOGIES CORPORATION AND SUBSIDIARIES
SCHEDULE II - Valuation and Qualifying Accounts
Three years ended December 31, 2022
 
(dollars in millions)
Future Income Tax Benefits—Valuation allowance:
Balance, December 31, 2019 $ 616 
Additions charged to income tax expense 581 
Additions charged to goodwill, due to acquisitions 29 
Reductions credited to income tax expense (36)
Other adjustments, including the Separation of Carrier and Otis (433)
Balance, December 31, 2020 757 
Additions charged to income tax expense 136 
Reductions credited to goodwill, due to acquisitions (19)
Reductions credited to income tax expense (37)
Other adjustments (12)
Balance, December 31, 2021 825 
Additions charged to income tax expense 54 
Reductions credited to income tax expense (82)
Other adjustments 45 
Balance, December 31, 2022 $ 842 
(1)    Amounts prior to 2020 within this schedule include valuation allowances related to discontinued operations.(1)
130
